Hello. 
Aye. 
Uh, you can write it down. 
Wait a minute. 
Aye. 
You, uh, you first tell me how I got this phone. Uh, it's like 
this, 
that is to say, you, after I tell you about this phone number one eight zero. Aye, 
one eight zero zero, what's the next number? Uh, 
three eight zero. 
Three eight zero, 
ah? Seven three six six. 
Seven three six six, later, ah, okay. Aye, 
you. After 
I got this phone number, what happened? 
you just ask for it you say you say you listen listen listen to me there's this here 
yes 
it's 
called this 
call friend 
call friend 
%null 
OK 
or call home 
that is to say it now has it now has two kinds of this program 
call home 
one program is 
just call friend 
um 
call friend you can call 
um 
and all the 
people in this 
Potolick oh er 
but he only only calls once OKAY 
just 
within thirty minutes 
um 
and then he also gives you ten yuan 
OKAY 
also gives you ten yuan 
OKAY 
yes 
then what about CALL HOME 
CALL HOME is the one that has to be called called 
in to China uh-huh just 
it's the same 
call thirty minutes 
also call thirty minutes and then it's him 
you 
if you call this number it will ask you that is 
your name 
um 
address and then that 
one er level of education 
or something like that. The person who called me. 
Just some. 
Right, because he. 
Not asking about the other party 
or something. Right, right, asking about you, because you're going to call, so he has to. 
Ah, then he wants to record my speech. 
Right. 
Then it shouldn't matter 
either. Um, just whoever is the one that's speaking. Right, 
right. It 
shouldn't matter. Then 
for now, 
that is, so you have 
a I'm not afraid, you record it. If there 
is 
any secret thing, just do not 
tell me. You just say it, I will not, that one. Alas. Then, 
then, 
that is to say, you, 
you, you ask him for it, and then you tell him the address, right? And then you put your, 
um. 
Right. It's all in English, and then. 
Tell me my address or the address of my other party? 
You, 
no, you tell, tell, tell him the address, tell him your current address. 
Ah, current address. 
because he's going to take that 
he's going to send you a letter telling you how to make this call 
oh 
and then telling you the password 
oh 
because he has a password 
er 
yes and then that is to say by the time 
he might still send you the ticket that is to say like 
this um huh 
er 
now I because 
because 
he has this CALL FRIEND PROGRAM 
in Chinese um that is to say 
I just help him make a call then I 
would make a call to you 
okay. thank you. how are you doing? 
ah 
ah 
how are you 
doing? still still still still okay. I'm working here. is 
your wife doing well? 
she she's doing quite well. she's now, eh, 
this 
ah, you're going to have a child? 
ah? 
you don't know? Xu Jian didn't tell you? 
I don't know. 
no. 
you're going to have a 
baby in 
September. 
ah, really? 
ah congratulations. Oh, this is headache. Why 
didn't Xu Jian tell anything? Ah? He 

didn't say anything. Xu Jian, 
why did he say nothing? When 
did you tell him? He probably didn't hear, didn't see it, 
right? 
Ah? When did you tell him? 
I don't know. I told him, 
he sent an e-mail and I told him, I think. 
Oh. 
Aye. 
How is it? You, you and these two kids are not bad now, ah? 
Ah? 
So annoying. 
So annoying. 
Ah. 
You now. 
Do you know if it's a boy or a girl? 
ah we found out it's a boy 
ah 
um 
that's quite good 
you're 
quite good 
ah 
ah this this anyway probably will be the same as you anyway it's going to be the opposite 
really always you you are planning 
business right 
ah 
within the plan within the plan 
within the plan within the plan within the plan 
ah this anyway but these things you always need it right ah 
now you still live in that that Philadelphia 
Right. Still, still here. 
Ah. 
You, you, you, how are these two kids doing now? Are their treats, your, your, your family should be better here, right? We, 
um, 

it's fine. Um, I'll pass by there in the future to visit you. 
Ah, right. Xu Jian said you would, um Right. If 
you go to Washington to play. 
Right. Then you can come over to our place to play. We Right. 
OK. 
We're 
very close to this SANTORO CITY here. To that, um, 
to that, um, that 
art museu l'as, or whatever. 
Oh, really? 
All are very close. 
We, Oh. 
It's 
on twenty first street. Oh, 
we do n't know that specific place, but can so many people live in your house? 
Yes, no problem. You, you, you have to, you have 
to. It can. Oh, then if we can stay a night, it's fine. We can 
chat a bit 
over there. But if you live, if you have so many people, then you can only sleep on the floor. 
Then just sleep on the floor. 
Oh, sleeping on the floor is no problem, anyway. 
We used to move all the time on the floor. 
Oh, because we do n't have so many boats. 
Now it's moved a little bigger. 
I know. 
Oh. 
Then if you are, uh, yes, we have it here, 
I see. I'm going to buy a, uh, Fulton or something. 
Oh. 
If you come, then, uh. Oh, 
no, 
no, no, no, no, no rush. No, 

because I also wanted to buy it, because. Oh. 
Oh, 
now I want to move my, uh, move my mom here. 
oh really 
like this 
now now this visa application is very troublesome this 
they they said that in Shanghai it seems that now it happens that it's 
the time for students to go to school so 
there are especially a lot of people who apply for visas 
oh to line up yes 
so 
so 
oh 
that's okay he's already different from that student 
he has a different kind of management 
the distribution but the problem is he has a ratio that is 
probably for example he he 
this for example 
Shanghai for example how many percent of people he refused then 
if there are many students who left then 
then the probability of his his rejection of nature is bigger 
oh my god is that 
right 
um 
where is your your wife from 
oh my god people 
from Shanghai 
oh also people from Shanghai 
right 
oh 
then 
his parents can't come 
his parents oh my god really 
this his parents actually originally were here 
oh 
but his parents are less bold Do 
you know that they 
His parents are in that 
In his sister's place. In, 
right, after staying in his sister's place for a while. 
Even if he dares not to, he would blacken the household 
register. 
Then 
Right. And then when he went back, he could n't get it signed 
when 
he went back. Oh. Then you, you, your dad. 
Is 
that so? 
Is n't coming? He has n't come yet. He, he 
is now. You are only helping your mother alone? 
Right. First, first, I will first get my mom here. How old is 
your mother? 
Huh? How old is your 
mother? 
Do you hear me? I heard it, I think he is not old 
and 
beautiful. Aye. Oh, 
I 
do n't know about this. Yes, yes. Have you, have you all gone 
out to play recently? I called 
you once, you 
were not here. Oh, really? Recently, anyway, Huang Mingjia often goes fishing, right? Yes, he often goes fishing. Right. Where 
does 
he 
go fishing? He, just nearby a lake, then he goes to other 
people's place. Oh, oh, that, 
how is it over there with you now? Is it hot? It's not 
hot now. 
Not hot? Just money I think money seems like Oh Last week it was very hot one day, then these two days it was raining, then it was not 
hot. Ah Very cool, is 
it very 
hot in your place? 
It's like this. Right right 
right, we will go to California in a few days. Oh California is hotter these days, it seems to be over one hundred 
and four degrees, I saw the news yesterday. Really? Right. Wow incredible.% ha ha 
% ha % ha % ha % ha 
% 
ha 
% ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % 
ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % 
ha % ha % ha % ha 
% ha % 
ha % ha % ha 
% ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % 
ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha 
% 
ha % ha 
% ha 
% ha % ha % ha % ha % 
ha 
% ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha 
% 
ha % ha % ha % ha % 
ha % ha % 
ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % 
ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % 
ha 
% ha 
% ha % 
ha % ha % 
ha % ha % ha 
% ha % ha % ha % 
ha % ha 
% ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha % ha I will go there from here on August thirteenth, and then, 
I have rented a house now, it's more than five hundred yuan, 
more than five hundred and thirty yuan. 
Oh, what is the two bedroom you are renting? That 

one bedroom. 
Then why is it so expensive? The 
sales are high in his place. 
They have no other way, it's like this. 
Oh. 
It's like this, you, you, you are renting a one bedroom now, it's more than four hundred, right? 
Right. 
% er, three hundred and four. 
Three hundred and four, one bedroom. 
Right. 
Right. Ah, 
it's too cheap, it's really cheap. But 
we do n't have much money, we do n't have much money to 
go around here. Hey you you do n't you include everything in that, these three hundred and four hundred, 
or Electricity fees, gas fees, these.% Er, yes, 
include everything, because this electricity fee, because this is equivalent to the school's that 
kind. 
Yeah. Include all school houses. Ah 
ah ah ah ah. 
Ah then then you think that's a lot 
better? Right. Yeah, it's pretty cheap. 
Have you done any work during the summer vacation in Huangfu River? The summer vacation 
in Huangfu River, it's not that one section is already finished, there's no work. 
And then this section will be done 
as a TA. As a TA? 
Right. 
Oh, then there will be some production during vacation, right? During vacation, 
there 
wo n't be any of that section, last time. 
Oh, there wo n't be any of that section? 
Right. 
Oh, then you 
Then it's like that one and a half month 
without money. One and a half month 
without money, that does n't matter, does n't matter, what are you doing now? 
I'm reading English now. 
Reading English, preparing for exams. 
Oh. 
I, I'm preparing to take the TOEFL again, because 
Oh, oh, oh, 
oh. I did n't do well in the exam last 
time. OK. 
Take another exam, it's troublesome. 
Uh-huh. 
And then what will you do? And then 
I'm going to go to school. 
And then you're going to go to school? 
Right. 
Huang Huang Bujian currently what is his plan? Does he want to get a Ph D or? 
He currently wants to get a master. Right. And then he'll 
go 
look for a job? 
Right, look for a job, right. 
Ah ah ah. 
Hey he seems to be also there in California, look for a job there in California. 
OK, then when you come over we'll be in touch again. There's no way he'll go to our place, how is that 
possible? Really maybe. Aye Aye. 

What is Zhou Xin doing now? 
That 
She is now in Gainton, she will talk to you later, that I I I will ask you, that is, why are you now, that is how long has she been, she is about to %pw. 
Ah. 
When is she planning to graduate? 
Oh she plans to, she plans to in March, probably. 
Next March? 
Right. 
In ninety six. 
Oh, that's very soon. 
Ah. 
But the work she's learning, that course, that computer or something, it's easy to find a job. 
Yeah. 
It's easy to find a job, because it's, just, for him, for summer he just wants, wants to find a, um, an intern, um. Uh-huh. 
Then, just, 
they all require him based on the, based on the job requirement. Uh-huh. Then 

if he's looking for a job right away and he's about to graduate, the job is easy to find, but for him to be an intern it's not very easy. 
Oh. They require 
a longer time, or something like that. 
Right, right, right. 
So he wants to graduate quickly. I 
just graduated and looking for a job the income is pretty good in the United States and the world so you probably study in California %null 
ah 
right maybe I do n't know it now 
study 
ah how do you feel about staying in the 
United States it 
feels fine it feels 
fine %null 
it feels good right %null how 

big is your house 
probably 
the 
house 
%null just that one BEDROOM there 
is 
there is about forty square meters 
about forty square meters ah ah ah 
Right. 
Like we, if you have a chance to go to California, just go to our place, we currently. 
That's no problem, if I can go there. It's 
more convenient to live there and whatnot. Yeah. 

Do you know what news Lao Yang and 
them have? There seems to be no news 
at present. Lao Yang, well, some time ago, 
he, uh, 
He did n't contact, 
there was no news, there was no news of whatnot. 
Yeah. 
And then he said that he might contact again next year. 
Contact again next year? 
Right. 
Wah, Lao Yang's time to tough the thing is long enough. 
His luck is very 
I I I also helped him, I have no other way. 
His luck is very bad. Right right 
right I think it's his luck is too bad, he does n't know what's going 
on. Oh, there's no way. Oh. Because now 
I think his strength is still not good, you are testing the kids at Tsinghua University, they are testing very high. 
He is n't testing very high, and he is 
n't testing the oral test or something like that, that is he has no advantage. 
Yea, now it's, it's a crisis. Then Gu Li Zhi you said she's coming out this year right? Yea 
Gu Li Zhi is coming out, I don't know which school she's going to, I have no idea. 
Yea, have you heard of Wang Xiaohui, our department has him. 
Wang Xiaohui is definitely coming out, because when I came she seemed to have had three schools by now. 
Yea yea, she came to our school. 
Oh, she came to your school and then you left. Yea. 
Yea 
I left, she took my position. 
All the way. Yea. 
Yea, 
very interesting, well Zhou Ning say a few words. OK. Aye. 
Hey, 

Xiao Huang. 
Hey. Hey, 
hello. We can take half an hour off for free here. 
Oh, that's pretty good. 
Yes. 
What are you doing now? 
I do n't have a job now. 
How much is your, um, trial for the postgraduate admission? 
It's more than two thousand and two hundred. 
More than two thousand and two hundred? 
Oh, that's quite high. 
Anyway, it's still, still a good deal. 
It's quite high. Yes. 

Oh, I 
. I have nothing to do 
now. 
Yes. I, I, I have nothing to do 
now, now. sixty sixty years old oh 
that's easy ah it's definitely easy to get visa it's easy for those over 
sixty years old it's definitely easy yes yes 
yes definitely people over sixty years old can get visa 
no one would go back really ah I I I a while ago that one of our friends here a friend's parents they two went to get visa 
together 
and then were rejected I don't know if he's over sixty he he anyway he is his that reason is Can 
you hear clearly? 
I can 

hear you. 
Uh-huh. It 
does 
n't matter, 
let's talk about ours. That 
%pw, 
there are many choices, what are the 
choices?%pw, it's like this, today I saw my 
First house. 
Uh-huh. 
It's an empty 
one. 
Ah. It has two bedrooms, one bathroom. Ah. 
That, 
then that kitchen is also relatively small, that bathroom is also relatively small. 
Then that, that is to say, the unfurnished utility has to pay for it. 
Ah. 
and then it's five hundred and sixty nine it's starting starting 
price then how much does it cost to add to the utility 
the utility might 
be the utility might be two people together for one month it might be two thirty it might be about the same as yours 
oh you have to pay for everything 
including water electricity gas and so on right 
yes 
oh that won't be worth two thirty 
and then 
in winter your gas might be PULL DOWN you are burning GAS 
Burning 
gas or burning something, if it's burning gas, in winter it's possible that sometimes 
Over fifty or over a hundred 
is 
possible. 
Really? Yes. And then 
Oh, I do n't know, in your place, in your place in winter 
His house is quite big. 
Ah. Eight 
eight hundred and fifty square feet. 
And then, and then that he, 
I, and then Shi Jin specially took me to just bring Just 
found a big 
Just Opened a really 
far place and found that matter matter station that information. And 
then just 
However if you still have to do a task markup every month, You still have to do more 
more 
more work. Oh. In that case, one month is probably, that is to say if, that is 
to say,% er, probably between three hundred and five to four hundred. 
Oh. 
This is this is a choice, that is to say this place is really quite 
close. 
Oh. It is also the only place I have hope for when I call. Oh. And 
then, 
Yeah, and 
then, later that, that 
is yesterday we were at that A. M. P. did n't we watch that Amory Wood? 
Ah. 
And then that one, that is, it says that currently there is only, only that one bedroom, that is apartment, that is that, I was telling you about that efficiency. Ah. 
It 
just says, just says, just that kitchen is inside the bedroom, you also know that. 
And then there's a bathroom. 
This is a choice. 
That is This 
is three hundred yuan per month, it is said that, that Ah? 
Are they all included? 
Are three hundred yuan included in the 
whole package?% Um, it seems that 
they are 
not included in the whole package. Oh. And then this is a choice. 
And then and then I still have n't confirmed this choice, because this morning that babysitter picked up the phone. 
Ah. 
And then, and then that, but later Wu Ding, 
that is, Wu Ding from our Chinese Students Association called me. Uh-huh, uh-huh, uh-huh. 
He 
said, 
%pw, 
he's renting 
now, he rents at Emory Wood. Uh-huh, uh-huh. Then there was a Chinese 
guy, 
he 
rented a small 
one. 
Ah. That guy, he's moving out at the end of August. Ah. 
He 
said that if I was interested I could move in. 
Oh. And 
then I was there the day after tomorrow to see the house. Oh. He said, 
Yeah, 
he said that because they rent it big, I they rent it big, I rent it small. Oh. 
That 
is I could pay less rent. Oh. I think 

I could pay a little less, maybe 
twenty or thirty bucks. That was 
five hundred yuan, the whole house was five hundred yuan. 
Oh. 
And then, 
That 
You have n't talked about the rent issue have you? 
Right. 
I told him, I said is it half the price? He 
said no, he said because we rented that big one, he said the rent could be even lower, he said you only rent the small one. 
Ah, 
ah. 
He said the rent could be even 
lower. 
Um. And then, but he only had one bathroom, which was probably not very convenient, it was that kind of apartment, that upper and lower 
level. 
Um. 
Just Two bedrooms are upstairs, downstairs is probably the living room. 
Yea. 
But 
Yea, but I mean, because I have n't checked my room, I mean, I do n't know, I think I can, I can, I can do half of 
it, 
I can do the furnishings. Yea. And the kitchen and whatnot, I can share with her. 
Yea. 
I mean, the refrigerator and whatnot, I 
can share with her, and then she probably has some microwave and toaster, I probably do n't need to buy them. 
Yea. 
I can use his, I might still have to go to 
this. Then you can see. Ask his 
wife, % er 
this is a good choice. Um. There's 
another 
choice, which is 
very very good, it's just 
that I really ca n't go to school. 
That choice was also provided to me by a Chinese, which is I called a Chinese student association, and finally he 
sent me a post on the Emory network, and I got a reply at night. 
um 
there's a person he lives in a a house of an old American lady who is over seventy years old um that his 
beard 
is on one side it's two-layered on one side it's one layer the old lady lives on one layer of her own 
ah 
ah 
he and an Irish live on those two floors 
ah 
each person has one BEDROOM and one BATHROOM 
ah 
ah 
then that old lady has a refrigerator 
ah 
Then the local phone is that C free. 
% 
Uh Then 
Then there's that washer and dryer. Uh 
That 
is to say you can put it in the house 
and then do that. Yeah I know I know. 
Then that includes gas water electricity and all the 
utility. Then the rent is one month three hundred. Wow. It's too far right? It's just right it's four miles away from Emory. % uh, then are you contacting the school now? I, I, this fall I only contacted, this Pentecostal school here.% Uh, right, then did you contact their place? No, I did n't contact California. You did n't contact, oh, it does n't matter, you have such a high 
score, and then it's easy to contact when you go there. Ah. Then, then it 
will take half a year and a year, anyway, it's nothing to do again.% uh. 
Anyway, 
I, I'm now, I'm also quite oh then probably a little further away right 
yes just a little further away actually this place is the best I think 
why 
ah 
why 
then that is to say this phone that is to say this kind of local phone bill there 
won't be much money for 
LOCAL phone LOCAL phone of course there's not much money but that UTILITY of yours it's all included 
that is to say if it's about the cheap price it might still be the cheap price of that Wu Jing's 
place enough 
you go to see 
I I think it's not necessarily 
how come 
because if you want to use your that UTILITY 
what UTILITY did Wu Jin tell you 
Wu Jin he just we talked about this rent it's just talking about the prospect of that 
house yes that is to say UTILITY won't 
because his that his that UTILITY that is to say he has to pay for it himself 
yes UTILITY you you just SHARE SHARE SHARE it and it's gone that is to say 
pay separately 
right 
because it's not that 
you pay it alone UTILITY Yea, there's ticket, that is, that is 
of course everyone pays, if everyone 
pays. There's ticket, there's definitely two of them paying more, because two of them Yea, 
but Shi Jing said she would n't let me pay one-third of it. 
I estimate it's probably a difference between one-third and one-twenty 
percent. Yea, anyway that's not too much. 
Because your starting price is low. 
So you think Wuding is still pretty good, right? 
Maybe, it depends on how close she is to school. 
She's closer than school, probably just Yea, 

you told me about that place. 
Right? yes what's 
the benefit of it 
you can take the bus 
yes 
um you've said it 
but where is it it's troublesome it needs that person at the end of August then it can be moved out 
um 
um 
um um my class starts on twenty fifth so 
Shi Jing said it's sure to be no problem if she helps me move but you are off on the week you come over next week probably have to live in there um 
um 
should just live in Shi Jing's place it's 
quite troublesome Then 
unless you see there's something else that's OK in other places, you can also move. 
But now I guess there's nothing, I asked someone today and they told me we have nothing. Um 
I think That's OK I think. 
You think it's OK right? 
Yea it's OK. Yea 
that's OK, anyway he told me. 
How to say the current situation, what's the 
current situation? Yea the current situation, he that is if there's one bedroom efficiency, he thinks I, he thinks I'd rather live in 
that. Then living in that one is also OK, that one, did n't you just say it's three hundred? Three hundred 
is not included in there, there is 
T. T. 
Right, that one, then do you have to enter enter 
from school? That is, just be with that Wu Jing, they are all from AMERICA. 
Then have you, have you been to see it? Just that one? No, 
I have n't seen it, I can call that place tomorrow 
after work. You just go to see it, did n't you see it together when Wu Jing 
was there? Right, but I have to call her and make an appointment. Um, 
just make an appointment, we'll go take a look together when 
the time comes. Yea, and then, that I heard that it will be together with me on Wednesday morning when I have time, because I have an appointment with Wu Ding's wife at this time. OK, you can 
see, those two 
anyway I think they might be OK. Yea, no big problem. If 
you really, that is, if it's 
not convenient, oh, really, I would have known, I've already bought the ticket. 
I can ask you to come over and stay at my place, and go back 
when the time comes. I've already bought two tickets today. 
Which two did you buy? 
I, 
one is 
Ah. 
One was for the Christmas. Oh 
you still haven't bought the first of September right? 
No the first of September I still haven't bought it yet. 
The first of September I 
still haven't bought it. I 
mainly today today later I went to pay paid a lot of rent. 

I already spent a lot of money today. Do 
you still have money? If you don't have money I can give you. 
You giving me is not low 
either. You keep it. 
Probably you still need money, once you pay money, you pay more money in the beginning. 
When you first pay for SELL DOWN, you still do n't know what rules are there. If you pay more money, if you are still trying to find something, that money is almost the same. What is it? What is 
it, 
what do you want to pay? 
If you pay more money in the beginning. You 
have to pay, you mean that place in Wuding? Right, 
do n't know how you pay, here I pay more, that is You pay, 
you pay three months? Right. You 

pay three months, is it only five, five or six hundred? 
Ninety to three hundred, something like five or six hundred. 
How do you pay so much? Weren't you supposed to pay more than one hundred yuan? 
Right, but that, that guy has n't moved yet, which means he'll give it to me in the future, but he has n't moved yet. 
Who? 
Li Ling, she moved in in September. 
Oh, oh, oh. 
%pw, it does n't matter, for the time being, 
there are many of these things, 
It's also a credit card, so it wo n't be for the time being. 
Oh. 
I, I, I, I definitely have enough money, I, I definitely have enough money if I do n't have to buy a car. You'd 
better first 
%pw, Stay 
here, find a bank, and then give you, and then double the amount of emergency needs, you might need money somewhere, you know, 
because you just arrived here, after 
all, 
I'm here. Um. And 
then it's easier. That 
is. Then in this case I'll If it's like that, I'll just abandon Wang Yirong and do it alone. Um, 
then you, if those two, anyway you just look inside those two and see if it's suitable, then you can live here. 
I think it's expensive, but if Shi Jing thinks it's okay to live in that place, then you can live in that place. See 
when the lease can be signed, do you know? 
It depends on your lease, do you have to sign it at 
the end of August if 
you want to 
do it? See if there are any leases that you can sign at the end of May or whatever. 
That 
kind of time. Oh. Oh, I'm telling you, it's best not to sign it at this time. 
Why? Because that, 
because the housing price of that time didn't start at the Olympic Games, it's probably probably going to grow even more. 
So I rather hope that if I have to sign it, it's 
best to sign it a little later. When 
is the Olympic Games? 
The Olympic Games is in July and August. 
Oh. 
Then you can sign it in September. 
If you want to move out what do you do with that house 
Then you can find a way to SUBLETE it, according to you since the Olympic Games are 
close by then the house will be rentable. You just blow out 
a pile of stuff, the price will 
be rentable. Really, the time is to 
say, 
one house one house rentable, at least it's not a problem. Definitely not a 
problem, the Olympic Games 
are definitely. That's fine, that can be said to be a little late now. 
Originally the lease is signed by the end of August, it's all like this, signed a year 
ago. Right, so Wu Ding said that that person moved out at the end of August, so he needs to find another person to SHARE with him. 
I'm just afraid that you think it's inappropriate. Why do 
I think it's inappropriate? 
I think you'll live in Shijing for a long time, right? Because by the time 
if you want 
to You're not, then if you want to go over, 
that is to say That is to 
say four people SHARE a BUS. Do you think it's convenient? 
I won't stay there for too long if I go over. For example if I go over on Christmas, 
think about it. 
and I I I eh do you think I need to tell him in advance 
we can go 
we can go to Florida to play 
I know no what I mean 
is do I need to tell him in advance 
this is not necessary 
that is to say to say I have friends that is to say maybe I need to stay there in 
time see how come there's this you don't have to think about that it doesn't matter you don't have to mention this to him this is normal 
I went there and stayed there 
that is to say it's normal this is no 
problem but but for example I need to when do I 
need to go You tell him that you want to come with my friend or alike, this is your, uh, private problem, 
he wo n't, he wo n't care. Oh. You 
know, 
you do n't have to tell him this, this, this thing, it does 
n't matter. So if, when I have to go soon, for example, You, 
you moved in, and then I'm going to go tomorrow, you tell him, you say that my friend is coming tomorrow, he has to 
stay for a while or alike, then you say that, and that's it. 
Because you already rented that house. 
Oh. 
You know? And 
then, 
you asked me to stay there they don't care 
um 
of course we need to talk about a little bit 
but anyway anyway you 
anyway you think it doesn't matter at all then you 
think this is not a long time because 
I mean we probably will go out to play for a day and a half and then we go out to have a walk 
it passes pretty quickly not 
too much 
that's okay 
okay 
um don't worry you see how is his anyway two chickens um 
huh 
Comparise it. Um 
um. Um 
anyway for EFISC of course I think it's a bit more expensive, if you see if that is OK you can live there. Um. 
But 
if that's the case I just 
What do 
I do with the week I just started 
learning? 
Um these few days. 
I ca n't just not 
go to class. That how many days 
is that? Six days, plus this middle school is 
definitely There are Saturdays and Saturdays apart. 
That 
It 
does n't matter, those few days there are no classes, did you start classes on August twenty? Right. 

August twenty fifth August thirty first August thirty first is Monday 
I think. Then your August twenty fifth, er August 
thirty. Twenty ninth August twenty fifth is a 
Monday? 
Five six seven eight nine 
Eleven. 
Two three four five four days, that's a few days off. Then then I'm here to ask you a question, I live in 
this place, it's very far away from Emory. Just bother Shi Jing, bother you two days. If you get into trouble and get 
into trouble until the twenty-fifth, 
then you, then what are 
you going to do? Um. Um. Just a few days. If it really does n't work, um. Anyway, if that 
person, anyway, 
if that person posts a post on the Android network, maybe it will 
still, still will, That is to say, it will still have some news, little by little. 
Um. That is fine, you can see again. Maybe. 
You 
can pick one yourself and see how it 
is. OK. 
My flight is on Thursday. 
At night it seems, it seems that I will arrive in Atlanta at eight o'clock at night. Wait 
until I, 
I mean, I do n't have a flight now, 
I remember I arrived in Atlanta at night on 
August 15. 
Yea. 
Do you want me to pick you up 
or 
I think 
No, no, I wo n't pick you up, let Shi Jin pick you up. 
That's fine too, it does n't 
matter. Because if you, if he picks me up and picks you up, I still have to go to Zhengding, 
I have to go to half a 
class. How come if he picks you 
up and oh, you mean he's on the shift? Yea, 
yea, yea. It 
does n't matter, it's fine, no problem. 
Otherwise 
%null no problem if it's really not ok you can give me the address I can go there myself 
go pick you up and then take you to my place 
you I I I I I tell you this this system 
of Yafanda is n't as good as you thought it was huh 
what do you mean the export ticket is 
not included of course the export ticket is 
included but how 
expensive is it that's it thirty yuan you're really being generous now 
no that 
is to say then I see you four dollars four dollars still need to get it back no 
no that one That is 
to say That I And 
that 
is 
to say this is not 
the key problem is that I do n't necessarily have to directly call call D. directly 
from the airport. The end of August SETTLE DOWN is very troubling, that is to say if you end of August 
SETTLE DOWN That is to say 
Um hello, that is to say Your phone or something is being installed or something, that is to say I think that is to 
say A little busy, that is to say his end of August I do n't know if he's going to go to 
go, that is to say when can he You can ask her, that is to say, you can ask her these tomorrow, that is to say, on Wednesday. 
For example, you can ask her if she can move in a few days earlier, or 
You can ask her phone number, or something else, you can ask her all these things. You can ask her, and, that is 
to say, I'm 
talking about Wu Jing's place, that is 
to 
say, she is again, Um. Chinese, you can ask her, that is to say, about 
all these 
things, first. Right. Right? You do n't have to live there now. 
Um. 
Right? You have n't signed a lease with her, or you promised her that you would live there, it does 
n't 
matter. Um. You still have options, you can do it again, anyway, you can see for yourself how 
that is to say 
based on the situation at that time to judge a bit because I'm not 
either that is to say in the future or just 
definitely very familiar with the situation sometimes it's not necessarily that 
I just provide some references 
um 
then you just put these things together 
um 
it doesn't 
matter you can't make any big mistakes 
um 
it won't be that 
then that 
my phone er 
that is to say um 
if it's normal tomorrow then tomorrow should % Uh, 
it should be possible to call. 
If it's abnormal, It's not necessarily. Oh. 
Uh-huh. When 
there's 
a 
problem, I will, I mean, 
do n't worry. Uh-huh. If you have 
n't, 
n't called, do n't worry, because, I mean, I have to go 
back home tomorrow night, 
I can tell 
AT&T, I mean, I have to, take this, What's going on? Transfer 


the phone over. 
I mean, I have 
to do that, 
I do n't 
know if it was twenty four hours in the morning. Ah? 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
you 
can ask me I would do it here 
um 
anyway 
it's okay 
not too bad 
anyway the work today is not bad 
um 
um 
er there's nothing big here 


you just 
hurry up and do your work 
um 
and then 
you are going to school tomorrow right I 
won't go there tomorrow I will go there the day after tomorrow 
I won't go 
um 
how is Shi Jing he how is his arrangement She 
this, tomorrow she That is to say there's still some work at home 
in 
the laboratory. Just Yea, she, that is to say her experiments now, that is she finished talking with the boss on Monday, that is to say 
Is it still OK? More successful or whatnot. 
Yea, that's nothing. Yea. 
That 
is That 
is to say there's nothing, nothing affecting her experiments or whatnot, that is to say. 
Then what is the sound 
exactly? 
Yea. What is the sound 
exactly? 
I I do n't know, maybe it's a call waiting or whatnot, 
do n't blame her, anyway we'll be done in a while. 
Did she call when I called her just now? 
Yea. 
She's calling? Yea, just 
now Zhou Jian was calling him. Oh, 
you tell him, that is You ca n't take 
this phone away. Yea. I do n't have many 

clothes to wear, this You 
wear some clothes. That 
is You just tell him, that is It will be over soon. It wo 
n't be Zhou Jian, if Zhou Jian calls, the phone will ring, I do n't understand what this voice is. 
Is it? 
Yea. 
Maybe it's A 
fax, or 
Anyway let's call again, that 
is It'll be over in about ten minutes, then you, by 
then you 
after you call you put on your clothes and return the phone to you tell him you said just half an hour 
this is too late it's fine 
no I just moved out 
%null 
just came 
back oh oh 
oh I moved out at night 
at night that is 
to say then you can still use that that thing from the language center now 
I am using it now didn't you just hear it 
I know I said how can you use it so late but I just just opened 
just a few minutes ago I hung up the phone for you no one heard 
Oh I I leave the laboratory at five o'clock. 
Oh later I think you're moving tonight, you might be back late, so You might not go to the laboratory. 
I leave the laboratory at five o'clock, at half past five, then I'll 
be back and prepare to move, and things like 
that. 
Then 
Yeah. I'll be at home. 
Does this have to be done for half an hour? 
% Uh 
I think 
Just just just do it, do it for half an hour, it probably is, it involves its information and things like that. 
That you, no I mean your basic things, I mean Just You're still 

waiting for your social security card, and then you haven't done anything else, like the bank or whatever. 
It's not moved. Oh. It's all waiting. 
So 
If I 
do 
n't look for things, that is, if I do n't look for a place to stay, it's very troublesome, 

because all the school titles have that That 
is They all have that address. It 
does n't matter, you can fill in the time and capital first, and then you can change it. It's 

very easy, you just need to update it to the computer and then it's done. 
I do n't know how the network is at your school, it's 
just It can just Some places it's just Once you change it at one place, everything will change from one COMPUTER to another. Then I do n't know. It's 
just this 
thing is quite convenient. 
Because my that watch was found in several OFFICE, that is 
to say I got it. Yea, but the computer in its entire school should be connected 
to the network. Yea, I do n't know how your that SYSTEM is, but that is to say You do n't have to wait for all these things, that is to say 
Then I do n't know. 
You can, I actually when I came I did all the things at the same time. 
Then, then I just,% er, 
of course I first handled a PAN ID, then in this way I just,% er, just 
started doing a lot. Then I 
finally changed it to, 
just changed the ID to, then when I had that 
Social Security Number I changed the ID again. 
Oh, but Shi Jin told me that not all schools require Social Security Number to 
be the same 
as ID 
Number. Really? Yeah, he said they do n't require it this way. 
That is, then you can also handle an ID. 
I'll give Hillary Hicks a call tomorrow, then ask her about a few Office that 
A few Office that phone numbers, then give a call to a 
few 
Office. Yea. That's OK, you ask her. 
Then That is to have a That is to say you only need to have one I. 
D. You have a school I. D. and you can open a bank account. Yea, who said 
that she said you do n't need that, she said it seems that she said even if this office is Atalanta has Has a public office, she said very few people go there by 
themselves. 
No. And 
that is That is to say that That is to say that if I get those bills, he said they can all be let, that is to say Let that school 
send them over to me. Ah, it can, of course it can, it 
can definitely do. That what, that, and that, do n't think about joining C. D. B. 
A. N. G. You ca n't open a account there. 
Of course I do n't know how it is over there, but generally you 
ca n't 
open a 
account in a particularly large bank. 
Then I know, if you say open a account, I'll go to a small place to 
open 
it. % Um. I'll go to a bank card or something. 
You wait until you get the bank card, 
Hai, find whatever place you want, I'll get you two things and send them to you, you just have to fill them in. Yea. 
Anyway, 
it's pretty easy, anyway. 
That's not hard. 
That, 
That is, you, you 
are at home today, that is, after you go out, 
after you go out and finish the work, that is, 
other things, 
have you done anything else? No. No, 
I just helped them during the day, 
And take two UPS PASSWORDS. Oh. 
Now 
they are not at home during the day, only you are at home, right? Yea, 
and then at 
four o'clock, 
Shi Jing is back at four o'clock. 
Ah. 
It's just that last time you called, 
later, You said there's a temple, 
a temple, something 
like that, something 
like that, a place, It's alright. Later I called that person today, I still do n't 
know, that person, that person seems to have no idea what's going on. 
Yea. Did 
they change the letter or what, anyway it's, 
I do n't know. Later, 
Later I called another Chinese, he said there must be a house in that place, and then, and then Shi Jing called 
again. you said close the door at half past five and then we went after we went he just asked you not to open it er said it's too late later and then he said where did you come from 
later that guy Shi Ying said he's from China you think we're probably from the big tower garden 
um 
he asked me to see it 
oh 
it's that kind of wooden floor and no carpet 
oh that's pretty good you 
wait for a while 
there's a floor tank there's a floor tank the floor tank is pretty dirty mainly everything 
is fine there's I'm 
just saying the floor 
um Hard 
hard floor might be better than the 
carpet. For example the carpet 
No, 
recently recently they said there's no good floor tapes. Right, 
I just said there's no good floor tapes. 
Oh, 
he said there's no good floor tapes. 
Right. The 
carpet is dirty, you have to do it all the time, if you do 
n't do it, the carpet is dirty, and there are various things there. Really? 
Right, dirt 
is easy to stick, you think about the treetop, things with hair are easy to stick to 
the 
dirt. Yes. The road, anyway, each has its own, 
sigh. But he said you have so many floors, that is, you have to have to have to clean them yourself, but he can buy a vacuum cleaner. 
Right, 
right, 
right. 
How are you? Are you still, still tired today? Every day? 
It's fine. 
Not that tired? How's 
the time difference? The time difference 
is reduced, anyway at night of course I feel sleepy at eleven or two o'clock. However I 
still woke up very early in the morning. 
Oh, you feel sleepy at eleven or two o'clock at night? 
That's great, you've reduced it to about that. 
Yeah. That is 
You do n't feel sleepy at ten o'clock? 
No. Oh 
that's great. 
I usually go to class at eleven o'clock, around eleven and a half o'clock. Oh 
then it's the current time. 
Yeah. 
Right? Oh, 
I called. Yeah. 

I just just just came over. 
I just called my landlord, he's on the line, so I just hung up and called you. 
I have to talk to him. Just 
Oh. About 

the keys and other things. Yeah 
yeah yeah. But 
yeah, anyway it's still a bit messy now, recently. 
Are n't there three of you now, sharing an 
apartment? In the future, 
yeah, there will be three people in the future. 
How many BUSINESSROOM? 
There are two. 
Chinese people really take him to heart. 
um 
I used to have only one BEDROOM 
oh then 
for you the standard of living has n't it has n't decreased but increased huh 
it has n't increased anyway that house is probably a little bigger than 
the current one bigger is more money bigger 
then um 
ha this 
one renting a house huh how much 
rent 
how much is it right 
um 
anyway 
um ah 
to put it simply It's OK 
if you can can get there, not If 
you rent a house, rent it very well, and do n't stay at home, 
why bother 
to 
come? Um. That is to say, places for activities. Like 
our previous house, it has a piano, and then the living room is pretty big. You do 
n't have a party, what's the use? Right? So 
it's still a 
little easier. A little easier. Ah, 
my that 
tamp, tamp is that place, it's tiny again. A little more practical. It's 

also a pool. 
Yeah. 
Or what play 
area. Then that place. 
Yea. 
Yea, they are all pretty good, there's also a balcony. Yea. It's 
called 
a patio. Yea. 
Oh. 
OK, 
then you these two days, that is to say, keep working hard, I think you this is very 
Yea, you still have to keep looking. Yea, 
I think this is probably not too hard for you, perhaps 
You have these choices today, and perhaps you have better choices tomorrow. 
don't know anyway Shi Jun and I thought that every day it's first a peak 
and then a low-rise 
peak 
low-rise 
we yesterday thought it's a peak 
how do you know there are so many APARTMENTS there's none anywhere so today I 
kept on making phone calls 
low-rise 
next time I come back I think it's really a low-rise it's 
going to be a peak in 
a couple of days and then Shi Jun said that that APARTMENT said it's rented out 
and then that what 
um that American old lady was also taken out 
to the temple that Wu Jing 
said that she won't move anymore so 
you just 
yes 
but these I think maybe are a bit more realistic a bit ordinary 
I had a hunch that what I said before wouldn't work this I still have a hunch 
that this would work in most cases 
I think there would be a star in most cases 
so now you seem to be getting better and better 
read more books when you are free and then that keep 
reading 
well that's fine take a good look I think 
I need to practice my experience 
um 
I do n't understand what the southern students said oh then just 

practice 
really 
um practice that 
I have met two southern students and have never understood one oh everyone 
who 
says it does n't understand oh it does n't matter 

some of them are more eloquent and also 
that's the same 
you will understand it better in the future after you have 
the class you know %null 





what's going on 
ah he said that recording for a while 
oh 
done nothing 
ah listen he 
just recorded it yes this 
the 
talks we 
had been recorded and then they did some research what did they talk 
about 
%null really 
yes don't be afraid but it's fine Lao Bai and them are doing research %null %null what 
is this Fului's phone right 

Really? 
Just let us talk about it, let us talk about it, let us talk about it in the bed. Oh, 
you, that, that person of yours came, that, I anyway gave him the medicine, he gave me two hundred yuan, I also. 
Hey, 
did he check, did he give you a check? 
I did n't, I wanted his cash. He said do you want a check? I said cash, cash is the best, he said he wanted to go back and get it for me, he said he did n't bring the money to check. 
Oh. 
Then I said if I had cash, you could give me cash. 
Oh. 
Ah, he gave it to me, I said that 
What kind of person does she look like?% 
uh, she looks pretty good, a pretty fat woman. 
How old is she? 
Not big, around twenty, twenty. 
Oh, a kid? Ugh, 
not very, not very old, she's still studying. Ugh, 
then how come I, oh, how come I hear her talk, 
% uh, like that, ah, like she's pretty old, she said she has a son. Pretty 
old? Is that 
so? Ah? 
She said she has a son. 
Having a son, then having a son going to college is also a lot. Really? 

Then he's only twenty something years old, probably, the age I see is n't very old. 
Really, quite nice. It's 
OK. 
Really, you did n't talk to them this time? That 
did n't. 
Oh, I just took him in, he just lived in. Right, 
the person I called was n't there. 
Ah. 
Originally he said he said it's OK to move in, I said OK, I said I called to see if the person was there or not. Oh. Ah. 
He 
said 
he, he said he could go there by himself, I said, OK, he, he went there by himself, by himself, and then he ran into you in the train one time. 
Right. 
OK. 
Ah. 
He just, he just told me, uh, that everything was moved, everything was moved. Right? 
Uh-huh, 
uh-huh. 
Oh. 
Anyway, you, you, did you take all the valuable things from your 
house? No, that's the class. 
Nothing was valuable. Uh-huh, uh-huh, uh-huh. 
Right, nothing was valuable, all were taken to the class and taken to there. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh, uh-huh. 
yeah that's fine go take a picture take a picture for a month then we can talk about it and then go back to take the order 
um 
um um 
um um how is 
it now also don't say it did you hear it 
or not 
hear it the train whistle and the air-conditioning whistle are blowing every day 
um 
it's hot 
blowing the brain is hurting the others is it 
hot there suddenly 
once the car was started the Fulton Fulton was also there it was eighty feet away I wanted to drive back but I turned and left 
um 
um 
um 
Ah 
ah ah. Ugh what is this thing in this place, you ca n't stay here for a minute. 
It's hot. 
I'll get sick when I come back. 
Really? 
Let's see, it's hot, those old people. 
Um. 
You drive behind, 
they'll press the tap for you. 
Press the tap right? Yea, 
you say you get scared when you hear it, you're scared to death. You'll 
be blinded. Forget about it. So you do 
n't have 
this kind of thing in Canada? 
I have, why not, I always let people press it. Today too, there are so many cars at the intersection. Ah. Then 

I thought if I ca n't transfer to the left, I'll transfer to the right. 
Ah. 
He just pressed, pressed me behind, I was so weak, why did you leave so soon, so many cars can n't crash to death there. I'll give 
you a ride. 
Right. 
I'm angry. You're angry, 

you say, 
anyway you, he often press, not like that, that, that ah 
at 
that place over there he just would press it for you when you get to the time 
um 
he would follow you 
from the back he would press 
it 
for you um um he would see you driving and press it for you you say are you going 
or not help help you help to take care of him don't worry about it 
ah right I was not used to it at first at first I was scared by that thing a little bit and then a little bit again um um 
um 
I was like 
eh eh after driving back ah 
it's 
tiring were you tired when you just started training That's 
tiring, you ca n't, you ca n't do that. 
Very nervous you know. 
Yea 
yea. You have to be focused on that place. 
Yea. Yea. Yea. Anyway you ca n't do 
that. Damn I'm afraid of something happening. 
But now I'm bold, damn I keep going to high school. 
OK, that's fine, you can take a few exams and you'll be fine. 
I think there's no problem, I can definitely pass the first one, I think I ca n't wait until the first one, I think I have to go back on the twenty something, I'll go back after the exams. Yea yea. Yea. 

Ah. 

What time does he have 
the exam? I ca n't wait a minute, anyway. I said, oh, then I ca n't go back with you, I can only wait until the tenth, otherwise I ca n't wait until the tenth. 
Ah. It 
ca n't be like that, this, damn, this place is so stuffy, stuffy and hot. 
Really? 
It's a bad weather all day. 
It ca n't rain either. There's 
a little drizzle today. 
Ah, ah. 
Today I originally planned to go to that, drive for one and a half hours, to a park to play. Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh, uh-huh. 
You said you had already spent all your money on it, but you did n't play much there, and later, uh, just like the day we went to that, uh, uh, uh, uh, sports world that day, it was so hot. 
Ah, ah, ah. 
Ah, ah. 
Do you know how bad it was? 
Ah, ah. It's 
back. Oh, by the way, we have some peaches. 
Find a beach. Beach. Oh my 
god. 
Find a beach, because I do n't ask around, and people will say there is a beach then. 
Uh-huh. 
They said the beach has a gambling place, but it does n't have a swimming place. 
Really? 
Yea, just gambling money, I do n't want to gamble, I do n't gamble, we, we all believe in gods, we all believe in gods, we ca n't do that. Yea. 
Yea. 
Yea, yea, 
yea. Yea, yea. They told me that I ca n't, I ca n't gamble, I can n't gamble. 
Oh, I'm lucky, I said that you two are quite good, I'm lucky that I did n't 
follow, I really did n't follow. Yea. Otherwise, 
I 
ca n't, I do n't want to stay here for a day. 
OK, let's talk about it after the exam, after the exam. Ah? Let's 
talk 
about it after the exam. yeah after 
the exam it's no problem to drive back to your home drive back to your home 
and drive to the high tower directly we directly go to the high %null just the two 
of 
us directly go to London go to Toronto to have fun 
%null 
ah when we're back we'll go to Toronto for a trip I think 
I'm too bold to 
go there then we'll go to London for a trip 
you're too bold to say that I'm very 
bold I %null %null hey don't 

you believe I can go to the high 
tower I think of your time %null my head also stood up ah right haven't 
driven 
for 
a long 
long time suddenly drove down I was terrified as long as there's no mental 
preparation I today try to drive at high speed there are two little girls sitting behind me I said I said I have a friend I just asked you this year 
yes 
um 
um 
um 
um 
yes have been driving for half a 
year 
um driving for half a year then could drive on the highway my head stood up do 
you dare to now Now it's 
a little better, just the time you were on the street, I had a trip, that was a lot better. 
Just a short trip is good. 
I tell you, if someone is sitting behind you, you can get better soon. Yea. Yea. 
Yea, 
that's a lot better, then I'm not really scared. Yea. 
Yea? 
Yea. 
Yea. 
I think if someone sits next to me, I also feel a little better. 
Yea, that's right. 
Yea, 
he took me to show you the way. Yea, yea. 
If it's 
finished, right, then tell me how to change the tank or something. 
Right, right. Right, if you yourself want to look at the road, you have that, you're a little nervous. If you do n't look, it's fine if you do n't look at the 
road. Sometimes you ca n't change the tank yourself. 
Right. 
Right. 
If you want to look at the road, our speed is so fast, it's not suitable, you know? The speed is fast, damn it, damn it, I ca n't dare to look at the eyes, they are so ugly. 
Uh-huh, 
uh-huh. Right, right. 
You think it's ugly, you're like this, damn it. Right, 
right. 
Ugh, when I came back, now I'm used to driving a high. Yea. 

When I came back, 
Yea. 
When I, when I got home that night, I did n't sleep all night. 
What? 
When I came back, drove back, it seemed that I was so worried, I 
was so worried, I was so worried. Yea. 

I regretted it, you know? I was worried all night, there were three people in the car, I was so worried. Yea, yea, 
yea. 
I always slept beside them. um 

the kid also sleeps 
ah yes 
just me one person with the eyes open yes 
that's not ok that's right open 
ah there are thousands of people on the side 
oh my god only one way to go 
really ah yes that's that's oh my 
god you don't even know that there are thousands of people on the road nine um all those big three people 

driving are just like that one who takes the plane to support his son um um How does 
your 
ear 
feel? It feels like you are on a plane, my, my, my daughter said it feels like it's not connected to the ear. That 
Ah. 
Really? Right. 
Um, 
um. 
You really have experienced 
it. You have experienced the test. Um. 
Jiaming, Jiaming, Jiaming, bring your mom, do you want to talk to your mom? 
Oh, I miss you. 
No, no, I'm playing here. Ah. Right, I have two friends there to play with. Who 
are you playing with? 
There seem to be so many people in your house. 
Oh, two friends are at your house? 
Yeah. Nothing. There are several kids, Tony they Tony I heard that, that, that, that, that, 
that, that, that, that, that, oh, is n't it, 
Congcong they're there, right? 
Oh, and 
also that And also that, that little girl who is with you, that those girls from that school, and her brother, %null, %null, %null. 
Oh, oh, oh, I heard their voice. OK, 
you are doing quite well over there. 
Oh, it seems, I feel, 
How does it feel? 
Do you miss me? 
Just pass by, I miss you, I miss you, I do n't have your phone either. That's 
right, damn 
it. Oh, she did n't even have my phone, she did have my phone, I said that, she did have it. 
She has 
it? 
Yes. It's OK, you do n't have to call, if you have nothing to do just call me. 
Next time, just that what the two thousand things. Uh-huh. This time 

when you go back, let's go to Toronto to have 
fun 
again. OK. Let's change the time, I'll talk first. 
You and Xiaobao, uh, 
going there once every two weeks 
is fine, the 
time is slightly lower. 
Where 
to go, go to Toronto? Oh. Ha, that's not necessary. It's n't very cheap 
actually, Toronto. That's not necessary. 
It's not cheap at all. 
Because that, you have to find a place to park. Right, 
right. 
Yea, it's difficult to get 
a cab. 
Yea, 
eh. Yea. You can go if you have money, it costs you 
more than ten dollars. Yea, it's not easy to get in. 
Hey, you said this is 
open. You can buy some from that place in the west, there's none there. It's OK to go there. 
Yea. 
Is it about ten dollars for an hour in the high 
train? Yea, about that, yea. 
No? About 
that. About 
that right? Yea, yea. Yea, 

I think so too, it's pretty much the same, because it's open at a high speed. Open once every 
one or two months, or go there once. It's OK, just buy some things that do n't have here. Yea. Those over there 
all 
have them, it's pretty much the same if you have money. Yea, you do n't have much to buy. 
How much money do you have 
now? How much is fifty? Fifty one, it's over 
fifty one today. Oh, it's even cheaper. It's 
OK. You do 
n't have money to spend there? Yea. We have one more 
than 
one dollar here. One 
dollar one dollar. Yea, whoever wants to see, of course it's 
almost 
the same as Canada, I'm just saying if you go 
there for one day. Yea. It's 
a little like I went 
there for one day, I came and went, it's really ten dollars, it's pretty much the same. Yea. Yea. Yea. What do you want 
to 
buy? I wo n't, wo n't, anyway, hey, the less things there are the better.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% 
ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% 
ha.% 
ha.% ha.% ha.% 
ha.% 
ha.% 
ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% 
ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% 
ha.% ha.% 
ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% 
ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% 
ha.% 
ha.% ha.% 
ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% 
ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% 
ha.% 
ha.% ha.% ha.% ha.% It's nothing. He said it was n't my mistake. 
It was that person, that Super Nintendo, he did n't understand English. 
Oh. 
As a result he filled in the form, he did n't fill in a few words. 
Oh. 
He just asked me to go and see, and ask him to fill in words or something. He was confused, he was also asked. 
Oh. 
I said Super Nintendo did n't understand English? 
Yea, he looked for that person, did n't understand English. I said this, you said, you said how to make him do it, I said. 
Oh my god. 
Really? 
Oh. 
Then I paid, and she said I did n't pay, you said this, I said then you should send it, I said. 
Oh my god. 
I said then I just took the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, 
the, 
the, 
the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, 
the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, 
the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, 
the, 
the, the, the, the, the, the, 
the, 
the, the, the, the, 
the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, 
the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, the, No idea. The original, 
the original 
person, he 
currently found a, probably a four time job. Oh. And then he just, just did n't do it. Oh. And then 
he just, 
he that No way, our buddies would just do it for 
him. Ha ha. Right, the people in his place, who knows how I got into this family, maybe I lived here for a long time. Oh, right. Maybe 
he Maybe I just used his place when I lived for a long time. Right, right. Hey, how is that house? Is it small? Yea, anyway we'll see after living here. It's small right? 
Then 
move in? 
There's a place to move, yea. Then 
what time will they move? 
I do n't know, I think that person will probably go out on the twenty fifth. 
Yea. 
I think they might move the whole day. You do 
n't want him to clean up for you? 
Him? 
Yea. 
Also no 
You do n't want him to give you a powder brush? Anyway 
the room is pretty clean, she said if it's clean she wo n't do the cleaning, the kitchen, the kitchen I think moving in and letting her change the paper is fine. 
Oh. 
Because I want to rent a car with that person. 
Oh. 
Then then then Then no, 
then no wait for me to go back and help you move. 
Then can't I save some money? 
Then I think I'll go back and help you move. 
OK, OK, do n't worry, you just just need to take your car for the exam. Um. You just need to take the exam on the twentieth. 
Take my car for the exam. 
Now 
I, he has tested for the exam for 
bachelor's 
degree, Right? Yes. After that I will go to that master's. Yes, yes. 
Um, 
for bachelor's degree, after I have tested for 
it, he now is, I am waiting for his formal, that driver, that is formal permit to come. Yes, yes. I will get a 
temporary 
permit to drive it first. Ah ah ah. 

I can only make an appointment after I'm officially here, then I'll be here next week. 
Ah ah, you can only make an appointment.% 
Er 
Make an appointment. 
Ah 
ah ah. Then you can make an appointment within one week. Ah 
ah ah. 
That's it, then now you have to make it three weeks. Ah 
ah. 
Two and a half weeks or go back. 
Ah ah. 
I do n't know what two and a half weeks is. 
OK, you anyway, he is taking your exam, what is your school number? 
I, what 
is my number? Nine I start 

school on the tenth 
or so. Uh huh, start school on the tenth 
or so. You can start school on that, uh, that eleventh 
of August. Oh, then you do n't have to worry. 
No, I just think, uh, do n't have to worry, I'm 
too worried about this. Every day, that, every day I'm just at that, 
Uh-huh. 
Staying in the refrigerator, it's the same. As soon as there's a hot 
train coming out, it will just come in with you. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh, uh-huh. 
You say, how come you ca n't go, besides you ca n't go out to play, kid. I said, 
yesterday I really did n't get sick. Uh-huh. She 
would 
be restrained when she came back, this year she seemed to rush, rushed out to play. Uh-huh, uh-huh. She said she had classes everyday, and was not 
at 
home if she had something to do. Uh-huh, uh-huh. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh. Oh. Me? 
She has to babysit for two days. 
What did you do these two days, these two days? 
Ah? 
I watched, anyway I borrowed a tap, now I watch the videos at home. 
Watch the videos, you see you have nothing to do now. Right. 

Oh, did you book the time to go to school? 
About the same. Ah, do 
n't have to worry about him. 
August twenty, registered on August twenty-nine. Oh. 

After registration, after registration it will be fine. It will be 
fine again? 
After registration what else, just wait until class starts, classes start on September fifth. 
Oh, Jiansen cried, what happened, Jiansen, who? The kids, the 
two kids I talked to, the 
two kids, they all think, think about that. 
Oh, you guys are cooking? No, 
eating, they. They 
are eating, then hurry up and get to work. 
I finished eating, nothing else, I finished eating. Yes. 
Oh. 
What else can you think about? No, no, no. No 
return. 
Oh, did you move away with your son? I moved away. 
Oh, oh 
my god, your two are even wider. 
Ah, right, so I just came to play, and then 
I just came to visit. I was pissed, that day, that day you said what did he say? 
Oh, did he pay you? Ah. They 

said to give me one hundred and fifty. I said that is not ok. I said the two of you living here, I said I Ugh, 
it's not paid. Right. 
Ugh, 
what did he say? 
He just, no, that, that, he, I bought him that, what, that, that, I bought him that rice cooker and that, what, all of them. I bought them all. 
Weibo, did 
you buy Weibo? You bought 
them all? 
Right, I bought them. I have n't given him any money all the time, so I told him I wanted them. I 
wanted it, and then she, she never gave me money, I was so worried, I went to get it with her sister that morning. 
Ah. 
Her sister said her sister would give it 
to 
her. Ah. Later at the evening, what time was it, she said she was leaving tomorrow or something. Ah. Ah, 

I said, oh, let's talk a bit. Right. 

And then she said, well, you want these two things for one hundred and thirty, can I get one hundred and fifty for you this month? I, I thought she, that is. Oh, I 
thought. If I do 
n't want this one hundred and thirty, then give me another one hundred and fifty, then I'll say OK, anyway, I'll give you twenty bucks less. 
Right. 
As a result, they gave me, gave me twenty bucks. 
Ah. 
Then I said, no, I said, I said, you two live here, I said, and I did n't ask for much money from you too, usually. 
Right. 
Right. 
Right. He said OK, then he went to get the money for me. I then also pushed him in. 
I said, I, ah, I said, usually I, you see, you two live here, who else would ask you to live for thirty thousand bucks? 
Really? 
Yea. 
Yea. 
Still so um what I said 
Yea. 
I said no. If it wo n't work later anyway he said I'll give it to me at the end. I said just give it to me anyway. Really? Yea. 


Oh. 
Oh he bought all those things? Yea 
I just bought those two. Otherwise anyway, like this, come over to someone. 
Who did he sell the bed to? That bed? 
The bed is the one downstairs, that, that, the guy he died first. 
Really? He still wants him? He 
said he did n't want it, did n't want it, and then he went to their house to tell him. Ah. He said 

later he said fifty yuan, he bought it. 
Did you see the stuff under the bed? 
It that has a very low bed, bed frame, that is the wooden one. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
There's nothing behind the bed, that back. No, just 
no, no that bed head or something. Nothing, just fifty yuan, he Ah, 
he was stealing. Too 
expensive. Who knows 
if he 
was, anyway, he was quite good to that person. 
Ah? 
He was quite good to that person. Later, yes, that woman later called, she said she was coming to get a bed, I said how come her bed was not pulled away. 
Just with that, 
ah. 
Later she said who did she give it to, she said she called the next day, she said she bought that bed. Who knows. 
Oh. 
Oh, how much money did you sell on the e-book? How much? E-book. Sixty five? 
How 
did you get an 
e-book with 
sixty five? 
I, anyway, I think it's OK. 
Really? That one also has sixty five, and the Weibo one also has sixty five. Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
Anyway, I think I'll just buy one. That one, I think, they all said it's OK. They said it's over one hundred. I think. 
Really? 
What about Weibo? Over one 
hundred and thirty for a microwave oven, that's right, then I saw an advertisement that day, it was with that one, one brand, it was over one hundred and thirty 
when 
it was on sale. Ah, oh, that's fine then. 
Then it's just half price. Um, anyway, buy one, it's also the same as having hot meals often, I said I did n't have time when I went to school, I wanted to use the pot to heat it up. 
That's fine, that's fine, yes. 
Right, 
right, right, right, yes, I, I came back to America this time, the price was very expensive. Is that 
so? 
Right, I also want to buy a computer, computer 
I 
I think that three 
eight six has long been out of date, this brand. 
Right, right. 
Hasn't been used, right? 
Ah. 
It's still four or five hundred. 
Four or five hundred is about the same, I have to say. 
Four or five hundred dollars. 
Yeah. Over here, I do n't know. Four or five hundred. 
Then the problem is three eight 
six. 
Yeah. Then if it's over there, if it's 
two four eight six, then 
it's still four or five hundred in Canada. Really? No way. 
No, no way. Then when my friend left, last year he 
Ah? 
No way? Ah? He 

left last November, his three eight six was over eight hundred. 
Oh, I 
see. Yes. Then it wo n't be that cheap, it wo n't be that cheap 
as four eight six. Oh, 
no way. Three eight six is n't much use, three eight, your three eight six Right. Then Mario 
anyway the most basic one is OK. OK, 
the topic is OK. 
Right, right, the most basic one is OK. The main thing is you have to, that is to say, save some things there. You can ask your family to give you some work perfects. No, 
right. Right. The ones you normally 

use, like lotteries 
or something. Really? What else is there? Generally 
just these two, what else is there? 
There are also Anyway generally use WordProfit a little more, in the future just see what major you learn, if you want to learn that 
Accounting, it has a lot of accounting software. You can ask it, see if it has it, it will give you a copy. Right. Right. Oh 
your 
that 
copy, you have to buy all the tapes yourself, those tapes. 
Ugh, there are some in her school, so you just copy one copy from the school. You can afford to buy it yourself. It's quite expensive. 
You do n't buy it yourself? I, 
anyway, was all copied by others. 
Oh. 
OK. 
I, uh, also, %pw, 
Have you eaten? 
I have n't told you, I just came back from that picnic. Oh, just came back 
from that picnic. Uh-huh. Ah, tired enough, alas. Um. 



After coming back, I really think that they are really nice people here. Really. 

Compared to Canada, alas, the trip and activities we 
have here, alas. Um. You said trip and activities. 
I'm telling you, you're all moved, your heart is all moved, your heart. 
Really? You mean trip and activities are good, right? People trip and activities are good. 
Ah? 
People trip and activities are this, 
uh, quite nice, no. Um. Um. 

Those activities, organizing these people's activities. Right. 

I said that we went trip and activities 
once, how much money did we have to pay each person, that 
How much money did you pay for the car ride last time? 
Did you pay? Seven dollars? 
Seven dollars, last time I paid, how could I not pay? Ah, no. Ah, 
not this money, just that, that that that guy on the birthday that day. 
Oh, did n't pay. 
Did n't pay. 
Ah. 
Seven dollars, he said. 
Really? Then hurry up and pay when you go back. 
Let's see, anyway, let's see when I'm back, I, I have n't paid yet. 
Then go back and 
wait. 
Right? 
Yes. 
Aye. 
Yes. In this area they have a lot of benefits, all are, are n't we saying that the benefits are good, we are not looking 
at 
the 
benefits here. Uh-huh, uh-huh, uh-huh. Uh-huh. It's all those people, really, they are all very honest. Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh, uh-huh. Ugh, I was asking you, that, are there any welfare organizations in the United States? 
Support these charity activities. 
Ugh, 
I am really moved, 
I just have 
to. There are. Just like that, if there are difficulties, where can you find people to donate money? That, 
that 
%null 
I do n't know 
donate money there do 
n't donate money I'm not tired 
I just have that friend he well what his mom probably people are about to let him leave the hospital he leaves the hospital he wants to send him back to China 
who donates money he is 
not ah ah 
he 
himself 
he said he can do it how can he do it send send back to China he said anyway at least thirty thousand yuan you say 
ah 
Ugh, why? 
Ah? 
Why? 
Then he has to specifically, That is if it's a specialized machine it has to be six thousand, six thousand. 
Why is it a specialized machine? 
Then he has to have a special agent. If it's n't a specialized machine, then just an ordinary customer. Ah. 
Then 
you have to find a special agent 
at 
least. Oh. Really, he has to at least at least thirty thousand dollars, he said he did n't have the money. 
Really? 
He's, why does he want to give it back, this medical condition is so good. Ugh, really 
really really. She does n't have that, she herself, she does n't have 
anything she can do. You do n't know, you do n't know when she wakes up, she's dragging it out for one year or two 
years. 
Then what? You're a botanical doctor. 
This disease is n't a common disease, it's ok if she wakes up, she does n't wake up. Does 
she wake up? No, 
she's still like that. 
She's like a botanical 
doctor. 
Ah. I tell 
you. Ah. 
Hey, then I can call you, call you, because we 
have a friend here, I know a friend, I do n't know him, 
um. 
I met a boy through a friend. Um. Um, um. This 
boy, 
he has to, has to 
work illegally, he has no, his wife, right? 
Um. 
Has that F. visa, that is, that, 
Going to school, has the scholarship, this boy belongs to the trial, like us, the trial. Ah, ah, ah. Ah, ah. Does n't 
this 
mean 
there is no identity, but he went to work 
as 
a man. Uh-huh, uh-huh. One time he worked on an elevator. 
He had an elevator that carried goods, unlike our that that that elevator with doors, that elevator did n't have doors, it was all filled with goods. 

Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh. He fell from that elevator to the bottom, and to the bottom 
and died. Falled? 
Right. 
He did n't die, just like the kind you said, he became a plant. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh, uh-huh. 
His brain, bones, all all all were that kind of open-air missile, but he did n't die. 
Uh-huh. 
And he was also tired, he was 
tired. 
Uh-huh. Hey, but what opportunities did he get, they wo n't let him keep it. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh. 
But I do n't know if his mom can. 
He, anyway, did n't ask for money from her, I think maybe. 
Hey, she did n't ask for it, why? That's for sure, 
she knows she ca n't afford it. Anyway, 
she just gave him, that is, she helped him apply for something, but she said she did n't know if she could come down and cover it. 
Right, right, right. 
Oh. 
However, anyway, they have n't, have n't asked him for money. They know they are poor, they ca n't afford it, they have to pay a few thousand dollars a day. Right? 

How long has it been? Over a month? Right. Then 
I'll 
tell 
you, I'm telling you, Xiao Wang, listen to me, 
you do n't have to worry 

at all. Um. So you tell me, you say, how can you pay money, the United States is like this. 
Um. 
You are sick, ha? You 
say this, this, this, and you have to pay money. Um. But if you really 
have the 
disease, you can go in and see a doctor. After 
you go in, he will see you trying to find someone. He wo n't ask for money from you or something. 
Um, um. Um. Then he is, he is worried. 
I told you before. You 
do n't have to worry. He 
has a 
lot of procedures. Um. Um, 

he will just leave you on the road one day, something like that. 
Um, um. 
Right. 
Then he will tell you about the special care or something. Right. You 
let 
him go, no problem. 
Definitely. Nothing? No 
problem. Right, you 
just do 
n't worry. 
I know, he said anyway, he said anyway the hospital said to contact the embassy. He said the embassy would definitely not, not care about you. 
So he said that, you see 
I, it's nothing. If you do n't 
care, you just um, do n't let him get infected, just do n't care. Yeah. Right, nothing at 
all. 
You see that I, at that 
time I said that they were all looking for mercy, mercy organizations, just Yeah. 
charity 
organizations. They all care. 
They 

wo n't say, ah, look at your disease, they'll just leave you on the road, they wo n't care, they'll just go in and ask for money from you. Uh-huh. No, there is 
nothing 
like that. There 
is n't any 
medicine either, there is nothing like that. Then 
she, right, so she just, did she cover all of this? Uh-huh. 
She 
covered all of your rent and tuition fees right? 
I think it should be, anyway she herself does n't have money. Anyway. 

Right, right, covered all of it, eh doesn't she have a job now? She 
has a job, you say she earned several thousands of dollars a year. 
She is living in Chi. She said that place is also very expensive, Changdao, Is a place where rich people live. 
Right. 
Right. 
The living expenses are extremely expensive, she said. 
Right, right, living expenses are really expensive. 
So what does her husband do? She 
is She is a, you know, in charge of transportation, it seems. Right. Generally 
Working 
in a company 
Working in a company, right? 
Then she can donate money, if she can donate money, how much money can she donate, what can she do? Um. Now 
there 
are a lot of things to donate, some of them are not true, you know? 
Uh-huh, uh-huh. 
Some people donate money, now my neighbor is n't 
he a, Uh-huh, a 
Christian? Anyway, Every day someone calls him and says he's donating money, he even donated a lot of gold to him, it's annoying. Uh-huh. Uh-huh, 
uh-huh. 
Which is real, which is fake? 
He said he did n't know what this person wanted to do. 
Right, so you do n't have to point out what to donate money, this, this, that. 
Uh-huh, 
uh-huh. Uh-huh, uh-huh. 
It's nothing you 
mean, you just let him rely on 
you. If you do n't teach her, she has no other way. Right, no other way at all. 
She, she will find a way in the 
hospital, you just say, 
Um. 
There is no way to get her to the hospital, I want to ask your mother to go abroad or something, to go back to China. 
Um. 
She, she will, she will find a way for you. 
You say, right? Ugh, 
she has no choice anyway. 
OK. 
Right. We 
can be friends, but we ca n't be friends 
in the shop, we ca n't go to that 
place. So I came back this time, I really have to. 
I just went out with my roommate, I saw, I compared, Right, the people in 
our Waterloo are also very, but once they come back, ha, I really think, 
It's different, ha. Um, um. So I'm here, I'm also a little sad and cold, Changchun is also, Aye, it's 
n't the same at all. 
It's very, very dead here. Right, Changchun 
is also not very, is n't very willing to participate in that kind 
of activity. Oh, that group 
activity that is very dead, Now some people say that you're not coming, you're not coming 
to our place, you're not going, they all go together. 
Um, 
um. Very 
lively. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh. All 
damn 
it. Today, Going to that Peking, going everyday there's that group, that group meeting every week. Uh-huh, uh-huh. 
All 
six people, almost two or three hundred people, all like that. 
Uh-huh, 
uh-huh, uh-huh. Everyone together, the school is very lively, the people here are all, Uh-huh. 
Oh 
gosh, there's, there's the Taiyue Energy, you see, 
there's singing and 
singing. Uh-huh, uh-huh, 
uh-huh. There's that, uh, uh, reading, reading Bible to everyone. 
Uh-huh, 
uh-huh. Oh gosh, that people are very, very perfect, and that, 
Then I think it seems that it is in the intersection, just go there and it seems that 
There are n't many things to talk about, they seem to be talking about each other, like that. 
I do n't know about our business, um, that, mainly 
we do n't have anyone to talk to, you know. 
Right, right. 
You just rely on those students, they are them, they can have so much ability. Right. 
Right, right. 
You see these people have all 
been in the United States for many years. Um. 
After 
it's over, then the economic conditions allow them to. 
Better, um. You're 
right. 
Uh-huh. 
And they organized everyone together, everyone was together and then 
together. 
Uh-huh. Oh gosh, 
it 
was particularly pleasant. Uh-huh, 
uh-huh. Uh-huh. I felt particularly good. That is, I really saw a person with you 
today. Uh-huh. Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. Uh-huh. A 
kid, called, 
called Really? 
Oh, I came back and I was still thinking. That's that. 
That is, I will ask about it tomorrow. But this kid has no, no formal occupation. 
Uh-huh. 
That is, but this person is really good. 
Uh-huh. 
You really have a good look. 
What? 
A good person. Ah. Right. Also 


a good person. But just a 
normal job. Just a normal job. 
Normal job, what job, 
are you in school, over there? 
I did n't go to school the time. 
I did n't go to school now, just the average in the American company, the average is right. In a year's salary it's only two or three hundred thousand. 
Oh. 
Right. 
He's the youngest, but for many years he did n't have 
that. 
Damn, he's tall, one meter, he can be as big as one 
meter 
and seventy-eight centimeters. Then he said, I think it's fine, I said, he suddenly, he's doing this with her today. 
I 
think of her all night. Be careful 
with Sun, she did n't have any friends for many years, she was all 
alone. 
I talked with her, what is she doing now? Oh, she said, she's too busy, she has no company, no time to think, she said, There 
are fewer American women, you 
know. She's going back to China, she said she ca n't be so busy. 
Oh, let's talk about it in private. She 
said, I'll go to China, I'll think about it. 
Oh my god I said that, I think it's OK to say it's that far away, I said is he going to Canada 
or to Chicago I still haven't thought about it, because next week we have a group letter, I'll ask him again. 
Yeah. 
Hey, there are so many people, you know? This, the face is so wide, you know? 
Yeah. 
Yeah. 
Everyone speaks Mandarin. 
We damn it, on that bus, everyone speaks Mandarin, when we bow our heads, no one can talk to us. 
Right, everyone just does n't say anything. Just 
calmly, quietly, they all close their sides, those few people on the group trip in Mandarin, they ca n't be seen if they bow their heads, they ca n't be seen if they raise their heads, that's the only thing. Yeah. 
%null 
You see 
you're this is what you call it, it's vast. Uh-huh, 
uh-huh. 
It's really hot together, you know, you know this thing, you know the whole thing. 
Uh-huh. 
Really really good. 
So you see, like us, when we went to Canada for our immigration, today we took all those takes. Uh-huh, uh-huh. 
All all 
are amazing, everyone, you tell me, I'll tell you, you know, I know the information, you know? 
Everyone is sending information, because together we're all like that. Uh-huh. Right, right. 


So, like me, everyone would ask me, what's going on, what's going on. Yea, yea, yea. 

Now there are a few who will all go to the interview next month. 
Oh, if they go, we'll really grow free. That's 
definitely a very good organization. 
Yea. 
Oh, I, I just told them, I said I was in Waterloo. 
I was in Canada, I really missed you, I said 
They said it's real, I said you see you all try to think about it, I really think n't I, because I compared our test activities there. 
Um um um um um. 
He said, Hu Shini can you organize it? 
I said this person of mine, whether he believes it or not, do you know? It's not that he has a bright 
future. Um 
um um um. You say I have a bright future, 
I just I now have a bright future, if I work with you I have a bright future, I believe it, if I work with other people I seem to be confused. Um 
um 
um. Um. Right, you see, if I said it last time, you still keep saying they um, really are like this, you just 
It seems that I advised you to write, and after you finished writing, no one will take you in. That's it. Before you write, always come to your house. 
Yea, 
really. 
Yea. 
What, see, what, what, it seems that there are also specialized ones that give you, what, study time, just like that. After you finish that, you do 
n't even have to take yourself in. It seems that you have to participate the activities on your own, on your own, it seems. 
Yea. 
Yea. 
And I just, hey, you 
see our car, that car, the wife, ha, how good. Uh-huh. Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh. 
That is that one from Waterloo. 
But he does n't have time to invite everyone over to do things like this with you. He 
is just, oh gosh, anyway. 
He's busy with his 
life. Right, he also has a lot of things to deal with, and then, He also, he is also a Hong Kong person, he probably does n't know much about the Mainlanders, I think. Right. 
You see, here, this, 
You 
know, do n't you contact these people? 
I mean if you have something to do he will help you, but I mean it seems that you ca n't be friends, just like this. 
Right. 
Right, right. 
Just like this. You see this 
thing, after you go back, you invite me 
back, oh, every night, the telephone rings, just like that. 
Really hot, after I come back. 
OK, then you should stay longer, you still want to come back. 
No, staying here is too hot. Usually you 
go to work, you go to work during the day, then you have to talk to me. 
Ah. 
Ah, 
ah, ah. Uh-huh, uh-huh. Then just on the weekend at night. Uh-huh, uh-huh. 
Right. 

During the day she stays at home. 
Oh, I'll go there, oh, ok. We'll see. Uh-huh. Ok, you can 

get back to your work. 
Ok, nothing. Ah. 
Oh, by 
the way, that, I, that, you did n't go downstairs, you can go and have a look. 
How can I go, you say, what should I go and see? I'll make a phone 
call. 
Oh, you do n't have to see this. 
Right, then forget it. 
It's not uncomfortable, anyway listen to it, it's about the same, anyway you watch TV, watch a what, a tv show or 
something, oh 
you ca n't understand most of it, but Um 
Anyway, 
there are some that you ca n't understand. Um Oh However, ha Does 
n't 
this work again? Ah. No 

no no HALF is done, just agreed. Right. Before that 

half an hour is over, he will give you 
He will tell you, right right right. 
Right. 
Ah, wait a minute, I'll talk to you later. Oh, 
exactly. Hey, uh, hey, 
hey. Ah? 
Uh, 
I'll talk to you first. Talk. Uh, 

you you you have to hurry and tell Jian Rongnan. 
Tell Jian Rongnan? 
Uh, uh, no no no, you you you ask him to come back with me, because I called him, he's not here. 
Ah. 
Ah. 
He was still on vacation, always being there at home, no one answering. I have to warn him about one thing. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
Oh, warn him about one thing. 
That is, 
Yeah. So serious. 
That is, 
it's more, more, more, more serious. 
Oh. 
This, this concerns, concerns his health. 
Right. 
Oh. 
Right, after that you have him call me back. Oh. You 
just 
say I ca n't find him. OK. OK. 
OK, 

that's it. 
OK. Aye. 
You're 
so sick. Ah. There 
was 
a person who got cancer. 
Oh, they are friends, right? Right. 
Oh, let 
him go, let him go check it out. Be careful, or 
do n't always follow him, you know. Oh. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
Right. 
Then. 
Um. That, 

we again, 
I told you two days ago that I bought a car, right? Ah. I 

returned that car, and bought another one. 
This, no, 
you bought it from the dealer, 
right? You returned it personally. 
Repair it, but it was repaired very well, you could n't see it. 
Oh. 
Anyway, I thought later, it was still 
Otherwise they all say that it's not good if the car crashes, it's not good no matter what, then we just retired, and then bought another car. Oh. 
Bought 
a new one or an old one? 
Oh, bought a Eight 
Nine Camry. Oh. And 

then four thousand and eight hundred. 
Oh. 
Oh, he wants to tell you about his experience of buying a 
car. 
Oh. 
Hey. Oh, you tell me about it, it's very important, I also want to buy one. Um, 
let me tell you, this car buying, the key is to see who is the owner of this car 
you 
bought. 
Oh. 
Ah. Oh. This is very 
important. 
Ah. Hey, 
let me tell you, if you run into any Middle Eastern 
people. 
Um. You do n't have 
to 
buy his. Oh. Hey, because he often, he, for example you ask him, he says he's not 
a 
dealer. Ah. He, he just, he deliberately, he actually he's just a dealer. 
Oh. 
He comes to buy a car, he comes back to turn it around to sell the car, or he will install a exterior for you 
if there is one. I'm telling you, now this dealer, his car was touched for you, he repaired it for you. 
Ah. 
The BOLDEWOLF was made for you, that is exactly the same as new. Oh. Oh. % uh so one is a 
Middle 
Eastern 
person from Pakistan. Uh huh. Furthermore an Indian, although he does 
n't 
lie to you, he is willing to deduct, you do n't have to buy his car. 
Oh.% 
uh it's best to buy a Japanese 
car.% 
uh really, haha. Recently I %pw, the Taiwanese are not very, very, you will see what kind of person they are. 
Right, Taiwanese are just like that. Some 
Taiwanese are cheap, some are not. That is to say, the Japanese are indeed cheap, because you see my classmate. 
Right. 
Oh. 
it's my last one this time 
of 
yours %null specially arrived Detroit isn't he working in Iowa specially drove drove to Detroit for more than ten hours to 
um 
just from my teacher 
um yes 
friend 
um 
he's in Detroit there are often Japanese people walking there turned out they were also too lazy to advertise they were all very cheap turned out he fell down several times again 
um 
oh 
then arrived at this my teacher's this shed then sold to 
this rent that is my last one that my senior um 
They 
work in Iraq, they brought a few people to drive them back here in Iraq. 
Yes. 
Yes. 
It's still cheap. 
Oh. 
You see this time I bought a car, I was in loss, actually it was a loss. I was still buying it at a HOSELY price, it was n't HOSELY. Yes. 
Oh. 
But 
we do n't have it here, it's expensive 
here. 
Oh. Besides, this group of people in New England are very conservative and very, this, modest. 
Oh.% 
Er, this, the people from the United States, this, the people from our place are called the people from the United States, this, this is what it means, that is, the people 
are conservative, modest, and this group of people are smart. Oh, they are from 
China. Anyway, they are all very conservative. 
Oh, also from 
Europe. They are all old immigrants. 
Oh. 
You see, the pace of living in New York is very fast, that is to say, the slow travels in Boston, anyway. Oh.% 
Er, 
right, 
you bet, besides, it's cheaper to buy in January, but 
it's also a bit expensive, it's hard to say,% Er, it's best to, 
Um. 
Go, go to that, sometimes he wo n't advertise, sometimes he, for example, he posts on this I. 
P. S. Um. That is, 
he posts a piece of paper himself. 
Um. 
Or the street center, if you have nothing to do you can just go see 
it. Yea I can take the exam during the winter vacation. 
And not only this, sometimes they sell a lot of very cheap, I just realized now that they, You for example sell cars' radars. Yea. Like 

I just need to buy a radar, because I was caught three to four this year. 
Oh you do need to, I know you drive quite a 
lot. Yea, this Radar is actually very cheap, it's only forty dollars over there, here at our place They 
sell half of the samples, half of the price is over fifty. Yea. Oh. 
Other 
things are 
usually over a hundred.% Uh and also send letters, when these Japanese leave, they sell a bunch of things, you have to be careful. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. And 
then you can buy it if you think it's suitable after you've seen it. 
Uh-huh. It 
includes that, that, the wireless phone. 
Uh-huh. 
That is, it has the recording and the wireless phone. You will need this for finding jobs in the future, so if you run into this kind of thing, you should buy it for him immediately. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
Right, 
they, but it's best to look down on the Japanese. 
Uh-huh. 
They have letters they will do it, I asked you that number, it was cut into my wall. Uh-huh, 
uh-huh, 
uh-huh, uh-huh. Tell them, I said you have letters, they know Xiaobang. Uh-huh, uh-huh. I said if you have 
letters 
you can call, there's a letter. 
Uh-huh, uh-huh. hey Tang Yan 
what's going on here eh 
hello eh how are you did you have a baby I 
gave birth to it 
I am Wang Zhenlei 
it's like this 
I just 
uh 
huh here we have a university 
ah 
this this this this one that is that kind of that kind of that 
kind 
of that kind of that kind of you know 
uh-huh 
it provides that free phone for half an hour to call us 
oh 
for teaching just for the Chinese talking for teaching oh okay 
oh okay 

I 
I I think it's strange I said what's going on 
yes he explained to you one minute in advance the phone is for recording oh 
okay 
he said he's afraid you won't know then 
okay 
how are you getting a son or a daughter 
having a son 
is still great 
wow now we're going to fight 
yeah I'm very happy 
isn't it 
how are you are you pregnant 
no one 
you read it yourself 
ah 
ah 
how long has it been Four weeks. Four 
weeks, oh, 
then you can still go there for a 
month. I haven't fulfilled my month, I'll fulfill it 
next week. Oh, I'm at 
home. Has it snowed over there 
in 
your house? It's snowing. It's 
snowing, 
right? Yeah. Oh, then you just don't go out, just stay at home. 
Right, I basically haven't gone out 
this month, however. Hey, how is Jiji, has she grown up, 
Jiji? Oh, I feel 
like 
she's grown up. No, you see that, 
the newborn baby, and then you see the face of this older child. I feel like it's 
just I 
always think that when an adult kid grows up a bit I 
don't really think so at first when comparing I just think wow this kid really has grown up oh 
my god that that still needs five years actually if 
you're a bit older he can help you take care of his brother this this thing he 
now this day till night he asks me if I can hold him if I can feed him milk 
um 
um it's really helpful I'm telling 
you that having a kid you're a grown-up kid he 
naturally would be more sensible just would be more more more than that without 
um 
the kids will be more sensible, really. Yeah, they 
will. It 
seems that she has a sense of responsibility, I'm telling you. 
Right. 
If she grows up a little more, she'll be more uh, how old is Jin Qiqian, is she four years old? 
Five years old. 
Yeah. People 
people people ask me one thing that's the most the most you know, the question that amazes me the most, guess what it is. 
Uh-huh. 
He said, am I that brother forever? Yeah, 
I I I. I think 
it's very fun. 
Oh, the kid, because he 
I think he's not familiar with this brother concept yeah he won't 
be 
it for a day he thought it would 
be a make up turn this 
is what it means 
how is Wang Yang is he doing good 
Wang Yang is doing good 
not busy 
not busy ha did you start to consider that building or not 

no bought a house 
oh bought a house 
um 
eh so great I 
already moved in. 
Oh, then you have everything planned, the kid was born, the house 
is also bought, bought. We just just, a month before we gave birth, the 
house How many bedrooms? 
Four bedrooms. 
So four people have a house, just. It 
wo n't be, who knows, it depends, it depends on their I. B. M. stability. Then 
have your addresses 
changed? Our addresses have 
changed. Has it? 
Yeah, the address has changed, the phone number 
has n't changed. 
Has it? Yeah, we just just moved, anyway it's 
It's been two months since I moved in. 
Really? 
Yeah. 
Wow, you moved by yourselves, 
huh? We 
did n't move here, we did n't have furniture, so when we moved here from Ohio, did n't we have no furniture at all? 
Right, right, right, right, right, right. And 
then we did n't buy furniture 
when we came here. Oh, so you bought everything all at once when 
you 
moved 
here 
this time, right? Right. Oh. That's good, now the 
living room is built. No, this house 
is big, no no furniture just bought a set of that living room things others still didn't dare to buy it yes 
yes 
yes yes yes 
yes now 
we just can't make a profit can't make a profit in PAYMENT just wait for PAYMENT to come out for a month then we dare to buy things 
the buying of the house has this kind of process because we are all poor students 
coming out yes no money our house 
now you bought it on the bed of our 
place you're not bad you even brought some here 
yes I even brought a few pieces of furniture so now I can still make a living I am not familiar with South 
Korean people, but South Korean people are actually the most rich in KAPITAL. Oh. Aye, they are the most rich, they usually buy a luxury car worth forty or fifty thousand. Oh. Right, just the Japanese We did n't bring anything over there did we? 
Right right right I know you drove a small car 
over. Right. 
You drove your car over right? Right 
we did n't bring 
anything. 
Right. So you have even more things to buy right? 
Wang Chunlei 
So what do you do when you go to work first? 

I go to work I 
Just rest at home for 
the time being ha? In in next week, no I'll go to work next week. Oh 
you'll go to work 
on September? Yea. So 
what will you do as a kid? 
What do I do? Oh 
you're really something. 
So what do I do, then then then the old people ca n't get 
through. Right right, then we should learn from you. 
That is to say my dad and mom have not signed, 
he said you came twice, why would you still come? Oh. Do n't 
let 
you come. Oh. Just 
greedy 
for money, greedy for greedy for Too 
greedy, greedy for 
enough. That's enough, 
ha. Right, and 
then. Take 
care. 
Wang Wang asked his dad and his mom 
n n't want to come. 
No, I have been begging for a long time, begging on both sides, begging, begging that I ca n't move, finally my mom was still soft, my mom said, oh, let's do it. Uh-huh. It was so 

hard to beg my mom, but she did n't give me a visa. Right, 
her mom was really unlucky, you said that her condition was good now, right? How good it was to come here. 
Right. Much 
better than where she came from at the beginning. 
At the beginning, I said it was 
much better now, but she was not willing to come, she was better off here after being supported. 
Right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, 
right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, 
right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, after all um who knows 
you have to get up and stay up late every day because Wang Yang has to go to work during the day and he won't get up very early at night 
Wang Yang is also quite fat 
um 
you are now working out even after you get up late there's no time for exercise here 
now it's just 
apart 
from going home going home from work and just go back to the car and go home and still sit at home 
is 
it right still sit at work 
yes 
sit all day and night 
yes yes yes 
just having a belly 
bump right 
four people sitting in 
one seat right 
It's still small, it will be more useful when it's bigger, when it's bigger you can sit up 
and 
do that. No. So how is your holiday going, going out or staying in your house? 
What holiday? It's 
going to 
be Christmas 
soon. Thanksgiving, 
Christmas. Oh, forget it, I'd rather stay here. 
Ah, she's also, 
she's also definitely, she's mainly asking about bringing kids, then she's four weeks old. Hey 
when will you come, come and play? 
We currently have quite a lot of rooms. 
we have quite a lot of houses which one do you live in really okay 
let's wait until the spring festival next year okay 

what's the name of that little one 
it's Hao 
oh Wang Hao 
Wang Hao 
which Hao 
just Hao Shuang's Hao well 
that name is good 
this is good 
er Wang Ji Wang Hao eh this is quite good 
did you guys take this up yourself 
or grandpa take it 
up ah this this is what grandpa took 
um grandpa took 
just like the meaning of the word in Fuzhou is just like the meaning of that 
um 
just just just the sound is the same as the sound of Wang Hao 
Wang Hao 
that is that is 
to say eh let me tell you 
these two kids are very enviable in China right 
what my sister said is funny 
uh-huh 
my sister said 
ah just now I gave birth to a 
second child 
in America ah no way the Wang family are all kids 
um 
no daughter in their so 
Her mom heard it was a kid, said it was a kid 
again, and took him. She has a son, from birth till death she has no son, no daughter. 
Wang Yang they have no, no, no daughter this time, no sister, no older 
sister these. 
No. 
Ah. 
Just 
until Sun. Ah. Right, so she always 
thought about her daughter. Hey, is her younger brother married? Ah? 
Is 
the younger brother married? Not yet. Not yet, ha? 
Ah, that's 

the only hope. 
Right, this now is just her only 
hope. 
Yeah. Oh. eh 
then I I I'll give Wang Yang a call and ask him to talk with you guys for a bit 
okay you have a good rest 
um it's 
fine 
HELLO 
hey Wang Yang 
eh hello congratulations 
congratulations 
eh yes 
I 
er the cabinet the 
cabinet we have too many of them so it's 
not expensive it's not expensive either it's not expensive to plant the 
house of the old school in the front house of the new house the house is 
now you now also have the house the ticket and the son 
then you're almost done 
ah 
Wang Zhong has a job now 
ah has a job 
ah found one who works nearby nearby 
that's not bad 
um that's okay just start working first 
yeah it's easy to find a 
job if you start first start working first then um this 
this this what do you do every 
time 
professional 
ah 
are you doing a major or what um doing 
a major doing a major it's him but not doing a major in the United States 
ah doing a major 
it's doing him to use his previous domestic that that major he used to do the territoriality in China 
ah 
territorial design you know just doing that how to say it 
that is to say road design urban planning they even do this kind of things 
oh that's not bad 
ah it's fine 
that's also on the engineer right 
right it's on the engineer its POSITION is on the engineer 
ah 
ah that's very good 
but now because it's the winter you know 
UH-HUH the winter 
there's not much work so let him do PART TIME for a while you know 
UH-HUH UH-HUH 
so 
that's fine it's good to start right that is 
to say what 
people are saying is that when he gets familiar with this environment this this system and then when the spring starts next year he can to make 
it truly that FULL TIME 
ah 
I said okay okay okay insert one foot first because it's too hard to find one near us 
yeah it's okay to have work first and not so lonely 
yeah yeah yeah well Tan Yan was also like this at that time ah I wish I could go there as 
well as taking a visit there go there er 
don't be so annoying all day long 
yes yes yes 
it seems that we can't find the thing he can't find the job 
yes yes yes we have common interests yes yes yes 
yes 
eh eh there's there's a function language there's a function language so 
so 
eh I have several months of hard time 
all day long taking my fucking driving license damn it I can't do anything about it 
now I'm tired so I'll find him something to do anyway then 
you hurry up and buy buy a house 
we plan to buy a house next year I'm still working on a car now you know 
ah 
I need to prepare my car for the end of this year after finishing the arrangement next year 
the car doesn't matter right take your time 
on 
the arrangement ah 
ah ah at least finish the arrangement and then and then buy a house again 
eh this now the 
rate the interest rate is very low now 
really it's 
even lower than what I was wearing at that time 
yes yes it's more than seven right 
now here it's more than seven 
you are seven point five here I see that here 
I see that it seems only seven point three when I was wearing it at that time I was wearing it at that time 
really 
thirty years it seems to be seven point five seven point six 
oh is it 
right you are going to wear it for thirty years right 
oh oh 
we don't know yet ah 
it 
depends on the price of that house we bought because we don't have a fixed price of that big house now ah Then 

if it's expensive to buy it it's definitely going to take thirty years, it's impossible to get a short term leave 
if you get a marriage treatment if it's going to be over ten thousand over ten thousand over ten thousand 
oh my 
you still want to get a marriage treatment 
now don't think about getting a marriage treatment how to get a marriage 
treatment oh my god 
this this this this 
can't get a marriage treatment huh 
don't want to get a marriage treatment usually I don't know how your house price is I'm 
here to increase the interest to increase the interest how is it here we are to increase I I definitely won't put the money on 
invest all on that that house 
the house right 
oh 
because it is not growing, then you would rather go buy 
buy other what stocks, buy other mutual funds. 
Right right right right right. 
Right right right. 
It will also grow by about ten percent a month a year. Right 
right right. This 
house of yours will not grow, you just just just go and spend it. 
Right right right right right, just just pay on time right? Right just 
pay on time, you 
but they say that you will have more interest if you put in more interest. Huh? You will have more 
interest 
if you put in more interest. This 
interest. Usually 
it's twenty percent, it's like this, twenty percent is paid. Right right. If 
you pay 
twenty percent as a down payment, it does n't charge you that, it calls it calls 
it mortgage insurance. That 
is that loan insurance. 
Yeah. 
Loan insurance, it's like this, you do n't have to do n't have to pay that insurance fee, then 
you save save save a 
sum a sum of money. 
Oh. 
Then for the rest, your interest, your interest is all 
free anyway, the base interest. 
Right right. 
So 
Right right. 
you can't you you you need to you prepare prepare to buy all of them for him 
ah 
buy CASH 
wow 
I'm blind damn it wow if 
you go to buy a house and say 
I'll buy CASH that guy then 
only the boss of New York's Chinese restaurant can do that we are absolutely impossible 
yes it's almost almost no need to say it it's gone the next day damn it 
um 
er it's more more profitable right 
prepare prepare 
at least not CASH that give it to his father in five years right we 
now have to consider fifteen years or thirty years 
because here we have a profit rate below fifteen years uh 
huh 
including fifteen years is a profit rate then below thirty years to fifteen years is a profit rate 
there's a 
right 
yes yes yes 
but you just see if you're willing to stay here or not willing to stay here then 
I 
for example I ran away in last year five years 
then you don't don't have to pay the loan 
to stay like that don't have to be too too too short right 
no no 
I don't know it depends on you 
that 
is to say um that is to say I'm 
now 
in last year Uh-huh. I calculated it in seven years, 
in thirty years, seven years' 
loan. 
Oh. No no no, how do I put it. 
It's called, 
seven years, the 
period before seven years is 
an interest rate. 
Oh. 
And then, 
after seven years, 
it's again another, it's based on the price at that time, 
at that time's interest rate, it gives you 
a price, the rest twenty-three years are, at that time, it will adjust it for you again. 
But this is 
relatively 
low. 
Oh. Compared to that, compared to the forty-five years and thirty years. 
Uh-huh. 
It's relatively low. 
because I think 
I probably won't stay here 
for more than seven years 
more than seven years 
yes 
at least if I stay here for more than seven years stay here for more than seven 
years I probably would also change a house 
oh 
because if you change a house you have to ask for the rent again 
oh then you would sell the whole house right 
yes sell this house and then 
build another house or buy another house whatever 
anyway that is 
to say that is to say after seven years you don't have the problem of 
high and low interest rate right you sell the money and pay it back after that right 
right right 
oh 
right 
yes yes yes 
you have to take care of it within seven years right 
within seven years I'm like this I can 
take take the advantage that its profit profit is a bit lower 
right right right right right right oh this we still don't understand this 
this is a good idea then then we can 
no you have you have this it has several years that is 
five 
years 
uh 
huh 
ten years uh huh seven years uh huh 
so you just you see it for yourself that is to say probably you 
your plan is 
how much is it for example if you stay there 
yes yes yes 
yes you just 
have to pay it in fixed time for four or five years 
oh 
if you don't want to stay I I think it's not 
possible to stay 
stay in a fixed place 
for a lifetime eh this is what you asked the bank and what others told you right right 
just 
the bank the bank just we asked him he knows all about these banks right 
inside the bank it has this kind of 
yes it's 
just it will tell you how many kinds you 
have for four or five years and thirty years this is called 
this is general 
Originally the most most common 
this kind. There's another one that is called 
it's called ARM A R M. 
That is 
called Called called just just called just called just called just just 
called just just called just just called just just 
just called 
just just just just 
just just just just just just just just just 
just 
just 
just just just just just 
just 
just 
just 
just just just just just just just just just just just just just 
just just just 
just just just 
just just 
just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just just the rest twenty five years he would come come to just justify again at that time 
no no he now has many of this 
this he called PRODUCT just various kinds uh-huh 
various 
kinds let people satisfy various kinds of needs 
but many people mostly still 
many people he just used thirty years all of a sudden 
uh-huh 
that is to say don't worry later I five years later or seven years 
later go again go again 
go again adjust again 
think about this problem 
but I am thinking we 
two now two kids 
if this JIMMY if he grows up to be in his teens already 
over ten years old 
yes 
then I think probably just go 
change another house or just 
if he still wants to stay here then why 
not go again go again UPGRADE that house a little a little a bit right 
yes yes yes 
er SINYER then then just well SINYER is famous 
ah 
yes yes you said this is still very important we this still still 
haven't heard of it we only know that there are fifteen years thirty years because we are 
very very casual very went to ask around they didn't talk to us about it 
oh that's still you you say this kind just don't use this kind it can be fixed for a certain period of time in the beginning 
and then adjust it in the later years 
um it just adjusts you 
according to the time 
the profit rate adjusts 
that profit rate for me and then it's fixed 
oh 
oh 
adjust it for me till that time it's just for example 
OKAY you're twenty-three years old now it's 
just according to this profit rate 
just match it according to this profit rate 
eh just match it according to it you can match it if you want um otherwise 
you'll 
be all over again if you don't match 

it UH-HUH that's it 
yes yes yes yes yes yes yes 
all are free then then 

I I think after next year I I don't know what I would stay for I have to 
tell O. U. our this 
uh-huh 
O. U. now the one closest is you 
the closest is us 
do you think it's right 
oh 
uh-huh 
you eh you do you know Li Tiecheng he has already found his home 
oops 
eh really where is he 
he's at San He San 
He Seng ah ah at San He 
Seng he found a job right he 
moved there he's in a company seems to be doing this 
er ELECTRIC ENGINEER I guess he's still working on that that thing 
oh still working on 
the engineering ha right 
right he finally came out at last I originally thought 
did you find him by PHD 
ah 
did you find him by PHD 
oh 
should be 
oh 
I originally wanted to see I help think he's the oldest still haven't found it yet want to help 
oh that's not bad 
is it we can say he's the oldest 
right help him see if we can help him record one here later he I I I gave him a NO I said 
can you give me the RESUME I I'll ask you to see 
Then he said then I already 
found a driver. 
Oh. 
No then just just just. 
Oh that's not bad. Right. 
Then it 
seems that the old people in the 
O. U. 
are all gone. Right. Now it's just beginning to settle down, do you have any other news? No. 
He 
he drove to New York. 
Right, he said 
he last time told me that 
he would call you if I found a driver, I said you did n't find a driver so you can call me. Right, 
I said you did n't find a driver, you can also find one. 
He he said he was embarrassed, he was embarrassed, he said 
this. Right 
right, he's a bit like that. 
you are unemployed and famous you and your you know these now 
you have a holiday this this is not right 
oh not willing to come to 
the internet world that 
er Miao Liang changed another job you know 
who 
Miao Liang 
Miao Liang changed another job Miao 
Liang has jumped to Washington now 
went to Washington I don't know 
oh 
he originally this family he quitted he also jumped to Washington and found another holiday I went to Washington to do it 
now I am working in that E. P. A. 
wow then he 
this 
this this money earned probably 
at the bottom he got these these benefits 
yes 
yes 
yes yes yes 
the consumption is huge 
the consumption is huge 
yes but 
uh-huh 
yes 
like we Baia 
that guy gave me a NO he 
eh do you have E-MAIL no huh 
I I still use that account 
can you LOGIN there 
it's okay I LOGIN through Changchun Telephone oh 
Changchun Telephone oh your family's LOGIN country oh you LOGIN 
from your family 
the family office our place is not okay the office we are inside the company 
this internet is not working in the outside 
you are not connected with the outside 
it's not working in the outside 
oh 
otherwise 
ah then we here are also also afraid that people would just but 
but 
companies generally have e-mail they don't don't add this thing 
no he doesn't we just send it internally from the company 
oh 
our company has several branching companies in different states there are branching companies 
these are all connected to the internet but it can't be sent out from outside 
oh 
I sent it to OU at that time turn out that our that 
someone was there monitoring our that computer that OU result I said he you don't have to send it 
even if you send it for free it 
won't be sent out wow that's still like this 
well that's too too too too that's too that's too that's too that's 
right 
otherwise the E-MAIL just just just just the contact is not convenient yeah 
it's convenient soon 
yes 
oh then I 
we go to our our our we check there regularly 
then I would call you later it's easier for you to do that 
ah 
yeah CHECK who knows when you would go to CHECK sure 
it's all set up 
yes 
when will you come over to play at our place 
CHRISTMAS 
ah 
it's getting warmer it's getting warmer let's go 


over HELLO oops oops oops that's the beginning of recording 
okay 

okay 










ah 



I thought he was going to say something 
what's up 
anyway you I should have told you you see 
ah 
nothing 
but I suddenly thought about it you've already hung up half way so it's hard for me to hang up I was thinking about it just now I suddenly thought it's not right 
no no 
no it's fine it's fine 
ah really well how's your answer 
nothing I'll call you 
tomorrow 
no problem because you I think you should be better prepared than Li Hongguang and them 
Sigh. 
Ugh 
anyway. You and Wang Yi said they they they the talk about the door and whatnot. It 
seems they are not very satisfied with the things with 
the pepper. 
Really? Who who said that, I heard Wang Yi say it. Who said that? 
It was said 
by Wang Yi. 
Wang Yi? 
Yeah. Ah 
just the classmate you said 
was 
banned? 
Right. Is n't his name Wang Yi? Ugh 
who knows, we do n't I do n't care if he's called Wang. Is 
it Wang Yi or Wang Yi? 
Ugh is it we called it 
wrong, as 
long as. Ugh I No no I called it wrong, I called it right 
it's 
called Wang. Ah? Wang Yi right 
yes Wang Yi yes ah 
I thought we said it wrong ah it 
should be called Yi Yi 
eh 
this I think I should speak less because you have a meeting tomorrow 
it's fine it's fine it's fine 
that what I am now deciding what is it GATEWAY or DIGITAL because at that time Liu Dalin didn't mention that he has a 
ah 
GATEWAY he dropped out actually there's a reason it's a problem of fan 
um um um 
just thinking about it can you feel it's so serious I still 
think mine has some sound, but 
I do n't know, just 
I think it seems to be bigger than Jifan's, but Because at Jifan's 
because she's at that School that air there's sound from 
the air-conditioning, and then besides 
there are also a lot of machines, so I ca n't sense it. 
Maybe Maybe you 
do 
n't think you can find it 
out 
yourself. Oh Like this, anyway this machine is at home, you can feel it, you can obviously feel the sound. Oh. Oh 
no. 
Because 
Liu Dalin he said comparing with the company's etiquette he thinks the voice is loud. 
Compared to what? Compared 
to 
the company. Oh the company's voice 
right? Furthermore 
currently Right just his company's voice. Oh. Furthermore 

there's another problem that is, uh 
that what, that You 
you take that thing 
for me. Uh 
that That is, everyone is responding that the service of the gateway is 
not very good. He's like this, the gateway he 
recently, uh he he he's like this, that is you you call for the time, Ah. 
It 
has a very long 
time. That is to say they did a statistics that 
is to say It just says 
you 
You From you for example you You have a problem, your computer has a problem, for example when you install a software you always run it wrong. 
Ah. 
Ah. 
Ah. 
Like if you want to call that technical service and 
call 
it Ah. It usually needs to wait 
a 
long time. Oh. This because it says 
But I think many companies are like this, 
now they are all very 
No no no no, 
very the gateway is also quite long, because it's like this, it says that because 
Its development is too 
fast. 
Oh. The user buys a lot but can't follow, can't follow the customer service. Oh. 
So 
it's just just just very very difficult to get in. 
If you get in you also have to wait a long time. Hey, you have that voice, 
voice view and 
the full duplex speak phone? Yeah, that you're 
talking about computer? 
Yea. You 
bought it? 
Yea. 
What phone? Your speak phone, 
I don't care about anything else, anyway just have 
it. speak 
phone? Do you have a speak 
phone? I I don't have that 
here I have one that multimedia that SPEEC TWO two SPEEC but no SPEEC PHONE oh SPEEC 
you mean two that that that 
two that is when you are playing that music it that 
oh 
oh 
and two that 
oh yes 
do you have this V 
V sound SOMESCENTER well I have ANSWER MACHINE and FACTS 
but here mine is fourteen point four 
if you use SOMESCENTER can that computer be used it can be used 
when it's on I I did it once Ah 
when you send fax fax, 
this this 
this When you send fax or receive it you have to start it up and run it. 
Right right right, 
for example you you you that what, Ah. That 
power 
outage, You always run it. Oh. There's 
nothing 
wrong with the power, but this machine 
of 
yours, Right? No, actually some people say that the machine should be on but there's a saying that's true. 
Right. 
But some people say, 
One day for example you you you just switch on and off once a day. 
Ah. 
it's better like this 
oh 
because he said this damage to the electricity 
this machine the damage to this this electrical and mechanical things is usually that is to say 
ah 
ah 
at the time of opening and closing 
ah 
it's more likely to have more damage to this machine 
oh 
really if you run it the damage is relatively smaller 
but it's not the 
case for electricity transfer ah yes yes that is anyway eh 
how many drive base are there in your place 
what base 
er drive base 
B A Y S 
BASE 
Driving oh I do n't know about this, this is not that for the tower, I'm that kind of top desk, flat. Then 
you mean tower is better, it's easier to extend what do you think? 
It's like this, for tower when I bought the gate gate he said 
if I, that is the advertisement price he advertised was that kind 
of 
%pw, desktop 
this 
kind. Oh. But if I want to buy a tower case it would have to add fifty dollars. 
Oh. 
So I did n't buy it. 
but it seems that the general concept is that I think the TOCASE is a bit better 
oh 
generally 
you use it and you think it's quite good I use 
it okay anyway basically there's no problem anyway 
you are a public 
but because anyway the money is still quite expensive 
let me tell you this this this is not that this just dropped 
um 
right but because it's now for sure the computer is all dropping 
at home you see let me read it for you 
um 
it's one hundred and thirty three % 
er 
er right eh 
to judge huh sixteen megabytes 
um 
two hundred and fifty six K CASH and then one hundred one point sixty two G BAY 
um 
and then the rest are also fifteen-inch this MONITOR 
um 
now selling two thousand seven hundred and ninety nine 
er how much 
is ten two thousand seven hundred and ninety 
nine or fifteen-inch MONITOR 
yes 
two thousand nine seven hundred 
two thousand seven hundred and ninety nine which equals to two thousand eight er 

but no you still have to consider how many places there are er one 
is 
that how big is your RAM how big is your VRAM 
er just that V RAM for the 
graphics yes it's called 
two two megabytes two 
megabytes RAM yes that's fine some are one megabyte some are two 
megabytes 
right 
right yes yes eh this one mainly because it's called graphics it can be fast right 
then it 
one for example you display graphics this color variety and fast 
and slow of course they all have influence oh 
that is good also includes color variety yes 
yes the color change 
oh 
so you see how cheap this is now % 
er and then it's like 
this % er the 
others are called 
what window nine five M. S. office nine five what these are all given by C. D. ROM 
um um 

yours are all C. D. ROM right 
yes 
mine yes yes 
oh 
that's ok of course you bought it at that time this is not the 
same thing yes yes that's 
that is 
let me tell you just these two days because the one I sent you a while ago was still quite expensive this 
computer you 
um 
So today that DIGITAL that Korean gave Feng Yan 
this 
um 
that 
reimbursement 
bill. Um. Now he's still fighting me, and then it's this DIGITAL, because they can get a 20% discount. Um. 
However 
DIGITAL, anyway, 
I heard that DIGITAL's quality is very good. Ah. 
Because 
many companies, this, they, some people from their company have come back to jump on the top, 
all 
have compared. Um. DIGITAL because it has always, it has always emphasized the quality like Japanese people. I heard that the earthquake in San Francisco Mountain or something was not broken. Um. 
Ah 
ah ah. 
Who knows, anyway, who knows. So I'm currently considering it, but 
Ah ah ah. 
This DATA probably, it's called a preloaded 95 window. That 
is it probably wo n't give you CDROM, I have to consider this. Oh, 
then, 
if 95 is not much 
money. 
Ah? Because 95 is not much money. 
Oh. 
Because 95 is But 
what about Office, MS Office? 
Oh Office, I do n't know, 95 is probably just, just just just 
Just 95 is only more than eighty, just seven 
Right, right. 
Seven or eighty dollars. 
Right, just like this. 
Oh. 
no because if you you tap the tap you can get a 20% discount which is a lot 
cheaper eh 
you can really get a discount 
no but the price after it's cheaper when I compare it it's the same as GATEWAY 
again oh that's how it is oh the tap 
the machines are always selling at a higher price because the quality is relatively 
yes yes those those those those companies' compacts are all very expensive those those are all 
damn damn it 
damn it 
well then what do you do after you're done with the work ah 
what just anyway tomorrow at 
two o'clock no I know 
It's one o'clock in the morning in the Li Hongguan. 
After you finish the interview it is said that you will go to Chicago. I 
here 
Oh I really want to go, but how is it now, I have n't sent any resume or anything. You want to go 
there to find a job? No 
no no no no no. Ah. 
By 
the time I you how come you listen to him, 
I go to Chicago and get into that Chicago that OUTFACTS meeting. 
Oh you also go 
there? Then he goes to INGUSON and BROCOLY he wants to go to three places. 
Oh. 
Then I said I really wanted to go. 
Oh. 
I just go there like this just probably 
just for two days 
oh Sunday afternoon 
I go out oh yes 
two and a half days anyway I'll be back on Monday night so 
what do you do when you are looking for a job just 
look for one nearby then no no no no no 
ah 
so my current hesitation I say because I I I haven't sent any letter yet 
yesterday that letter yes Xiao-Shun of course still asked Feng Yan Feng Yan 
ah 
because I we yesterday I asked Xiao-Shun to buy a thingy like a 
letter right yes you have to have this 
and then 
bring Yea, so because I plan to finish the translation tomorrow, and start sending a large amount the day 
after. 
Yea. Sending e-mail and something like that, you have to have 
this. Yea. You 
at least now if you have this machine you can first find it through e-mail 
or something. 
Yea yea. I currently buy the machine for this, this thing, 
this thing, or something. Yea, actually if you have it it's very convenient, I currently Yea. At 
home I 
also also also read some recruitment advertisements, there's a 
lot, you just have to send an e-mail over, or something. Yea yea 
yea. That 
that, so as long as you write a 
letter and whatnot, do it. Oh right, then what do you do if you sign it? That you have to cover letter. 
Is it 
to 
sign, 
to write, calculate, Then E-MAIL can't be signed. Can you still 
can you still sign? Then 
then you cover letter, then you do n't do n't have to sign, what do you do? Sigh, 
then you probably do n't have a 
way with E-MAIL. Then use E-MAIL to do n't 
have 
a way. Probably. You did n't say, if 
you FACTS, you you write a good one, you can that FACTS 
go over there. But we can't go over there by using computer FACTS. 
Can can 
FACTS. Ah? It 
can. 
It 
can scan. No. 
That 
one you have to add, you have to buy a computer, that modem, it has a fax function. 
Then you print it, set it to fax. This 
way you, for example you put a cover letter and resume in Word. Right. 
Right. 
Then 
you print it, It prints 
it on your fax. It takes 
the modem, actually it's a fax modem, and it sends it out. Right. I just 
said 
that he still ca n't go through the paper we type out and then Not like that normal typewriter and then you send it by mail. 
He can just scan it. Oh 
then you do n't need that. 
You 
You just what you want to write 
I know, so you ca n't sign like this. Er, signature. Fax You can only 
type the 
computer 
and print it out and then print it out, right? 
Right right. 
Right. I estimate that now, now 
this is still so formal? Originally you ca n't sign 
an e-mail. Right 
right right. Then he still wants to die, Jay Chou still wants to get a visa, right? Right. 
If 
you want to find a job, you have to take the exam, if you want to get here, just come here to look. OK. OK. 


I I because I've been busy recently, I've been busy with this, and then I'll see. Then first then 
you are 
I I want to first do this, 
I'll first send send a letter out to see how it 
will react. Right. And then 
if it does n't work, go to your place. 
Right. 
How is 
it? OK. No, there is 
no problem 
at all. No I was just thinking Xiao-Shi Xiao-Shi is going to play with that Wang Yi. 
Ah. 
Then you have to find a job what to do. 
Oh yes she's going to that 
just Damn it it's all registered, what did I say you two. 
But they always say this, I think I'm not sure if I can find it in January or February or March. That's 
not for sure, you're still fast. 
Of course 
now it's not that easy to find it now. 
besides it's easy to follow I I just put that RASMAC to change to that 
what changed to 
what just that factory 
changed to factory after three years of hard work 
ah ah 
so this this this so last Wednesday there was an INTERVIEW 
this 
oh 
oh how about it all of a sudden how many are there INTERVIEW um 
of course at least this this just started to give me INTERVIEW formal and then it used to be others 
introducing how did you you 
how did you get this IDEA 
I fucking felt so hurt, so fucking hurt, I told Rong Rong, I said that day I looked at the computer I was so agitated, I said I had no choice but to do that, otherwise it 
would 
n't work. Ah. Furthermore here at our place, it's said that it's not easy to find it in 
manufacturing. 
Ah. That is, it's still easier to find it in computers. Ah. 
That 
is that for manufacturing there are so many people in the whole team every time, I think that thing is already over. 
manufacturing? 
Right, and also people in digital have also told Feng Yan, that is to say that now the Americans basically have moved all the manufacturing to Asia. 
So that is to say that for me now the manufacturing in 
the 
academy is all wrong. Oh. Yea anyway alas anyway just take one step at a time and try it first. Oh. Fuck this this this. So 
how 
are you how 
are you that have do you have the letter? You came down 
in December right? As 
a result last last third's interview was especially good, I think damn it when they asked me about the public 
information my Ah. All 
were correct. Ah. 
As 
a result damn it as soon as he saw the fill out of my letter 
it was F one. He just couldn't do it, because the boss had told me that they do n't want people like 
Fan Shi. Oh. 
That 
because they had already given it to a Chinese before, he thought it was quite troublesome. Oh. 
oh 
my 
god yes 
oh my god 
damn it 


that 
then then yes then when did you buy it 
did you buy the computer recently 
I probably have to make the decision tomorrow I have to choose these two er 
oh 

yes I am thinking about it now damn it 
you said two hundred and seven oh two thousand and seven hundred how big is the hard disk 
one point six 
oh that's awesome this one point six is awesome 
one point six two 
yes and that one you bought one hundred damn it it's one hundred and thirty three 
I I am one hundred and two 
I doubt why it suddenly dropped in these two days it's 
just two days away from two days off 
um 
because I read that World Journalist a couple of days ago 
um 
Panterman's two hundred just came out 
oh 
that is the graphics displayed very fast 
um 
that is that 
yes it's like 
this you you once that one is out this one is a discount it's all like this 
ah right 
damn it 
I at that time you know I wanted to buy one hundred 
but one hundred it it that 
eh how much did you buy 
here I'm one hundred and two 
ah one hundred and two I thought you were one hundred 
yes 
no I'm one hundred and two I am when I was one hundred and two that ah 

when I bought that one one thirteen just came out not long 
ago 
I so alas that didn't fall down much but one hundred it didn't add that what's that 
called CASH 
ah 
by the way do you have CASH now two hundred and fifty-six KASH normally 
I have them but I didn't list DATA out on FORGET so next year 
but that let me tell you 
GATEWAY 
ah 
It seems to be below one hundred, I do n't know why he does n't give it. 
I think it's very strange, 
they What what do you mean by below one hundred and do n't give 
it? One one hundred is just below one hundred. 
Ah, that is there is n't two hundred and fifty six KK. 
Right right, he said they did n't need it, he said they had a you know, they those social 
services, 
no just that Ah. Those answering the phone, those personal talks are 
different. So I do n't 
know. 
Oh. Anyway someone said that 
That is 
to say Of course it's important, I know. He said that 
all the books I read are very important to be read, at least two hundred Yea 
it's like this. 
Two hundred and fifty six K, or best be five hundred 
and 
a little more. 
Yea. Yea five hundred. But he said he did 
n't have 
it 
when 
he went over. Yea. Oh. So That one, I just said 
something, it seems nothing. Yea. That's 
fine. 
After that, 
Yea. Hey, that 
who, 
who brought 
your speaker, right? S, just two of 
them. I do n't 
know if the speakerphone is just a 
speaker. 
No. No I know just when you play that the 
media. 
The media? The media 
just 
that 
CD. Oh. Yeah. Did you buy another one? 
No no no I just 
oh. Right there seems to n't be this in that one, then I just put 
it on. Just add it on? 
Right at that time just at his that that that what's it called, he did n't have it on my 
advertisement. 
Oh. 
Oh. Then he can just say whatever you want you can just ask him to add it on. Right. yes yes 
yes 
yes eh that what yes I 
did add it in 
I'm also planning to buy one hundred and two hundred 
one hundred and two 
oh they're one hundred and two because I think it seems like not much difference 
ah 
yes yes actually it's also like this 
it's said to be only more than ten percent 
it's like this exactly and 
then I'm going to buy a screen I don't want to buy a big one either I just bought a fifteen-inch one 
but 
otherwise I I can't afford it now 
eh 
Li Weizheng 
ah 
now 
yes you told me about 
it 
I'm telling you now all the school ones are changed to seventeen-inch the bottom of 
the fan number are all seventeen-inch monitors. Yea. 
Yea. 
Long 
recently bought one isn't it also seventeen inches? Has 
he recently bought a computer? He 
bought it. 
He's not 
fifty fifty. Did n't he have one before, 
how come 
he bought another one? How many? Uncle said that he wanted to do that project with that air base. Oh. 
He 
bought one that one hundred one thirty three. 
But I think at our own home, do you think we can use so many pictures or projects? 
That's right, that's true. 
Liu Dalin also said he thinks fifteen inches is better, just 
Ugh not tiring, who said that. Right 
that's true, anyway you just just look at it. Right, 
and you can save three hundred. 
Oh, now it's three hundred. 
No, just the thirteen and fifteen inches is 
three hundred difference. 
Three 
hundred difference. Right. I, right, I also requested his family that day, I said two hundred and how much, two hundred and sixty or how much, I forgot. The thirteen is 
two hundred and sixty? Right, no, just different 
manufacturers have different prices, some are expensive, some are cheap, different manufacturers. Yea 

I know, right, yours is two hundred and sixty? 
Yea it's probably two 
Seventeenth No 
way 
You 
I 
How much is it I'm thinking 
I even asked him I 
anyway it's not three hundred It's 
not three hundred it's definitely less than three hundred it's two hundred 
Ah you say how bad are these two right? That 
is to say you add it on the base of fifteen thousand 
yuan. Ah yea yea yea that GATEWAY gave me it only adds one hundred and ninety now. 
Really? If 
it were ten thousand yea I asked him. Ah 
ah 
ah. He gave me an increase so yea yea yea now GATEWAY has dropped a lot. Ah. 
Wow. 

I think of course you have to consider your own reference. 
Right. 
How is your screen size, you have too much 
temperature to open it. You do n't have to always 
switch. 
Right. You now I find out that if you have fifteen inches. 
Ah. 
Your word that basically has two-thirds, only two-thirds is usable. 
One-third is a button. If 
you have to 
It's a button. 
It's those that manual or whatever that Ah. 
That just two 
that Ah right 
right right two bar. Two 
bar those things just occupies at least one-third. Is that 
so? 
Then you still have only two-thirds of the space 
for activities. Then you add another help, there are many nowadays online help. Ah. You 
do n't 
have a manual at all, to buy software. Online help, 
if you look, if your screen is big, You 
display help here, you can see here, I think that, but that is 
to 
say 
Right. Right. It's really big, this, I also think it's really big 
when I put it at home. Just the place it's behind anyway, the screen is behind, it seems to be not very clear, just a big piece behind. Right. Oh. How long 
is 
it been 
half an hour? Oh now, Ah right 
he 
will tell. Ah. Is there anything 
you and 
Feng Yan want to say? Ah 
no just ask Xiao Sheng about answering Meixin, he will talk to Feng Yan. 
Ah OK OK you ask him to ask. Oh 
good. Ah. 
Oh oh 
that's too short. 
Ah? 
Hey Feng Yan. 
Ah. 
He he just left us a few minutes. I am really 
really tired of this, I want to tell you, I want to 
You say it, if you are not tired of it I will call you back, it's fine. Ah 
I am just talking to you about that answering machine. Ah. That 
is 
the one you bought is tape right? Ah 
what do you mean, yes yes 
it's tape. 
That is Ah tape, that is is it a single tape or double tape? 
One. One, 
do you think 
Ah. 
That is how do you think it works, is it ok? It's 
quite good. Quite 
good, that tape is that very small tape right? Yea, yea, 
yea. It's enough 
do you think? It's enough, 
you can spend that good time together, because no one will keep the message for you all day. Ah. 

I I bought one. 
Oh. 
I bought one with Fuli Digital. Later 
I think there's a flaw, it's Oh. 
It's 
too short, it's only four minutes in total. 
Oh. 
Four minutes, four minutes, it's not like, 
normally you ca n't keep that many messages in one day, so four minutes, if Oh. 

it's okay to use it continuously it's it will automatically plug it for you 
um 
plug it into this one thirty seconds one thirty seconds one on the other hand everyone has thirty seconds maximum 
oh 
oh 
then that is if you use less you only use a few seconds then the next person can't use yours anymore oh 
just 
like this so it's especially I just think it's short I'm just afraid that people would leave leave a little more message it would automatically disconnect it would hang up the phone um um 
So 

I might have to change, I'm considering now, because I saw that one they sell, that one with the single tapes, that one with 
the 
double 
tapes. 
Yea. Yea. Yea. Then I did n't know which was better, so I wanted to ask about this. Oh, 
I do n't know, because I bought it at that place. 
Yea. 
I bought it at BUS. 
Yea. 
So there was only one in the one in one tenth of the family, so I bought it, I did n't have much to 
choose. 
Yea. Then you bought that, that one was more expensive. 
% er, it's not that, I think some tapes are about the same as this, this one is, yes, at that time I thought she did n't need to use a tapes, I thought it was save the 
trouble. Really? 
Yea. 
You bought it from 
somewhere else, from an answer machine? Yea, I bought it alone. Oh. 

I bought a phone, then I bought another 
answer machine, like 
this. Oh, oh, oh. And then, you 
were 
together? 
Yea. Oh, then I thought, I was just like this, then 
I found out that this defect was really really bad, this 
one. 
Oh. Then I asked the others to try it, talk for another two words for thirty seconds, and it broke immediately after I 
said 
nothing. 
Yea. Yea. Really? Oh, then I do n't know. 
Yea. Yea, 
then I But 
they said that type is afraid of your that That is that 
It will fall over if it does n't come back. Yea. 
Anyway, 
that is to say, it may 
be After a while, that is to say, it will not break in other places, it may be related to the things that it toys with to control to control type, it may be broken, because it will have to have to use it if 
it comes back. Later it's deleted, later it's sent, 
and so on. That 
is that is that is relatively, probably they just like to break it.% Uh, that is, like the 
kind of our recorder. Right, right. Just for 
example, I'm 
afraid that it won't be clear for a long time if I keep talking about it. Right. 
Right, 
anyway I'm not really sure, anyway, I think it's enough if 
I use it 
for two 
or three years. Ah, right, anyway. Let's talk about it later. It's not too expensive, if you can use it for two or three years, 
you can change another one. Then how much is that that you bought for the answer machine? 
I bought it for more than thirty-four dollars. Oh 
three or four dollars. 
Oh. 
He said to tell me what's the advantage, you do n't have to use type, you do n't have to use type all the time, or something. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
He also said that he knew the advantage very well. 
Oh, that's true, that's for sure, the digital should be clearer than type. 
Oh. 
Right. 
Right. 
Then he said that, but I said I just bought it, I said it was good, I said this is a good 
advantage. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
Then I bought it and thought it was too short, and it was auto-cut, especially, if it was not cut it was four minutes, that's fine. Ah 
ah. How 
many people can you talk to in one day? 
Ah. 
Ah. 
Then it seems I still have to change one. Ah 
then 
I do n't know, then you can change another type, I do n't know that. Anyway I'm fine with using type now. 
That's good, I think. Yea 
I also think it's quite clear. 
Ah. 
Yea, I do n't think about 
the 
rhythm. Ah. Ah then then wait. Hey. 
Aye. 

I have something urgent with Bai Yong. 
Ok then you, Bai Yong come over, Li Weizheng wants to 
talk to you. 
Hey Li Weizheng. Hey Bai Yong, you be 
careful 
ha. Um. That is no one is to tell anyone about 
this 
matter of yours. Um. Hey, that is that Luo Gang, he has liver 
cancer. Oh, oh, oh, 
I know. 
You know, you, how do you know? 
I already know. 
Then how, does our, our group know about it? 
I do n't know, because I, I just know, I do n't know about 
other people's knowledge. You heard from Rong, 
right? No, 
no. That is, that day we went to, went to Wanqun, that was Wanqun. Then Wanqun 
knows? Right. Oh. OK, you, 
you, 
I 
mean, you have to be careful. Yea I know. 
One of them 
I told you and another one I told Jianan, because Jianan that 
day, they. Did Jianan know? She 
knows. She 
knows? 
I 
I just told her. 
When? Because 
I have a better relationship with you two, so I told you two, and the other two I just did n't I. 
Yea. 
Was it just now? Just. Just 
two days ago. 
But just now I saw she was doing a lab with Luo Gan there. Then 
she had no choice, now they are two in the same group. Then 
how is she in 
the same group? They also recently they often eat together, invited them over to Taiwan's home, Leftover they eat, that is 
to say they still still still eat 
there. Is 
that so? That no, I just went to one, Jiao Luen Wen to Rong, I went to talk to him about that whatnot. Then 
the two of them 
I saw the two of them doing that there, doing that there, just Of 
course, they are in the same group. Just 
doing experiments. What 
what? Project. 
Is 
it a class or whatnot? Right. Ah, this 
is 
it. there's 
nothing you can do about it it's already at one o'clock this thing of yours so I tell you you just pay attention to it 
it's okay ah 
I thought you didn't know I'm telling you anyway especially when eating now it's washing hands or something like that 
I I know I know 
yes 
no need for anything else 
yes 
it's okay 
nothing else you want Feng Yan to talk to Xiao Sun 
right eh eh it's okay 
ah 
hello 
eh 
hello 
ah 
I think the time is really quite you know haha 
no he at that time he would give you a hint 
ah 
well that's okay what's the 
matter 
it's okay wait until we get the time to warm up okay then we have to wait until next 
year 

it's okay yeah yeah okay okay okay well wish 
you all the best okay wish you all 
the best okay 
SHOCK GIVING happy okay okay okay bye bye bye bye bye He just said that the time was about to come. Oh. Right, so you just said it's fine, just rest assured and 
say it. 
At any rate if you break up now it's just like breaking up for nothing. This Ah, OK. You ca n't do 
that thing. OK. Then I'll ask you to go to Florida next time, at any rate if he breaks up it does n't matter if 
he breaks up later. Oh, OK, no problem. That is, he's early, 
that is, in the 
morning, normally he gets up in the morning, that is, he organizes you to go out and play all day and come back at night, right? Right. That is, Do you bring breakfast 
and dinner 
by yourself at noon or buy it 
yourself? That is It's not, it's different, that is, our group is very good, they all said, um, didn't they ask you to 
pay more than a hundred yuan in the beginning? 
Ah. 
And then he just, every day at noon when he's going out, he just buys a lot of bread for you, and those fucking stuff, like jam, and 
that 
kind of crap. Ah. And then you bring it, and at noon everyone is together, and then you save money, 
it's expensive to buy it yourself. 
He just does that to save money for you, you do n't have to pay, just he pays you one hundred dollars and he gives you lunch, he brings it all to 
you. 
Oh. Sometimes he will send it to you, 
for example, 
he sends you your coupon. Oh. 
For 
example he gives you five dollars, for example, for example when everyone wants to have lunch, he sends you five dollars each 
person. 
Oh. 
Then he drives you to, for example, 
to the place where they can 
buy 
tangcang or something. Oh. Then you buy it for five dollars each person. 
Oh. 
Yea, just generally, just go there and eat, no need to spend money. In the morning and in the evening, we all eat at that house family. Sometimes if it's late at night, actually it's also 
Ah 
Ah 
It's also just a group. Sometimes we go to a restaurant, 
that is we go to a fast food restaurant to eat. Oh, generally 
what time can you go back at night? 
Oh, it's different. You see where you're going, sometimes it's a little earlier, sometimes a little 
later. When it's late, if you for example go to 
Disney World, one night, it's very late, until You have to go back at ten o'clock, because one night he was looking at that 
Ah 
The 
machine 
light Ah Just that fire tower or something, just some of them are relatively late 
at 
night. 
Ah. Ah. Right, 
and then others, 
Ah. 
Right, 
generally, I'm now, I'm 

asking you now, it's more likely, we happen to be going to that place, maybe it's still that old man, by the time, 
It's possible, that old man is quite good. 
Oh. 
Going there is the most worthwhile, because he, he, 
he has been doing this kind of activity for more than ten years, and then he knows a lot 
of people. Ah. He, 
for example, with you, going to Disney World, Disney World, he bought that ticket, it can, it can be very cheap. Ah. 
Ah. 
Ah. 
Otherwise, 
for example, if we go to Disney World ourselves, the ticket for one day 
is 
thirty yuan. Ah. Then think about it, you ca 
n't go anywhere else. Ah. 
And 
then, there's another place, we went to a place, it was just that kind of, We 
ate while watching them down there, it was like in the ancient times, 
Um. 
Horses, and then, um. They 
fought 
with each other. Um. And 
then, 
when you ate here, they all used that kind of, like in the ancient times, 
that kind of a kind of very rough but not silver or iron that kind of that kind of tables for you to eat then the whole whole chicken 
%null 
ah 
one one small whole chicken 
ah 
really 
just has that kind of original flavor really that 
whole night 
is just forty yuans if you go to buy it yourself 
%null 
then they if we probably at that time he said it would come down for more than ten yuans it means you after you see it %null 
just eat it in a row right 
Yea, just the whole place, that one. Oh. 
It's 
just that you go around and then you wait on one side, it just it just calls that, calls that, Calls that Yea. Theater, 
uh, 
restaurant, or is it called 
restaurant? Called theater restaurant, that is you can watch it while doing that. Oh, 
it's pretty fun. 
Oh. 
And then, that is, you have to go there anyway, you see, at that time we paid one hundred and something, I forgot. Yea. Ah, at 
the 
end we were returned some money, it was one hundred and something dollars, at that time. Ah. Oh, 

that's pretty good, that, you know, when it's allocated for living, is it that, just a few people divided into a family, something like that? 
Yea, 
basically so. How 
many people were in one family that time? 
I was with another girl. 
Oh. 
Two people in one family. 
Oh. 
It's also possible that one person was in one family. 
Oh. 
It's different, because you see, that is, the house family, that is, the house is big, so it can accommodate a few more people. 
Oh. 
If it's small, then it can, normally it can have, it can have at least two people together. 
Oh. 
But I do n't know, like you and Wang Yi, you should contact that old man, to see if you can, That is, To separate 
you two. I do n't know, last time they all got separated. Oh, 
that 
is last time you went, went there, and before that it was all separated. 
Yea, it was all separated before that, then it was all separated, for example you decided to go to KC, then it would all be separated to the individual home, then later you contacted that house family. 
Yea. 
Yea. Oh. 
They 
will call you. Oh, 
that is, before they go, they will tell you who your host family 
is. Right, right, then that host family will call you. 
Then, then you 
go 
Oh, it's like 
that. 
Oh. Right, you, or you can just tell the old man. But it's different, like sometimes they, like there's a host family, they just hope, for example, 
Um. 
Uh find a Chinese person, find someone from another country, they will say that we can understand different cultures of different countries, right? Anyway you always have Chinese people together, they are different sometimes anyway. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
I do n't know how they arrange it. 
Are there quite a lot of Chinese people going there? Right. 
Oh. 
There 
are quite a lot of Chinese 
people. Where to, the church activities are all with Chinese people, this time that person, that Lao Sun's family also applied. Did n't 
he receive it? 
I don't know I just got it this afternoon 
oh 
I go today 
should be no problem well then his son has already come back home right 
no his son 
oh there's still someone staying here 
he must be staying here alas 
do you think they can let him go back 
then then what should we do it's delayed he stays here and won't go to school 
they plan to go directly directly to to the university here here 
here oh 
yes 
anyway there is a TOEFL score here 
when the time comes in China 
then you pay what do 
you pay you say the tuition fee tuition fee 
to go there 
then then then there's nothing you can do now it's all self-paid in China yes yes 
yes 
that's still a bit more than here if you get admitted to China that is to say the tuition fee is still not much 
um 
but 
you this if you plan to go to Chang'an like this it's still worth it because you have to think about the future anyway you come here sooner you are here er 
that's true 
English is good for your undergraduate here, your English is good. 
Yea. 
Yea. 
It's 
still good for your long term development, anyway. Yea. Yea. 
I 
do 
n't know they Yea, 

they are also here, then anyway, still follow their parents. Yea. Yea, 


if you can go there, it's also good for them. Yea, 
last time, last time you four were at S I U, 
right? 
Yea. This time, I saw him say, that is, 
four people from the same school. 
Yea. 
Right. Hey, 
I do n't know if I will ask them, because I only asked them for five people. Oh, 
he may not be so strict, I do n't know, there must be other people applying. Oh. Right, 
there 
must be many people, that day, when that thing came, we waited for several weeks, and asked him if Lao Yue had come or 
not. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
Hey, did you think 
about it? No. 
I heard that you were 
thinking about it. No, he will talk to 
you, 
and then it will come. Oh. And then that, it says, if you want to go to the coldest place to ski, or the hottest place, that might only be 
Florida. 
Yea. Yea. They 
all have to send out this application immediately. Then we just hurry, that afternoon we two just 
Yea. 
Yea. 
Yea. 
That day he gave, just in case he called you, we just Then we filled it out and sent it out, we two put it in the same envelope. 
Yea. 
Oh. 
Then that, we two are there, there's a, just note, that is, there's a place we two write, Hello, 
Xiaoqing. Hello, sister. You, %pw, what is this, %pw, what 
did you get it from? Hey. 
How 

is it? It's from 
that 
Youpan. Oh, 
did he pay for 
it or something? Right, he 
gave me, gave me twenty yuan, I sent it to him. 
I said otherwise, you wo 
n't either. Otherwise, I do n't need to call for these thirty minutes. Right. No, 
it also 
needs thirty minutes, right? I 
said it could take thirty minutes, I guess it does n't need to take that long, right. 
Oh, I can call you later, then you can come in. 
I called at home yesterday, but the fat man in our family was not ok, I do n't know how. 
Oh. 
It did n't work, then I said, I would just call him when I got here, there, there, there. Is 
it so? 
Oh, I said, maybe I did n't call me last night, I went back this year. Oh. 
You 
waited for a long time, did you? 
I did n't wait, because I, because I, I remembered you told me yesterday, anyway. 
That's all 
right. 
Oh. I, you may call me later, call me at work, I think you may think that I, Right. I 
was 
busy yesterday, and then I did n't get enough 
calls. 
Uh-huh. Uh-huh. 
That's true, now I'm also, I'm also, my Christmas is also giving me a week off, now it's. 
Is it? Hey, then a week off? Right. 
Right, 
he can let me, let me do it for a week, and then, uh. And 
then he's really good. 
Uh-huh. 
And then, like us, we do n't have to go to work two days after 
Thanksgiving. Really? You do n't have to go to work, huh? Right. Right, 
right. 
Right, he 
said, so almost all the people in the office will not come that day. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh, right, many people have 
to. He said, and that, that Christmas is also a good time, um, just take a vacation during your Christmas. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
Right. 
After Christmas, when Christmas comes to New Year's Day, the CLAN does n't go to work. Right. They do n't have any 
CLAN, 
they just go out to do things. Right, 
that's when everyone celebrates New Year's Day, because the next few nights, once the New Year is over, then it's New Year, so 
Right. 
So they do n't have much to do. 
So, he said, at that time, anyway, he said, but I still need to, I mean, if I have to do something at that time, I hope I wo n't have to finish the things I bought before I left. 
Uh-huh. However, 
I guess it's also OK, I'm going to cross my finger now, I've already booked the ticket. Because it's particularly difficult to book the ticket when 
it's 
too late. Uh-huh. 
Right, 
right. Right. So. Now, now, but now, is there any, um, um, cheaper price, is there any? Now 
it's, I, now I bought this for three hundred and fifty-six yuan. 
Three hundred and fifty-six yuan, uh-huh. 
Yea, it's okay, it's more expensive than my previous one. Too 
bad. Yea. Yea, 
I 
used to buy it for three hundred, around three hundred yuan. But 
now, 
but I, actually I can also buy the cheapest one this time, which is that, you know, TWA, it's one hundred, more than two hundred and eighty yuan, two hundred 
and 
. 
Yea. 
Yea. Yea. More than two hundred and eighty yuan, but it takes, it takes six to seven hours to do that, I'm really, I can't do it, and it has to take the turn back, so I think it's unnecessary, and its time. 
Really? Yea. 
It 
also, that 
is to say, It's equivalent to it's very late at 
night, just 
like it. Um. Otherwise it's Saturday night, it's very late at Saturday night, then I would have wasted a whole day on Saturday. 
Um. 
Um. 
So I think, and also, it will fly on Sunday in the daytime, you have to. 
Right, of course. It will 
fly away earlier, because it will fly for seven hours, so it will fly at twelve o'clock, it will also come back at seven o'clock. Ah. Right. Right, it will also have to, have to, 
have 
to, 
have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have 
to, have to, have to, 
have 
to, 
have 
to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have to, have Uh huh. So, I was angry, I was like, on Monday, I was like, that, that day on the first, it was wasted again. 
Uh 
huh. 
Right. 
Right. Right, then you, uh, that's good, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, 
then, then, then, then, then, then, then, 
then, 
then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, 
then, 
then, 
then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, They do not remember the price very clearly, you can actually if you want to pay you can just say that take more of 
that. No, 
um, you can also ask 
for more of that, um, your that. 
Right, that, but you think it is not possible, it is definitely not possible to pay for two weeks in one go, you can only do that for one week and one week. 
Um. 
Right, right. 
Right, right, I know, because he is very busy, he does not know at all, he just says that he will be very busy next week, so he wants to give you two weeks in a row. 
There is another break in between. Right. Right. Right. If you are busy, 
there 
will 
be 
no one, so, right, so it must be like that, right. 
Right, just like that, so it, actually you can do this for a week, a week, you can connect with that holiday then, it can be a week longer. 
Right. 
Right. 
Right. 
It can be like that, if you see that, um. 
Um. So 
it doesn't have to be two, it doesn't have to be two weeks. Right, 
actually, besides, if it's like that, it's better than, than, than having it for two weeks, it's actually better, because you have to add that, um, holiday. 
Right. 
That is. 
If you have that vacation, if you have seven or eight days off, you can say, you can say, that's about ten days off, 
right. 
Right. Right, that's it. 
Right. 
Otherwise, if you have the same time off, it's just that short of a week. 
Right, that's it. Um. 
So, 
so, this is good. 
Right. 
And that. 
So, what time were you busy with yesterday? 
I did it at night yesterday. Actually, I did it later, and I said I would be fine at five o'clock, but I have to wait for that associate. I'm afraid, I'm afraid he has something else to 
do. 
Um. Ah, he wants to see your result, um. No, 
I'm afraid he will change again, and then I will have to follow him to change again, but in the end, I will leave at eight o'clock. Our deal is almost done. Um. Um. Um. Um, that's fine. 
So 
now, 
now, 
I 
hope to put that, 
just let them, today they, they are mainly busy last night, because they are going to board meeting. Um. So 
they, 
um, um, um. Today 

they are all going to board meeting, this associate and that partner. 
Um. 
So I'm free now. I just hope they won't come back tonight. Sometimes they sometimes go there on the day and come back on the day. Uh-huh. 
Yesterday 
or the night before yesterday, I don't know if they'll come back today. I just hope 
that. If they don't come back today, then you'll sleep more tomorrow if you come back tomorrow. But tomorrow 
is Monday. You see, tomorrow is Friday. Sometimes he may not want to go to that kind of search. They won't 
on Friday. They'll just have a 
holiday on the day after they come 
back. 
Uh-huh. But they also, it depends on whether there are many things to do. Of course if there are many things to do at the meeting, they may come back 
and do 
that. Right. Right, he might need to be very busy, he might be very busy. Like us, about this thing, we have been, like me, we were busy with this last weekend, too. Um. We were very, very 
busy 
with this, very busy with this deal, and we did n't have that much time. Oh. As 
a 
result, now we, anyway, since me and my secretary, we both do n't really want to be there, you know. Um. 
Right, 
because it has nothing to do with you three, right, it has nothing to do with you two, you, anyway, you got the salary, you know, you will have to do something in the future, right. Right, that's still the 
case. it changes and changes 
and then 
but we do have something to do with the distribution of 
red. My that that associate told me, he said that now they seem to be discussing about distribution. Yes, 

they are discussing about it, when will they distribute the red? 
Because because we 
will distribute it at the end of this year. 
Oh, really? Then your life is not bad. 
Because because we have already we have already you can choose, you can choose, we will distribute it to you next year, but our university also chooses next year, you are suddenly a 
lump sum. 
Ah ah. Yes, 
yes. Right, 
that's right. So everyone chooses to divide, this year we can divide, so we divided it already. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh, right, right. We 
can't divide. Then she said, that day they, she said that day, because the partners every, every Wednesday, every, every Monday have meetings, they are all together. 
Right. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. Uh-huh. 
Right. 
Uh-huh. So 
she said, she said, Monday, 
this, this, so she said she would walk past the door, and the partner would immediately close the door. Uh-huh. 
He 
said they were definitely discussing, probably, probably discussing about Fenhong. Ah. 
Talking 
about Fenhong, ah, right. 
Right. I do n't want him to hear. Right, 
Lao Mei, right, Lao Mei is Fenhong, so it depends on your work. Right. Right, now 
we, 
but now we, now it's not so bad to have one person missing. Right. Fenhong said 
there 
was one person missing who wanted to compete with us for this money, so I think they are not in a hurry to find that person, because now I 
just. 
Uh-huh. Right, now we have to find that person, right. After 
that person left, after that person left, 
I was pretty busy. Uh-huh. Now 

they may get used to it. Uh-huh. So 
I have adapted to it. I have left that person to the business. You can say that. Uh-huh. Uh-huh. Have done 
it 
all. Right. After doing 
it, they will, 
right. So I think they are now, actually, they are more picky. Like us, we have already INTERBALTed twice. Two people. I, I also INTERBALTed them. And 
then, 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. Oh, you also joined, joined that, joined the group. 
Uh-huh. Uh-huh. That's good. You can make money from the company. That's 
good. Right. Right, I 
just, 
right. However, you eat outside, you 
eat out. Right, however, that is better. Uh-huh. Uh-huh, right. 
Besides, you can also borrow a few to eat outside. 
So, 
I 
and I did that two times. Lend a few, 
I do n't 
go to work at noon. 
Right, but I, but I do n't know which one they chose for me, they finally discussed who to choose, actually I did n't participate. Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh, 
right. 
So, 
I do n't know them, however, they anyway, I know they will discuss it that day, but after discussing it, no one mentioned it to me, like this, everyone thought they did n't care about anyone when they mentioned it to me. Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
So, 
now I guess that they may not have decided yet, they may not hire anyone. 
Uh-huh. Most 
of the time, he should at least tell me something, but who knows, they are also, they are also a company, sometimes they do something on their own, sometimes they do n't 
tell 
me. 
Right. Right. So, 
I do n't know, but I think, in the end, because this person, it can be said that he will be the closest to my work 
in 
the future. Uh-huh. Right, but, but they, right, right, but they are generally, Right. 
If he, if they decide to hire someone, they will 
at least tell me, it seems that 
they will hire this person. 
Right, but they are at your level, they are too low, they think that what you say is just a little different from what they see, what should you do, what if they are So they are not this way. They Right. Oh, right, they are not, 
because 
I 
know this, I guess their decision will not 
have 
much 
influence 
on 
me, they can ask me, I think they can ask. Actually, if I do n't like you, it does n't necessarily have much influence. Right. Um. Right, right. But I just, my brother, I mean, I said that if they, I think if they care about this person, they will definitely, they should talk to me in the 
way you say they 
do. Right, they should, right. Right, that's for sure, because in the future you're sure to help the most people, 
right. 
Right. Right, so now I'm saying, now I'm guessing, I don't know if they live in the States, I know they've discussed it, but I'm saying they haven't talked to me, after the 
discussion. 
Right. 
Right. 
Right. 
Right. 
Right. 
Because I think, otherwise, they should have said something to me, but sometimes who knows? Sometimes they might have 
done 
it, 
Right. Right. I do not know, so I am still guessing, I do not know whether they hire those people, actually I think it does not matter whether they hire them or not, they just hire those who are less handsome than me, I am already like 
that. You are now, you are now playing games, yes, you are more like that at 
that time. I am now playing games, yes, but, 
yes, but when I was 
busy at that time, I was very busy. Yes. Yes. It's 


not late, Friday, five o'clock is already, for us, it's already quite late, because it's five o'clock in the morning, so you have worked for a whole day, more or less, you have worked for twelve hours. Right. 
That is, 
we, 
like you, now, eh, now, the week, the week is also, we also work overtime on the weekday, we also work from twelve o'clock until nine o'clock at night. That 
is. Right. So, 
actually, well, if you are busy, you can still be busy. Right, I said 
that. That is, 
but it's not that busy, I mean, from my whole feeling, if compared to New York, that's far from it, New York, 
like I 
called 
that Lesannes of New York. Uh-huh. Uh-huh. They work until twelve o'clock or one o'clock every day. They leave at nine o'clock, they leave at ninety o'clock, it's already early. They, I told them that I, I just leave earlier, but you know. Yes. 
Me. 
They 
just asked me if it was, just ten o'clock, I said no. I said that, I said, the place I was 
working is that, that, 
it's that. That is, it's late. That is, six o'clock, yes. 
Yes. 
Six o'clock, yes, I, I have to say I leave early. 
Yes. Yes, 
yes. They 
wo n't dare to believe it, and they almost go to work every weekend, they have n't, have n't worked on any weekend. Uh-huh. That 
is 
the people who used to go with you to Beijing, 
right? 
Uh-huh. Right, 
those people. 
That 
is. Uh-huh. So, so, like our standard, it's a bit different from New York. So I 
think, Then you ca n't tell them, tell them, they should have, should have some opinions. 
They all know, they this this, they know in Chicago, they know that this whole form is in Chicago, You think this local form is more, more than these New York form. 
Right. 
Right, compare to that, the headquarter, right, the headquarter needs that, right. It 
must be easier, 
right. They all know this. Yes. 
So, 
now, 
that is to 
say, Right, right, no rush to find 
an old friend. No rush to find an old friend, because they think that, although I'm busy, but I'm just as busy as I was in New York, so the expense is still a bit less. They think that I may have to 
Yes. 
Uh-huh. 
I think you should open more shops. It may, 
right, it may be able to deal with it, 
perhaps. But actually, it is true, I may be able to deal with it, actually. 
Uh-huh. Right. 
Right. 
But I can answer some questions now, I think that it's better to have a person in the pink hand when it comes to the pink things. Right. 
Right, 
right, right, because if you have a lot of money, you can still get more money when you have more 
every day, 
right. Otherwise, like 
us, 
Right, 
right, everyone gets more money, so I think everyone is very anxious, maybe everyone is hoping to have a person in the pink hand. Right. Right. 
Then 
everyone 
can get more money, 
so. Uh-huh. 
who knows, let's see, let's see how they will deal with it. 
Um. 
Hey, you said that you have a lot of fun things to tell me yesterday. Ah, this is 
to me, oh, I did n't say anything, it was n't very much fun, I just think about that, I keep telling you, um, I still remember that place where we live in the 
summer. 
Um. Um, 
I remember. That place in the summer, I tell you, that refrigerator is not that kind of, it's on fire, it's burnt, it's already because of that refrigerator. 
Right, you said that was particularly bad. Ah, 
right, there was no refrigerator, 
there was 
a 
mosquito. Is 
that so? Me? Still also That guy is simply that guy did n't come back later after he came back he still kept using 
that 
refrigerator you see how stingy 
that guy is. Ah. Is that so? This is bad. He simply kept using a poor refrigerator, in the end that refrigerator just caught on fire. Ah. In 
the end 
because it's too old too old I guess he just broke it and left it there 
or something. Right right he probably that is not good. Right. Ah. Right. Ugh 
he really is. 
the whole house is burnt down now that he now he already that person has a very good relationship with that NAN LEI now that NAN LEI is taking care of him 
er 
now he is living in 
er yes I was just saying that they don't have insurance for this kind of thing 
right yes that NAN LEI doesn't have insurance 
oh 
then then just 
er 
er 
but to be honest with you that NAN LEI I don't think I can get him no matter what I do with him he doesn't have much money but if QUIZ is about taking care of him he can just from his salary 
every 
time yes He let it melt little by little, yes. 
Right. 
That was suggested in that, suggested in that way. 
Over what? 
Right. 
I just, I do n't even dare to believe it, I think, I did n't even think that such a, such a fridge would cut off fire. 
Right. Right, that, that there are such situations in the United States, that is to say, this kind of thing, right, there are many things that are like this, but I did n't think that either, I said, you are still living there, still using those. Right. 
yeah 
we don't use the housing tank at all we later CHRIS later found the memory later bought a new one a small one for us 
yes yes I am standing here and that's it 
um 
yes 
this person you should do that you this person later still use that fridge you say 
yes 
but that thing I think just have that that house owner is not good you see your housing is not cheap how could that kind of house just generally that kind of house definitely have it um 
huh 
all have refrigerator like you just mentioned I live in that little house of ours that little house of ours that house is not good either but that house can still work at least Ah. 
Oh. 
Uh-huh. 
Then you, I tell you, I know what you mean, it's different. Uh-huh. Is it? In 
this, 

most places in California are not like our kind of housing, there is only one big real estate or real estate agency in this apartment building, this is a private house, you are just a. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
It should provide its own house. You are 
just a, a, it does n't matter if you provide a private house, it's not like you, uh, yes. Is 
it? Uh-huh. 
that's usually the standard if you do that like us these people live in this kind of apartment building 


like the one we live in in California the kind of LANDLADY that most people live in in California 
yes but I see where we used to live at that time that he also and that and that I used to live in the old lady's house or something like that he also has refrigerator you can use it with him together or something like that it's completely 
uh 
huh yeah you can but he but no he this means something else his house is completely separated yes he so he doesn't have any things to do with that LANDLADY that LANDLADY house 
he has a house of 
his 
own oh that house should be that house should be very cheap like this kind of things like this don't have it 
because but he that one but he actually 
the problem is his house actually in California the whole house is more expensive it's actually more expensive than that one than this one so like him in that country it's probably relatively cheaper 
oh 
oh 
oh oh 
but actually it's still relatively more expensive than ours oh what do you 
say 
and the whole house is separated just like two people live in the next door yard just like the one we live in the country 
um 
yes I know yes 
one house and one yard 
yes yes yes 
yes 
yes yes I remember that woman was bitten by an ant 
so 
yes so just just bit 
to death yes she just then 
later it's not that what later later when I saw that that one told me it was a benefit later it was a benefit I think 
um 
um 
um 
I think he was just too dirty because of the face, so his those welfare 
effects 
were all. Um. Were all at that, 
um. Right, 
right. Later, anyway, it was, so he, so he, like the house on his house, the house of the landlord, there was n't, there was n't anything yet. Um. Um. The 
landlord, 
and 
he, this is counted as a small welfare, the landlord himself has a, um, he himself is planting, 
planting, 
um, a cactus. Um. 
It's 
that kind, um, cactus. Um. She sells cactus and flowers, like this. But she, she has no income in winter, she mainly relies on this, you 
know, 
the 
rent. Right, she relies on this rent and income. Oh. Ah, relying on the rent. Oh. So she seems to be now, she just, no, I think this rent, actually I think, I think it's quite poor, sometimes I think that the rent 
is 
extremely smart.% 
Uh-huh. 
Really? Uh-huh. Uh-huh. It's not necessarily that, that, that she's so poor, because she doesn't 
have 
this, or 
something 
like that. Right. Right, right, right. 
However, right, right. Right, however, you are very hardhearted and very hardhearted, this is for sure. Right. 
Right, this is for 
sure, this is too much for one person. Besides, you can still get income from that house 
in 
one year, right? Right. Right, right, at least one month, you can get four hundred or four hundred yuan from 
it. Because of the income from it, it means that it doesn't need to pay any interest, that thing. 
Right. 
the landlord is there, he just makes money for her, makes money for her, he doesn't want us to say that you have to go to work first to make that money, he used to be there, it's 
in vain. 
That's 
right. 
Right. Right. He doesn't take the landlord, he doesn't take the landlord's money, the landlord is gone, that's very, you know, right. 
That's right. 
Right, 
that's how 
it is. So, 
I think this is good, this landlord is very strict, because the landlord, he originally told this person not to buy that refrigerator, he was very against this refrigerator 
when 
he 
bought it there. Uh-huh. Uh-huh. He said the refrigerator was too cold 
or something. Uh-huh. 
but that person of course just refused to listen but besides this I think that person is actually very responsible and that person actually just because he saved this momentary money to be honest 
um 
yes yes 
anyway this this is really too obvious he didn't save this momentary money he to this day you see he's actually living well 
that's right yes 
so I just think this person 
but he also got to take the lawsuit I don't know if he's going to get the lawsuit in the future and if this person is not very rich he won't be able to spend on the lawsuit I think it's also that Right, I, I'm now, 
right, 
I'm now, right, I'm now not really concerned about this person, I think that, perhaps I'm also terrorizing him, I think I'm not sure about this. 
Right, 
like our car that time, wasn't it crashed? The person who crashed didn't pay the money, right? Uh-huh. Uh-huh. 
Then 

we of course got the money from the insurance company, the car, but his, um, there's another person, they're there, they don't have money. 
That is, he paid some, he started paying, but he was a person, an old man, his car seemed to be worth more than a thousand yuan. 
He also said that it couldn't be repaired, because it was more than a thousand yuan, if you repaired it, you had to repair it, to get a thousand yuan from him. He said he paid, but he didn't pay 
it all. Or he just wants to sue, and asks us to sue together, and we say, let it go, anyway, we have already got, got the money from that company, and then, and then, and then, let it 
go. 
Uh-huh. 
Oh. Right, I just said, I just said, I said, that person also had a few dollars short, how come he still, 
still sued. Uh-huh, that is, who knows, anyway, now I, I think this person, I think I do n't know much about the case of the person who sued, actually this person, after 
all. Uh-huh, uh-huh. 
I always think, I actually do n't like this kind of LANDLORD at all, I, I live in, I live in the KINGSTON, I do n't like this person 
at 
all. Uh-huh. so I think but I think this time they both also and Nanen used to like this this man very much that is the man who lives there is always good because this man used to always brag 
about 
er really 
always talk about the best man lady or something like that now it's good the two of them are now 
really ah 
that old man sometimes bragged about their relationship this thing now 
I just think it's fun the two of them are already that the husband and wife are 
totally the enemies now the husband and wife the husband and wife that is to say the two are 
yes that is that is absolutely right so you should ask that but this this is completely a man's fault no matter what happens it's always the man's fault yes this house is very yes 
that means now yes this man is wrong and yes 
yes that is and this house owner said that this man has not admitted any mistakes so 
far 
er I do n't think it's her fault, I think this man, I do n't know why he did n't throw in his mistakes, I do n't know whose mistakes it was, it's true, I think it's too obvious, it's him. He might 
be one of those employees who do n't provide the refrigerator, he should provide the refrigerator, yes, I do n't know, I'm not sure, yes. Yes, yes, maybe 
he just thinks this person is stingy, but the landlord is stingy, and I think absolutely, at that point, 
he definitely thinks the landlord is probably 
%pw. 
Um. Pretty, you know, pretty stingy, with his, you know. Yes. Right. However 
I 
think this this point is indeed a rather fun thing. In my opinion, the house suddenly really became so beautiful. Right, 
me too. I know you think about it. I thought about it all the time. I was living there at that time. Now I realize there's 
nothing 
left. Right. I'm now thinking, at that time we were still talking about the problem of this house and whatnot. As a result I thought, such a big thing really happened. 
yes I remember I remember you called me every time you called you said you couldn't buy anything and shook me yes yes this house 
yes 
we were 
that kind of that kind 
of it was very inconvenient to buy things now it's good now it's good to burn it completely 
but who knows but I see but it's pitiful to say 
that you are also yes anyway this thing is right right it's that guy our broken car that guy crashed into the car and broke the glass 
yes 
yes 
that's right 
then that guy is also quite you know how to drive that car 
yes 
I remember I think about this Han Bin Han Bin how many times did you crash into that car let me tell you he was taken taken to the car by someone at the beginning 
no way 
yes 
yes 
um 
yes yes by the city government or something like that 
Right, actually, it's probably the first time that he was also elected by the government, he's even more unlucky now, 
I think. He, he. 
Unlucky again, I haven't finished my luck, finished that one. 
He, he's not getting married, he's not, he's not getting married, it doesn't mean he's getting married, he's already married, do you know? Really, 
I don't know, oh, he's, he's, he's, oh, he, he, he, he, he said he's not married, he said he's making a decision only after seeing one, oh. 
Right, he's already married, he just, he just didn't go back, 
he just, he just didn't go back. 
yes he finally decided to follow that woman to the end she didn't want to go back to China for the marriage so he just many many Chinese people do this that is to say they just get married here if they 
can't 
stand it oh oh 
yes yes yes 
um 
um um 
then the woman anyway she was so smart she just she didn't go 
back to China last year she was afraid that the public security would ask her how did she get married before she went back to China it seems that she didn't go back to China after she was found out so on the registration of their marriage they wrote the date of last year um 
um 
um 
um 

but the result is that he was caught by the Public Security Bureau and he was faking it 
right now now he's making the matter very troublesome the Public Security Bureau now the lady is not wearing a passport she was caught by the Public Security Bureau 
oh 
oh yes 
this is a just this man didn't come back these two people are not formal in China because it's necessary if it's a man that is to say both men and women are there 
um 
um 
um 
so that he can get married and besides he even wrote down the date it's fake right 
yes yes 
so now he's engaged 
I do n't know, I really do n't know what to do if I really do n't know what 
to do now. Actually I think it's good to have a family reunion in China, there should be a way, no one will be that, the family reunion 
I think he is very, that is, who 
is it? Or, is n't it a family reunion, everyone is a family reunion, should be, should be, all can be 
done. 
Right, that, right, there are quite a few people doing it, right, that, that person's, that wife, that is, you say, which door is there in their house, which person did n't invite her, that's for sure, 
that is, to say, think. Right, right, I think, right, I think they were quite angry at that time, it was not, it was not so good, they were a little 
confused. Is there any relationship, 
no? but that's just just that that woman's house is so useless that woman's house doesn't care about anything 
are you 
the one who is concerned is Han Bing's house is also looking for that actually Han Bing's dad is not that Han Bing's mom is absolutely 
oh 
um 
is against this she said that when they were at their house to get married her mom asked her five times whether she really wanted to get married with this woman 
um 
um 
um 
um 
um 
um 
but they the key is to find it for their family and then that family doesn't have money and then Han Bing also gives him he also sends money to their family 
um and 
also wow 
then why does Han Bing like this kind of person so much 
so so that 
I actually don't like Han Bing that much I don't know Han Bing is always hesitating all the time I think I think I think Han Bing is actually too too too boring too useless actually then then then he was 
indecisive and thinking and then he was not willing to do it and then he felt lonely and then finally finally he just then you think about it and pay for their family and 
then find the government for their family then they won't do anything to your family yes you can do nothing 
to your family that family that family 
yes I said if it's not I said especially if you don't like it very much just forget it find another one he was at that time yes 
that's it I think so 
he was at that time 
when he was at home, he was about to leave, so I just asked him, and he said later, he said he didn't want to get married, and it seemed that he only saw one of them, and 
he didn't compare to her on the stage, so I asked what was going 
on. He said that, and he said he was not willing to do anything, and then he was asked to find someone else, and he said that he had been on the phone with this kind of woman, and that, 
uh, 
yes, he went there, and he was not, and he was not dry in heart, and he thought that he was with such a person, and anyway, he was so cowardly, I told you, I thought I should blame him. 
Right, it's 
really, Right. 
I think many people are just there's no way to control people they are just like that 
yes yes especially unlucky let me tell you some people are so bold not not so what maybe they would just transfer over there 
yes 
yes 
yes 
yes that's what people are looking for yes 
he's just thinking about it more and that thing turns out to be self-taught and smart turns out to be smart and blind you say 
yes 
yes I think so isn't it yes yes 
he anyway now is not sure how If it's like 
this in the morning, it would be so troublesome in the morning, we would be together in a while, get married, get married, and 
that's it, this kind of thing, yes. That's right. It's better to do it the other way around, to do it the other way around, that is, since at that time, 
since the result was like this at the end, at that time, at that time, um, at that time, um, I was so worried, I wanted to meet more, or 
something like that. Right, I was thinking how much trouble it would be, right. You. 
As a result, you see, it's better to meet in person, you didn't meet too much, you, he also, no one actually 
met. 
Right. That's 
right. she said it herself, she always said that she would quit the design 
tower, so now she is Right, she has her own personality, there's no way for her to have 
this personality. So now 
she is, right, so now this is a work problem, she, she does n't write the paper well, she says that she does n't have any job now, and she is about to lose her other funding in the next 
year. 
Yeah. 
Yeah. Is that so? Yeah. 
Yeah. 
Hey. 
Congcheng is still the same, she is still studying. Oh, 
he is still in the class, didn't he want to find a job originally, fortunately, he didn't find one. Right, 
he just found out, 
he didn't, he never wanted to find a job, he, he didn't, he, he never had this idea. It 
seems that he didn't have this idea 
when he didn't pass. He didn't have this idea when he didn't pass, when he didn't pass, he decided that if he didn't pass the exam this year. 
Oh, if he didn't pass the exam again, he would start looking for a 
job again. Right, he is going to find a job. 
Ah. 
Oh, he has found out now, he said that if he were to 
But I think he this year you said it's likely that he could pass the two courses. 
Yes. 
He told me that if he didn't pass the exam this year, he he next year he wouldn't have the funding. Yes. Although he himself 
would 
be given four years' funding, but if you you have to pass both courses within three years. 
Yes. 
If you can't pass them within three years. 
Then you would be given the funding within three years. So he said he didn't take the exam this year, so if he finds a job later, he might still be facing financial difficulties. That's it. Yes. Yes. Yes. 
So. 
Uh-huh, 



who knows? However, I think, I think that he is certainly still very old now. 
Uh-huh. 
Right, right. 
Anyway, now it's just 
Right, uh, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, 
then, then, then, 
then, 
then, 
then, 
then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, 
then, 
then, then, then, then, then, then, 
then, then, then, then, then, 
then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, 
then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, then, There's nothing much, I just want to ask you anything else, if there's anything fun to do or something else. There's 
nothing else, I just think, I just think it's very easy to do this thing, it's also very easy to do this, eh he's being tough, I really do n't know, I actually, although I kind of 
hate him, 
he Really? A while ago I called, they said there's a place to eat free food, they have that. Yeah. Yeah. They do not have a that 
kind of that 
kind 
of that kind of that kind of thing in mathematics, there's something like a connection, what's going on, there seems to be a that kind of thing, like a COMPETITION PARTY, later they 
can. Yeah. um 
um 
um 
oh um 

what is this then that that in addition that that Xu Rong that in addition that person of our department of economy he just told me 
um 
um 
he just told me about that husband he said this is Han Bing 
um 
um 
also always that you know always goes to the train to eat the garbage 
train is not like this a bit rich Right, right, Chinese, right, 
originally we went to that church when it was just started, because he was Chinese, he was also a Chinese church. Oh, OK. 
He 
just encourages everyone, that is, he starts to recruit you with this thing, for example, you can join that meeting, and then you can eat and whatnot. Oh. So 
the 
kids are so bold, they also said that they were going there, 
they said that they really were going there, but they also said that they were embarrassed at first, because when they started to look at it, they all seemed to feel that the church was not very, um, you know. Uh-huh. Uh-huh. 
Oh. 
% 
Uh, 
so, just, uh, that is, Uh-huh. Uh-huh, 
I went 
to have dinner, and then, later, he believed it, and we just had dinner once, anyway, 
I had dinner once, I think we had more than one meal, anyway, I, I only had one meal after I 
came here. 
Uh-huh. 
Oh. After having dinner once, we did n't go to dinner again, but it was n't very good, anyway, those people he believed in, they were all the ones who served the meal, 
and 
then, 
Right. Oh. If you, I just did n't know how to pay the bill, and then, finally, everyone had to verify the payment, how come the host helped me. 
Uh-huh. 
that thing of internal affairs well of course it's because everyone was active but I always think that thing uh-huh 

I don't know if this is real or just something that is said or not it's fake or something like that it's for the sake of the law how come I 
don't know much about it um 
he still always runs he seems to run into that kind of black people I don't know much about it either he just runs into there 
really oh he knows that those black people oh we really have this kind here we here and we here now this they said they were all tied up now they all became mainlanders we we just started to go there and we were all Taiwanese yes 
Uh 
huh. 
That's it. Oh, yeah, now many people are starting to have the image, I know, I think, I saw that, some people are really attractive, I tell you, some people. 
Right, they are all people. Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
And then, anyway, it's this guy, this Han Bin, what medicine did he buy at that time? He said he didn't want to eat anything 
after 
he 
ate it. 
Uh-huh. Ah. Really? What vitamin, I don't know what it is, then he just saved a meal. 
Uh-huh. Uh-huh. 
I think he's currently thinking about this and this and making this small calculation actually he'd rather take the initiative to look for something outside or 
um 
yes yes 
to think of a solution he 
yes of course you have to find something to do and have a job that's fine otherwise you can't save money and go anywhere else he just 
has to yes otherwise 
that's right and also and also 
you have to you can't save money on the rent you can only eat and have a job 
yes 
that's right 
Right, and I think you you and if you do n't you just finish your this this dissertation quickly, or he writes it slowly, he just% um Right, right Right, he is 
living 
a comfortable 
life 
now, he is now sleeping, 
he slept until about twelve o'clock this morning, and then he will have another nap in the afternoon, he is a wuxia 
now. Really? 
It's already twelve o'clock, he is still a wuxia. they are 
all divided by their blood and the other party. I think. Ah. Oh, then maybe it can can give 


you that, right. Ah. I think if you do not want it, it will be too tough. 
Hello, 
Luo Ren. Hello. Hello. Hey. Can you hear 
me? I can hear you, I can hear 
you. 
Fuck. Oh, I, I, I Over 
there. Ah. 



I took a G R E 
exam 
here. I earned forty-five 
dollars. What? 
Here 
at our place You took a G R 
E exam? Ah, 

here at 
our place, there's 
a, a math section in G R 
E. And then, 
there are thirty-five questions. Um. 
And 
then, you, you, you, you 
have to give twenty dollars after you finish the exam, and then thirty-five questions have to be given, given 
fifty-five dollars. Hey, how come he's like this? 
It's just this E T S, have 
to, have to Oh, I C I C. 
Just change the type, find someone 
find someone to test. 
Oh. 
And then I got one 
wrong, 
and got one wrong and got five five dollars 
deducted. Oh, it's 
like this. 
uh-huh. Damn, I I did n't have this chance, but I tested for a T S E before I came here, I at that time 
uh-huh. TA. 
And 
then the department required me to take 
a T 
S 
E exam. How is it? And then I tested for two hundred and seventy, 
and I passed. Fuck, 
that is a very high 
level. 
Oh. 
Ah. You this theological exam is so high, damn it. er 
I that what's the name before I came here one month before I came 
here uh-huh 
I've been watching a lot of the videos uh-huh er I spent 

a lot of time on it 
after I came here I that is to say 
after I came here I only took the exam after a week oh I 

practiced a lot during this week 
uh-huh later 
I stopped practicing a lot later you're 
doing R A now and you don't need it anymore 
now doing R A 
yes later a guy asked me 
to do R A he said 
This probably in October I just got a 
scholarship. uh-huh 
Got a scholarship and said to transfer to RA. uh-huh 

RA is good, for me as a RA a lot of people are very very you know. 
uh-huh Very 
very jealous. uh-huh Little 
guy. uh-huh 
Why? I 
can have 
contact with RA for three years. That 
is Ph 
D. Ph D, 
right. Then why do you study Ph D and study M S? No, 
I just want to be like this. Studying, 
why study M S? If you study M S you must finish study 
ten classes, you know? uh-huh That is 
to say 
you can only get one M 
S. uh-huh 
Oh, I see. 
Right, if this is RA, I can choose four classes. 
Uh-huh. 
Are n't you a fellow? You, 
as a fellow, also take four classes, right? One week, uh, one semester. 
Uh-huh. 
I this semester took three classes. I this semester. 
Ah? 
You only took three classes? Right, 
I was taken to four classes, then the old director, the old, that director, we all changed to three classes. Why? Why? Then, we 
this 
semester, 
we have to find a boss. We, we are through RA, then we will start RA next year, the first year is final, he does n't manage 
it. 
No, if you are RA, you still have to go, go 
through a semester. Yea, after a quarter, but I really I have to find it myself. Then 
finding it is n't good either. 
I have to spend 
I have to spend a lot of time talking with the boss, the boss is very slippery. 
No, we're the same here now, the TA is all like this, three, three, three of them are taking 
the exam, 
then uh-huh. He actually 
I'm from our side, I'm the first one from our side to book, and I, I, I take that PROJECT 
and 
it's Aye, you, you that classmate, is your classmate also there? The 
best student material. Which one? You 
have classmate 
in the same class? 
I have, yea. 
Also there, just, just you two? Yea, yea, yea. 
There are two 
more, and also Tsinghua, there are four in Tsinghua. There 
are four in Tsinghua. 
Uh-huh, there's another five. Oh, oh, this, 
uh. 
There's 


another one from the Chinese Academy of Sciences, another one from Du Yan, five. 
There are 
just five Chinese? Oh, 
no, no, there are eight Chinese. Five, 

eight Chinese? Yeah. 
Wow, 
that's 
really something over there. We 
recruited fifty people, each of them got 
one final. We were fucking too rich, fuck. 
Fuck, 
we were rich. It's no good for 
us here. We recruited nine, nine people with one final. 
Then three people from China, all are from Tsinghua, damn. I do n't know those people. 
Really? 
Ah, there's a Singaporean. Here 
we are That 
is, he, he graduates, he 
is from the car department, 
then he works in Singapore for a year, then he comes here. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
He is studying 
Robotics. Hey, what department are you in? Mechanics? Right, Mechanics 
and Applied Science. I, I, I, 
when I come here I can, I, I, that is I find, find a boss, I can find someone who is a double E, damn it. Later I do n't find anyone. 
Oh, right, you that, you are a temporary engineer? 
I'm a chemical engineer and a material scientist, but I 
currently But I do n't know you you are specialized in 
materials science? I'm now doing chemical engineering, I'm doing point and point 
coding. 
Oh, you've already changed? 
Yea, I I found the boss, he's doing this, I've changed. Oh, that is the 
one 
you told me last time, this this that what 
This this one, uh, uh, that is doing that what what That 
that High 
high-grade particle. 
Aye, high-grade particle, and that 
High-grade particle 
layer. Layer right? Yea. 
Oh. 
This 
one of 
mine You've already changed? I this 
is very easy this this this this You said 
that day that you would think about it. Yea, 
later I saw that everyone was taking it, everyone was trying to tell me where to go, then the American later, an American told me, he said 
he said you find this boss, you do this project, you will find a job in the future. Oh I heard it, I hurried to tell him, I said I wanted to go I wanted to go. I 
actually I could have transferred to W. E. but W. E. I thought about it, W. E. transferred over, damn it, I have to go to Madison, damn 
it. Oh, I see, I see, I see. 
Oh, so I just I just called him Minneapolis, I thought damn it I I just Then 
that one of yours is pretty good, yours I have 
changed to be a painter, and I also 
Yea, your painting is good, your painting is ranked first in the entire United States, it's pretty 
good. Yea, ranked first in the entire United States, and my Polymer Coding is easy to find work, because 
I have to use everything, now 
I, this professor's students all graduated this year, he continues to recruit students this year. 
Ah. 
And his students went to that kind of electronic company in California. 
Oh, damn, Xiao-Zhe you are quite lucky. 
Yea, 
I'm quite lucky, damn. Not 
bad, not bad, not 
bad, not bad. And then I have two, another is to analyze how this coding is done, it's called doing electronics, this professor of electronics is 
Ah. Gian Qiao graduated, 
just from Cornell, from, was dug by a company from Cornell, from Cornell, to pay heavy tab 
tax. Oh. Oh. 
Oh. He 
said that in his group now, group, oh, he said that in his group meeting, all of 
his students were American. All were from Cornell, damn it. 
Really? 
So I, he and two bosses took me, and then, 
So 
I, he and two Anyway, now 
I Anyway, I'm OK, OK, not bad, not bad. 
I might have a trip to your place next year. 
That's great. 
Yeah, I might have a trip, but 
I ca n't 
How do you say it? I do n't know the details, I might have a trip, because there, there is one, that is 
One year one degree that is to say it's our that that meeting on this project What do 
you do? Ah? Do what do you 
do? 
We now I now do 
that that is the simulation of the two-phase flow in the vertical pipe, use use that C F D to do it. That 
is that kind 
of pipe. What pipe? Is that is that talking about that flow of heat heat and matter this aspect? Aye 
can say that, that is it that is the summer fruit 
and 
yearning. Aye. That's not the chemical field. 
Ah, also right actually it's also that I now go to class with the chemical department. Oh 
then then then our department our department is doing this kind of stuff doing this because I have n't learned it so I just I do n't want them 
oh oh oh oh oh your chemical engineering department is also like this then after a year I just transfer here and then I can do a lot of things here 
oh you uh I tell 
you 
I I tell you transfer here is whoever transfer here there are two students transferred this year 
the chemical engineering department does n't accept Chinese people that is our chemical engineering department does n't accept Chinese people 
they accepted two Chinese people one is from the chemical engineering department of Pudu another 
woman is from the chemical engineering department of Tsinghua you might have heard it came out this year 
Changed from from KELTEC KELTEC 
California Institute 
of Technology 
oh C 
I T transferred over here 
oh he also changed over here 
everyone runs here 
like their fucking ordinary schools he he he doesn't 
want this you know first after entering after entering and then 
he said your boss didn't you find a chemical engineer boss and 
then you do a chemical project you turned over there er you directly directly 
if 
you get admitted and changed it's very difficult basically he doesn't take in Chinese people 
are 
you he he's so damn disgusting and we went to find the chemical engineer 
boss we were all shocked everyone wanted to change to chemical engineer 
Then he does n't want Chinese. Then 
I have a very good luck 
here. Why does he not want Chinese? Damn 
it, chemical engineering here, here is very easy to find work. 
Then why does n't he want Chinese? This 
this ca n't be that fucking serious. Does n't want 
Chinese because there are many Americans who are actually very, he recruited this, recruited us and we are very 
actually No, maybe it's a language barrier problem or Not a 
language 
barrier. Chinese students are all recruited. Even if you are an chemical engineer, the 
background the chemical engineer is all American. Really? Right. 
After 
he 
is recruited like this, then you can find a boss again, you can find a boss of chemical engineering, because here we 
in fact the chemical engineering has absorbed the materials to become chemical and materials 
here the materials are for chemical engineering service anyway you can say it's 
not it's also more practical you just bring the materials first that's it 
um 
um um and here chemical engineering is fucking the first so we have more money every year 
um 
you you many 
people if you you you want to transfer W. E. then 
I want to transfer W. E. I won't look for a boss now I said boss I didn't find a suitable one 
then I tried my best to discipline the students anyway I wrote to you to give me FINALE you gave me 

I didn't find a boss I wrote to you to give me FINALE I didn't find a boss 
um 
um 
um Then I finally took took took took took the master's degree and then I transferred to 
the W E I can also do this Really? 
Yea 
you can do this now there's a few Chinese students they are like this they just don't look for it 
he just takes the department's money 
the department is in a hurry and always urge them to look for it 
they always say they haven't found a suitable one 
Yea we are also the same here some of 
them have been there for seven years and still haven't graduated 
the department always takes care of them you know? Yea 
He also 
sometimes doesn't look for a teacher yea yea 
yea Not dare 
to And you 
see here in our department Anyway 
I I think our department is very just policy is very special, it's different from other departments. 
There are four engineering faculty of our department, that is the 
United States. All are chemical engineering, chemical engineering 
majors. 
Really? There are four damn it, too fierce, very difficult, one person. 
Your department is very big, it should 
be. Our department is very big, our department recruits fifty people this year. 
Uh, the whole 
research, research is 
recruiting That is to say, 
the graduate recruits fifty people. A whole 
recruitment 
of fifty people. Yeah. Yeah. 
Oh damn, that's very impressive. This department is 
very big. 
Very big. This department has fifty people, 
recruits fifty people in one year. This 
department is, this damn university of engineering, this department is relying on this department, and that, you know, 
Uh-huh. 
And mechanical department, Minda mechanical department ranked eighth. Uh-huh. Just relying on these few departments, damn it. They put 
Minda's 
public Minda's project ahead damn it. 
Uh-huh. They 
went ahead. Uh-huh uh-huh. What is Minda currently ranked? Minda Project ranks ten, more 
than 
ten, fourteen or 
fifteen. Fourteen 
fifteen. And then, comprehensively, %pw, graduate school right? Oh. comprehensive, 
comprehensively? Ah. graduate school ranks twenty, ranks twenty-five, ranks relatively 
thick. Twenty-five, ah. 
Right. Minda 
just, just just these few departments 
are very strong. Uh-huh. Then 
Then 
Right That chemical chemical engineering was n't that three three agency 
ranks this 
year? 
Yes. 
The first two agency ranks are the 
first, 
the third 
agency 
ranks with The last two agency Is is the first compared to MIT, anyway these three are all the first. 
Ah. 
Oh, the third is a little stronger than MIT. Ah. About the same. About the 
same, that is. 
Ah ah. Also the first. So the department of chemistry of the University of the 
Arts, 
the department of chemistry of this department of chemistry is 
promoted 
this 
year. They mentioned 
the the dean of 
the Institute of Technology, because he said the department of 
chemistry, the department of chemistry you you you as department director is always the first in the United States. Then you really mention that good topic. Institute, 
they all want you to name them Institute of Technology. 
This is actually this is not something that he 
can do on 
his own. This thing is n't a problem of 
the system. 
No, the key is there's a money problem, our department has a lot of 
money, 
our department Right. I did this project, the money was all given by a company. 
One, there's a powerful chemical company behind me providing me 
with materials. What 
company? It's called ELF Auto Chemistry. 
An American company. 
Oh oh. They 
do chemical engineering, then he provides me with samples. Over here 
we have I mean 
that 
that that that 
gambling company. There's a that 
Marshall Lab at our place at the gambling company. Right right 
right. Many of 
our people who spend money on things go there. 
Our place, our place is too big. Our biggest boss here is San M. San M. San M. 
Oh oh oh. 
San M. is the head 
office here. Fuck. Right, and 
then And then here, They give you a lot of money. 
Like our place, And some of our bosses here just left from from Bayer Lab. 
Um. 
Was Bayer not 
disbanded? 
Right. Came over from there. Fuck. And 
even got a job in the national laboratory. 
Oh 
oh. Fuck, 
that's awesome. Oh, 
I, I just think this department is awesome. So you see, we went that day. Very awesome, very very 
awesome. I just think this, uh. 
Uh, 
they, Ming University Medical College, they are doing that, um, 
investigation, um, Chinese, Chinese old people in the United States, they, um, depressed, 
that kind of depression. 
Um. And 
then everyone sat down, and then, 
Introduced themselves, which department, which department, they are all some, um, psychology department, um, um. Some architecture department. Um. 
Also, um, 
nurse school, 

also the 
fucking nurse school, damn it, damn it, girls, fuck. Long Fu 
said something about that chemical engineering before he came here everyone was laughing they all laughed they all knew that 
chemical engineering is the best in the university of science and technology damn it 
really 
yes that that can't be compared 
here it's the best that it's the one that has 
tried it in your place 
it's the one that has tried it in you know 
no er what is it 
it's the one that 
has tried it 
in how to write it oh 
it's the one that has tried it in didn't it keep talking about it all the time it's A E 
I M I T S LONG and then the second one is it's the one that has tried it in 
here it's the one that has tried it in it's also very good at it 
the university of military science is not bad the university of military science is not bad the university of military science is very good 
Ming University ranks eleventh this year. It ranks eleventh in the whole. This is the graduate 
right? 
Yea, that's graduate. Actually 
you see the major rankings of a university are all based on the graduate student that one. Yea. You're 
under 
graduate student is nothing. Under the Ming 
University is still full. Under the Ming University is even full. 
Under is nothing. Under is its that is to say is generally generally not looking. The major ranking is just looking at 
this. 
Yea. Yea yea 
yea. 
Yea. The key is that the school at the Ming University is too big. The other departments 
are all too bad. Like the liberal arts department is too bad. The Ming University is too 
bad. No the 
agricultural department of the University of Ming is also the first in the American class, which is agriculture. 
Oh oh oh oh. 
Agricultural 
College. 
Oh oh oh 
oh. Damn it, nothing else works, damn it. 
Oh 
oh. It's too bad. Here 
we actually do n't have the art and science department. 
Oh. 
Oh. Art and science, that is 
to 
say actually, only one department is ok. That is 
chemistry is ok. 
Oh, the department of chemistry at the University of Ming is very bad, damn it, it's really bad. The 
department of chemistry at the University of Ming is very bad, damn it. 
Very bad, the department of chemical engineering 
This this the department of chemistry at the University of Ming is still very 
very good. 
At that time of chemistry department, that is to say, there were 
several professors, I even talked 
to the head of department of chemistry. Fu's damn it all, all, 
he looked for a boss a while ago, damn it, he found a damn it. 
That is, he thought that 
he wanted to be more busy. I said that we could learn materials 
again, and then they could be taught again. Then you, you are talking about this one by one, that 
is to say, or you are talking about the materials one by one. Fuck, our department has so many faculty, right, I talk about it one by one, and also 
No, your department should be fine, right? 
Because 
our department is like this, listen to me. 
Because our department is the best, so many professors in our department all put their hands on our department. He knows that the students recruited by our department are definitely the best. 
He even came to our department 
to recruit people. like double E there are several professors you see I transferred double E just because he came to our department to recruit people 
and mechanical engineering department I also I also talked about it 
that guy is even better he's doing that high-temperature tube 
model of that doing the tube model of the 
tube oh 
the first one in the United States fuck he's the first one to be a dean fuck 
really ah 
he also wants me to go 
oh what does your mechanical engineering department do to 
that tube 
no he's doing that tube model of the tube oh 

because our department our school mechanical engineering department is ranked 
eighth in the United States in the graduate school 
really 
the eighth is quite good yes 
but he also does a lot 
of 
Hey, your department, your, your department, 
how come there's a Department of Mechanics? When I applied for it, I did 
n't 
see a Department of Mechanics. 
Yes. M E, yes, M E, M E. M E, we ran into a Chinese, your Department of Public Affairs, damn, she was in 
Class Eighty, Class Eighty-six, Class Eighty, damn. 
She was with this Fender, damn, damn, 
very 
comfortable. Damn, do n't scare me. 
Hey. 
Oh, there are so 
many 
of them in 
the Department of Public Affairs, damn. She Is 
that so? This class? Oh, and also Class Eighty? Not 
Class Eighty, damn, I've looked for her. But that woman, that woman is Class Eighty. It's not eighty eighty, it's already 
found, damn it it's eighty-six I think. 
Oh eighty-six, that, no, the public service department was really good 
at that time. 
Yea yea yea. At that time 
it was all Luo Ren. Oh now damn it, there are so many here damn it here 
I do n't have much public service here. Here 
here there 
are so many of Tsinghua physics department damn it, all all all squeeze into double 
E damn it. You have the double E and you rank eighteen in the 
United States. Oh 
you say that that many students in Tsinghua are all are 
all in 
Physics department. Studying double E here. 
All damn it all are here damn it, I entered a laboratory. 
Hey how many people did you get for that 
double E? 
Eighteen. 
Eighteen. 
Right. 
Oh. How about you? 
That was my seventh this year. Right, 
yours was not bad. Our double E was damn good before. I just wanted 
to change to double E, later 
I saw that my course was not good. 
Our double E was right next to our department. 
At that time I wanted to change, that professor really wanted to, damn it. That was the best professor, the most powerful professor of double E. Yeah. 
He 
said to send you to Wisconsin National Lab to do experiments. 
Yeah. And 
then damn 
it. I really wanted to change 
at that time. Later I I I asked a few people, damn 
it, double E, damn it, you changed to double E. 
How about double E? Double E is not necessarily easier to find work than this chemical engineering, and it's just right to be connected, I saw that, % er, the US U.S. that 
took a trip, the connection between this 
chemical engineering and double E 
is pretty much the same. 
Yes. 
Furthermore, The economy is not getting better, double E is first of all unlucky, because the electronics first of all is still, 
you, chemical engineering is something you use on a daily basis, you will always need 
it. Yes. It wo n't, 
it wo n't be cold 
to some extent. Like, like in nineteen ninety 
one, I, I heard them talking loudly. 
Just now they were not able to find a job in double E, they, they did n't have a job. 
Yes. 
Chemical engineering is especially good. 
Yes. 
It wo n't be very bad 
in 
the beginning or the end. Yeah. That is 
to say when it's 
not very bad, because It's all daily 
necessities, you, this double E 
I made, what, Computer, what, I can just not have it 
if 
I want it economically. Yeah. This is just like this. 
So I think again, 
that damn double E of his got ten eighth place, 
damn it. I got the first place here, damn it, I was so tired of it, damn 
it. Yeah. 
I just I just 
let it go. Right, and with double E, you still 
have to fix a lot of courses, still 
have 
to be more, still more painful. 
Also the time was delayed. 
Right right right. Hey 
do you know about that Rock Rock Rockwell this company? 
Hey do you know about that 
Rock Locoware 
um I have 
never heard of it. 
In California, then now he 
he is recruiting people, they are doing that, that is to say I am currently doing that. Today they 
are going to that company that recruits people from the Civil Affairs University, that is to say they are going to the W E to recruit people. 
I went to have a look. 
Wow they are recruiting, they are recruiting, they are recruiting numerous types of types 
of types of people damnit. Right, I now realize that that is 
to say, it's like this. This, 
this 
is that there are a lot 
of opportunities. Especially some big cities and the like, this 
or better schools, they have a lot of this kind of 
job meetings every 
year. recruitment 
meeting. Right, they all have this kind of interview. 
They have a 
lot. Damn 
it It's very easy, it's easier to find a job. I 
I M S I can find a job, there's no problem damn 
it. M S there's no problem, 
but for M S the salary is a bit low. 
The salary 
is 
low. Right. The salary is low, it's around three or four thousand. 
Then our department has one today. Like here 
here here 
here. 
Studying materials. Yea. Damn it, 
studying 
doing damn it 
Doing training and training analysis this theoretical technology, find a job, the salary is six thousand damn 
it. 
Really? His husband is a W E damn 
it. Hey your this seems the materials are more 
Rather rather well what 
is that? Just rather rational, 
rational, rational, you know? Here 
we are. Here 
we are. Rather theoretical. Here 
we are. Here 
we are. Ah. Here 
we are, let's see how you get it done. Here we are, 
most materials are serviced for chemical engineering. 
Chemical engineering materials. 
But as soon as I heard it, it seems that you are this kind of Especially 
especially, that is to say, you are more good at 
theoretical things. No no no no. I, I, I, I, I think this fucking topic of mine is too simple, it's 
all Ah? It's 
not enough level for me to do it, fuck. It's 
all too, too practical, fuck. Polymer 
coding. Oh. 
You, 
you, you eh 
you 
you that HIGH PROTECOL how come I feel like it sounds quite too PROTIC 
too PROTIC this is too PROTIC this is to use organic organic to melt the glue to melt to those er put 
those 
you know peach tea powder or something like organic organic powder and use the organic things to blend then 
drop it on the ground and spin it around after it's mixed then slowly dry it up and then after it's dry it's just a COATING 
then you stick to the reaction of this agent if it it can 
make it more convenient to say this COATING can 
for example this oil spray can stick to the brain that's fine 
Just this kind of thing, then you see again what's the structure inside, this is my PROJECT damnit. This toilet paper damnit, in the future 
The metal paint sprayed on the car damnit, just just need to 
use 
PORNIMER damnit. This kind of thing is usable anywhere, you need to use this thing to brush the walls. 
So let me think about it, the use is extensive. 
However, 
this is very very very very vulgar, it's learning damnit. It's 
painful. However 
you this, I think if you want to graduate you still need to come up with a theory, I think, right? Ugh 
what theory, take take two electric photo's and touch them. Damn 
it's too easy to make theory out of me. I this 
I I this I already have this article, it's almost ready to publish. It 
can be published. You 
know? Chairman of 
the American Institute of Technology and Science. 
Ah. 
He took me to be his student in our department. 
Who is he? Chairman of 
the American Institute of Technology and Science. Chairman of 
the Institute of Technology and Science. The 
American Institute of Technology and Science is really awesome, damn 
it. Ah ah 
ah. A very huge institute, it's a well-known one with physics. 
Ah. 
Ah. 
In our department, it was originally inside this Wisconsin National Lab. 
oh vacuum that vacuum that one can also be used that is your that is also a coating that is called 
something 
like that right he has two kinds I'm not 
here here he is a pear 
a pear western-looking right I'm not growing this in the vacuum my that is too simple that is M. B. E. one layer by layer high vacuum 
oh right you told me you told me 
then it grows again 
that is there seems to be one of these devices in Tsinghua right 
M. B. E. right 
right right oh 
that M. B. E. right there are only two in 
Tsinghua damn it there are two right 
um 
you told me that they are quite big after 
it He did it very well, that person did it very well, what project did that person do, half-body action. Ah. Half-body course. 
Ah. 
In the future 
he 
will be doing the hardware, that 
is this. Oh, right, this is 
yours, this material of yours is 
close to the hardware and 
physics, right? Right, right, right, right, 
right. It's the hardware 
and physics. However the hardware and physics, it is said that this is more boring. 
But it's easy to find a job. 
Right, it's easy to find a job, but it's especially 
boring. It's even more boring than this program I'm working 
on. 
Right. 
Hey, you're working on the program, you're currently a MODEL. 
What MODEL? Just do 
that simulation, do model, right? Aye, right, right, right, 
right. Oh. Right. How 


did you choose this? We, this, we, we have numerous people doing chemical modeling, that no one wants to follow. But although there 
are many, many, many people doing modeling, they still find jobs, 
doing 
chemical engineering. No, what does this modeling mean? Furthermore, 
It's 
a simulation process, a computer simulation. 
Ah. 
Do you do this, this kind of similar 
thing? Right, right, right, right, 
right, right. A 
monitoring process, right? Right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right. Damn, it's the same as here, damn. Here we have a lot of people doing it here. Damn. Yea, 
it's a bit tiring, this thing is a bit 
tiring. Chemical 
engineering. It's always damn sitting in front of a computer, damn. It's just doing computers. Yea, I'm 
just like this now. Then find 
a job damnit. You ca n't 
say you do this. It's 
very easy for me to find a job here. 
I looked at that. 
You 
You just say you are doing something with a computer, how is it? You're just using a computer in the future, not 
just 
Yea. You find a job, you can only find a job with a computer, you ca n't find a job with your model. Yea, 
now I'm just relying on a computer to find a job. We 
people here are not willing to go learn modeling, damn it, it's fucking too too boring, damn 
it. It's rather boring, but damn it, 
there's no way, I can only do this now. 
If you ask me to find other teachers again, that is to say, for this year of mine 
I I think you are very lucky, you you have already found this person, like 
I guess that's doing this. Like 
the others, still haven't found them? 
What what? 
I said you have already found the boss, the others are still I 
this boss is also for the time 
being. Oh, for the time being. Right, for sure it's for 
the time being, I I Next 
year I'll probably see what the situation is, I want to 
oh you do n't have a a long time for example a PhD boss that you have n't found 
yet? No he he really wants to have me, you know? 
uh-huh uh-huh 
He means to let me study for three years 
uh-huh But 
I think 
Three years is very hard, to study. Right, three years 

must be very hard because I have n't learned many classes. Right. This 

is actually that kind of 
He transferred plus summer fruit dynamics that kind that kind that kind uh-huh 


uh-huh uh-huh 
I'm studying 
at Jilin University of IELTS damn it er yes 
I 
here we have a faculty of engineering department of IELTS that is in charge of the technical engineering here I 
today I I'm not today I this this semester wrote that fruit mechanic can't understand even I take the class damn it 
Jilin damn it 
then I read the notes 
I spent a week on the exam for the exam money damn it later I took 
the exam I heard that you got the first place in the exam 
ah the first 
oh here we also our the teacher of the Chinese Academy of Sciences told us that right here 
I am the first in all four courses damn it I am the first in all classes 
You're too good, we We did n't get the first place, but we all said, damn it. 
But I was solid physics, so I could get the first place. Because solid physics is one of the three things I Is that so? Yeah. 
Yeah. 
Yeah. After 
we 
took the exams, we sent the answers, and we all said that we were right. Yeah. But he 
did 
n't get the exam, so I got the full marks. 
I got the full marks for three questions. 
Then the other one was still, for the addition of marks, I did the totally right. 
Then there was one, it was just ninety-seven marks for Flutermacallus. It 
was deducted by three marks, damn it, I was a little wrong. 
You're too, you're really good. You're really 
good. We're not, 
we're just like this, the policy test at our place is just, uh, we tested 
for 
the policy. Uh-huh. No. You have 


to choose our courses, you 
ca n't finish 
them. First of all your highest score, one hundred, he has a full score of one hundred and five, your highest score ca n't exceed eighty. The highest score is 
seventy one and twenty. Finish them. Then 

the average score is more than thirty. Uh-huh. 
Then 
the A is above sixty, our A is very strict, that is, 
that is, 
Ah. 
Very little, here we 
I think it's very easy for us to get A here. I can get 
A even if I mess around blindly, I tell you. Uh-huh. Here we are I can 
get 
A 
just by looking at the test paper. Here we are 
dividing A B C D, damnit. 
Our teacher is dividing A B C D. Here 
we call it A B. Basically A B. Fuck. 
Which school, they all say it's A B 
A 
B, here we A B is generally A, other departments are A B C. Yea. Here we have A B C 
D, 
fuck, that's terrible. Is D there? Yea, there's D, 
there's for 
D, fuck, he heard that I'm also giving D. Is there? He means you must give D. Yea, 
he, fuck, 
he just press that. That's not possible, this 
damn it's very easy to learn, fuck, 
you have to learn. He just press the branch, he just press, he just press the branch, 
of course, really, 
your full name is A, fuck. Oh, that's the way it is. This time the fucking 

Chinese are really awesome. Four people from the 
Chinese military troops were all 
killed in A. Fuck. Fuck. Old American. Fuck. Fuck. Everyone 
was probably very stupid. Ah. Us 
here too. Us here too. Just 
the Chinese were pretty long. Some of them in Taiwan were probably not. 
Taiwan was very 
Just anyway those from the mainland came over were all fucking all were basically A. All 
were A. Fuck. 
I I I did n't finish the exam. I did n't finish the exam. The highest score was seventy one or something. 
Ninety or something. Then 
I I did n't finish the exam. Fuck. I saw the score was fifty three point five. Fuck. I was fucking stupid. Fuck. 
I could only get B according to this score. 
Yeah. 
and then 
and then I saw he had five questions 
I added all the five questions and the main question I saw that he had ten points short he even gave me he gave me an extra point and I got an extra point damn it 
how is this possible this is too much this 
is too much I got sixty oh I got it wrong 
I went too far damn it I always say I say sixty three point five and then add one more point then immediately the light is gone damn it did you kick the others 
to the ground right right 
right right then you kicked the one with sixty points to the ground 
you guys went to there right right right right right right right right right 
right 
right right right 
right right right right right right right right right right right right right 
right right right right right 
right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right 
right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right right but here A 
and B don't have much relationship damn it here we are just what's the relationship between 
you here you have already found a teacher what's the relationship yes here our boss is good he won't count you 
or 
something 
damn it really especially you it's easy to find a job this this is not fast at all 
actually you see finding a job is not about academic record at 
all uh huh 
mainly depends on that INTERVIEW you this 
yes 
that is to say he requires you these few aspects can't you 
just meet the requirements damn it I have a 
boss that boss Jian Qiao asked me for several words No, 
at any time, 
no Chinese is allowed. He 
told you to speak English, you have to, you have to remember that you speak English. 
In the future, you 
have to do a Prentation, you have to, you have to find a job, you have to live in the United States, he was very honest. 
You have to live in the United States, you have to find a job. You have 
to speak English. 
You ca n't speak Chinese. 
You ca n't speak Chinese even with your Chinese friends. 
Damn, that's too much. What's up? This is too 
absolute. 
There is a guy here that is, he 
will never speak Chinese from now on. No 
matter how to seduce him, he will never speak 
it. That is not necessary. That's 
too much. 
This, he, he passed one, one, one, one semester and he did n't get 
it either. He wo n't allow me to 
He wo n't allow me to be with Chinese, with Chinese, I can be with Chinese, but for example English. Fuck, 
how could that be? 
Fuck. This 
should be fucking raised 
raised against me. Fuck. He 
said he said I did n't he said I did n't despise Chinese, he said I I think because you're in England America you must speak English. Fuck, he's an Englishman. He 
This is a kind of discrimination. 
Right. When speaking in America, speaking English is a must. It's not necessarily necessary to speak, um, just say a word of Chinese 
and not speak. Fuck. He fucking thinks he's the best in the world. Fuck, he graduated from Cambridge. Fuck. He thinks he's the best. 
Fuck. Damn that's wrong this this this is too 
much. I didn't look down on the Chinese at first, damn. Damn it, 
this is wrong. So 
I I am 
I am the first Chinese in his group. 
The first Chinese, damn. Really? 
Then damn it you're so tired to death. 
Damn it, so I damn it I'm so pissed off, but he 
but he's a good person, anyway 
he just he because he I estimate that he probably he used to he met this situation before, he used to say hi to Chinese students before. Chinese people 
and Chinese people talk talk Chinese time time, then he always thinks what you two 
are up to behind his back. 
He thinks 
he thinks it's more public. For 
example in his group he thinks everyone 
Ah I I 
yes 
He has connected all the 
people's 
E-MAILs. Ah. And then you send one to me and I send one to you, everyone can see it. 
Ah. 
Everyone can inform each other when they need it, he thinks this is a very good atmosphere. 
He doesn't want a few people together, talking about whatever. Ah 
ah ah. Because 
of the relationship 
between 
the tourists. Ah ah. Is it time for Luoluo to 
come? Luoluo Has he arrived? 
I do n't 
know. He should have a hint. 
Ah that's not good. 
Anyway it does n't matter, I have a public phone, actually I can also call that directly, call call your 
dad directly. 
Uh-huh uh-huh. I have a public phone 
here. You, 
how are you now? Are you busy? Of course 
I'm busy, fuck. I'm currently in the lab. Oh, 
I'm not, I I I went to the lab this winter to have a look, fuck. To see how they do the coding, fuck. Is 
that 
so? 
Aye. Aye. Over here I'm at the work station, then I'm writing the procedures, there's nothing else. 
Then, this time I I'm working on that NETSCAPE. Oh, NETSCAPE, 
I know. We're working on that here 
as well. Right, I I here probably probably, probably in a month there'll probably be a home 
page. Home page is our uh 
Hey home page you can build it yourself, right? 
Right, build it yourself, then you 
I we can build it here, but I 
Here we tell you how to get in for free but I I did n't go to listen Oh 
this is 
very Very easy 
It's easy to learn anyway just read the book and you're done. Read that manual and you'll know. Anyway 
it's quite complicated. The process is more complicated. 
uh-huh How about 
your eh how is the university of Pennsylvania? Is it very 
Is the school very beautiful? 
The school is very beautiful. 
Very big right? Right? 
% er not very big. 
With that How 
many people are there in the university of Pennsylvania? 
How many people are there in the university of Pennsylvania? 
This we 
also have twenty thousand here. At least twenty thousand 
I think. She went to six or seven o'clock at night, yes, not that, just at four or five o'clock, 
she was taking a nap. She probably slept later at night. Yes. What kind of person is this, really? I think she is a person, so I think, this is also her own fault, what do you think? Yes. OK, then if there's nothing else, that's it, I'll call you later, I'll call you later, yes. Yes, I have nothing else, I'll call you later. OK. That's it, that's it, OK, bye. Too few too few damn it's the University of the People's Congress damn it's too big 
Is 
it 
Just the two two two cities just just the Minneapolis this is 
a supported campus damn it. Just damn it there are 
forty to fifty thousand people 
damn it. Forty to fifty thousand people. Four to fifty thousand people. Oh 
I do n't know much about this 
I do n't know much about this I anyway I think the University of the People is big enough the University of the People because it is also a 
He said it was at A 
university school is also a very big school. 
It's like this because it it how does the University of the People say it in the United States there are many that you know universities right? In 
the universities the university of the People is the biggest in the distribution of one 
city. 
The most people. Oh. Then I saw that damn law school over there, damn, it was like 
a wind, 
damn. Law school? Ah, we we 
we How are you 
doing at the law school? Our law school is very good, not bad. 
Is 
that so? There's just one river here, one river, one river. 
Ah. 
Ah. 
We're in the east coast, the west coast is the law school, North School, damn, something like that, damn. 
Ah. 
Ah. 
Ah. 
That, that damn guy, 
damn. My teacher is that that aerospace engineer 
graduated from Minnesota. Oh, 
this, the aerospace and physics of 
Minnesota is one department. ah 
right right right he just graduated from this 
yes yes yes oh graduated from this that's good that's good 
he he is he is doing that aerobics that kind of 
you know 
uh-huh 
he just graduated from this and is doing that C F D that kind of calculation 
uh-huh uh 

then maybe you 
if you do this aerobics we 
have we have a engineering department here and he's doing aerobics 
damn it then I won't work with him he er my teacher is quite awesome he is the first-line transferter of the B 
group 
oh 
he is the first-line transferter of C F D he just taught him one 
uh-huh 
Uh-huh. Ha, 
now they have a lot of 
fucking funds. 
Uh-huh. the 
funding is not I said it's not I said maybe you come over and do a project with our department, 
maybe. 
Oh, right, we're now, I'm currently working with your department together. It's 
our department. 
Oh, no, no, your department, it's your department, it's your aerospace. Our school. 
Oh, physics 
department. Oh, engineering. Right, right. 
Oh, physics 
department, that 
physics department. Right, just 
with them, no, no, not physics department, it's that aerospace engineering. Oh, oh, 
our department, our school has an aerospace department. Ah 
with with that what the mechanic engineer I think I can't remember it clearly. 
Yea yea yea. Just 
that just several several schools have tried to get a fund together. One one one together. Yea, 
anyway this is a big 
idea. It can be done, you're old, then your Minneapolis is very pretty, damn 
it. 
Really? Very beautiful damn 
it, Minneapolis Is it very 
beautiful? Of course damn it. 
Philadelphia I think is indeed very good, especially this 
that that, the campus is still very good, it's still the center area, the city, 
the center city is still ok. Oh 
are you in downtown, the school? No 
no no no no no I am 
That is to say the CIT he has a CIT which is a particularly concentrated small block. Uh-huh. 
There's 
another one which is a bit around but it's also inside CITI. Um 
M-Miniapoli that is 
this M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M-M- wow eh then how many black 



people are there 

in your place there 

are very few 

black people in our place 
there not many black people in our place yes yes it's more pure in your place but 
it's more mixed in our place there are many theists in our 
place fuck 
yes yes 
you want that the theory of war that is 
not the north of Philadelphia is 
generally generally 
white people 
that is the black people are in the west 
and the west 
in the west then ours is in the southwest 

you know 
um um 
southwest 
that is to say 
this is not particularly difficult nor that very west 
but 
is a transition zone. 
Uh-huh. So 
there should be more black people here. At 
that time wasn't that person 
Luo Xiaohui not always that thing? Big scolding, right? 
Ah, big scolding, saying 
that there are too many black people here. 
However, now I see it's not as much as he said. 
There are not that many 
either. However, I think there are more Asian people. Hey, 
let me tell you. Min, Minneapolis is this, Min University is the school with the most Chinese students in the entire 
United 
States. Is that so? Chinese, there are so many Chinese people. There are too many here. There are three thousand I 
think. Three thousand Chinese students. Ah, 
including those who dare to go to Taiwan. 
wow three thousand three thousand 
three thousand 
three thousand 
three thousand that's 
a lot 
very very horrible 
three thousand is quite a lot 
but for us this military traffic police almost also has also has almost one 
one to two thousand I think 
there are also quite a lot of Chinese students like this 
and then 
and then here 
the whole street is full of Chinese people I see 
it seems to 
be here I basically don't eat western food here I eat Chinese food all my food 
we are all 
very very FULL TRUCK all drive inside 
then I are 
all driven by Chinese people 





we are also we have good Chinese 
restaurants here 




Hey. 
Uh-huh. 
You heard it right? 
I heard it, what? Um 
I found some um phone calls from that Miami Beach with you. 
Uh-huh. 
That price, now, anyway it's just last week. That money is still very cheap. 
Really? 
That is the room for one to four people is thirty five, thirty to thirty five dollars or so. 
Miami Beach? 
Ah, the Miami Beach I they say it's pretty close to that Florida Law. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
Do you want to write it down? 
Oh. 
OK, you, 
you, what's wrong with this, do you want to give me the phone number now or what? 
Right. 
Can't you send send send send that to me tomorrow, send 
an e-mail or something? The computer system we have now is always bad. That's fine. 
I also 
do n't want to delay it, just send it, anyway it's thirty minutes, I'm afraid it's that. Wait a minute, I'll 
find find find find a transfer. Yeah. How did 
you 
do it, did you apply for a shit card 
or something? No. 
No, how come he gives you thirty minutes for free? 
This is a um what um no, a um laboratory of a um University of Pennsylvania. OK. Um. You say. 
One eight 
zero 
zero. One 
eight zero zero. 
Four four eight. 
Four 
four 
eight. 
Four 
three one four. Four three one four. That is called ROW 
R ROWE MOTEL R 
ROWE. 
MOTEL. 
MOTEL. Um. 
OK. 
Is there anything else? 
Yeah, there is. This this room for one to four people is thirty five dollars. 
OK. 
Every day, right? 
And then, 
What? Every night, every 
night there are one to four people in the 
room. Yea. 
OK. 
One eight zero zero, eight 
six 
six. 
Eight 
six six. Two zero three five. Two zero three five. Hey, is n't that, what is the number, oh, no need to call the number, right? 
This is a eight zero zero phone. 
OK, you say 
it. This, damn, how do you call it, Miami Beach? 
Ah no no, no need no need, this does n't have, it does n't have to tell me its name, you just have to call this number. 
OK. 
There's 
Then one eight zero zero. 
There's also no price, right, you this? This one is two dollars 
and thirty three cents cheaper than the one above, thirty 
three. OK OK. 
You say. 
One eight zero zero. 
Uh-huh. 
Eight. 
Eight. 
Then it's B A Y M A R. 
B A Y 
M A R 
M A R 
This is eighteen 
dollars and ninety cents. Also four people? 
This they did n't explain it to me clearly, it seems that it should be one to four people. 
That person just came back from a meeting at that Miami Beach. 
Oh, it's called Miami Beach. 
Ah you do n't know this place? 
I do n't know, I've never been to fucking anywhere, I do n't usually look at the map either. 
the tourist area is next to that tourist 
area, these two places. 
I do n't know if they'll go to the tourist area or not, I'm not very 
clear. You say, others. 
And then, um, they are, he said that tourist area is only twenty minutes away from that that 
Fort Lauderdale. uh-huh. 
And then it's one eight zero zero four six 
eight. one eight 
zero 
zero 
four 
six 
eight four six eight one six eight eight one six eight eight um 
What is the name? 
Uh S A N J U A N. 
Say it. 
I'm not sure what it is, 
it's a bit off. How much? 
Twenty six 
dollars. 
Twenty six dollars? Ah. 
I did n't say you were off. 
I said this name is off. 
OK. 
And then one eight zero zero three 
two 
seven. 
Three 
two seven. Zero five five three. Zero five five three. Yeah. 
B E that place is called B E L. 
B E L. 
A I R E. 
A I R E this 
is twenty seven to thirty 
yuan. Are they all quite cheap? 
Oh just now it was twenty six yuan, just now 
that one. OK. 
What? 
Just now that was twenty six 
yuan. Not twenty seven to thirty 
yuan. No. The one above, S A N that one. 
Ah I know I know I know. 
Um. 
Is there any? There's 
another one, it's not eight zero zero do you want to send it? I'm 
not sending it. Then you just I. 
Anyway I'm 
not going to call, it does n't matter if I send it. It's 
about the same, it's only this price, I see it's all this price on the 
left and right. 
Right? Aye right. 
Forget it, then I do n't want it. 
They said that actually if you drive there, Um. 

I do n't know how it will be during that Christmas, he said that at this time, 
Uh-huh. 
You drive over and the crowd is all about that kind of motel. 
Uh-huh. 
You do n't need to book anything at all, they said that booking is even cheaper than going directly to look for sea urchins. 
Is that so? 
Ah. 
But there are probably a lot of people who play during your Christmas. 
Aye. 
Then we do n't know. 
However if you can book it now for thirty or forty bucks, it's not expensive. 
It does n't matter. It's 
cheap, just no loss. Yeah. Yeah. 
You 
on 
the whole can only get a few dollars on average. 
Right. 
That's good. 
Then you've thought it out now, just go to one place. 
Yeah that should be 
the case. That should be the case, you should I'm 
saying they have too much money, I do n't have money now, I now 
No, he said that six or seven hundred is all about how much you can get, and then you can save one hundred or one hundred 
dollars or something. Yeah. 
But I estimate that you ca n't get five hundred. 
Because no matter how much you can get, it wo n't be as much as the water, right? 
Yeah. 
It's not me who's counting, it's someone else who's counting. 
But I see that tourist ticket fee, damn it, if it's thirty dollars a day, 
How many dollars is one person? 
Right, right, tourist hotels are pretty cheap. 
Five dollars? Six 
dollars? You're there, you're there, um. 
The ticket is expensive. 
If you go to the ticket, it's over one hundred. 
The ticket, um, Disney, probably, um, one person has to be one hundred and fifty, if you play, play 
football. That's it, your, your ticket is over one 
hundred. Um. 
And then others, we are, it's calculated according to us. Ridiculous, 
we rent a car here, the car fee is still, Almost one hundred yuan per person. 
Ah. 
So this, this is quite a lot, you just, if you do n't rent a car then then just. 
Right. 
Right. 
Much better. Um. So 
it's 
not really. Um. You 
see, anyway 
you can play if you want to. 
I I I I, I currently, apart from their place at 
that, Um, Disney that place, approximately booked, Two houses. Ah. This 
way 
we seven people live. Ah. Then I 
now 
for other places he he said if you do n't go he said he only booked one. 
By the time I I whether I go with you or go with them one is enough anyway. 
Oh oh. 
That's fine. Then do n't do n't book one for me first. 
Uh-huh. 
OK. 
That %pw% er which day did you come? 
Yesterday. 
Um. 
I went to the beach that 
day to drive 
the car. You drove it? No I drove it I I did n't dare 
to drive it. I just learned it. 
Oh. 
He said he went to the beach, how is it? Quite fun. Ah. And then um 
um that view is not bad, but I bought fifteen pounds of crab and cooked it. 
How much is a pound? Ah. 
Think about 
it, a little more for one yuan. 
Really damn expensive. Expensive 
you bullshit. Oh really 
cheap. 
Really cheap. 
That is really cheap. 
Really cheap right. Ah. I think 

eating crab can satisfy people, this is the first time I have found out. 
Oh crap I say 
oh. Just eating crab alone can satisfy people. Ah 
you bought it? 
It's not me who bought it. 
We eat this all 
the time. You eat this all 
the time there? One, It's not eating all the time, there was a period of 
time where we had food then, and we ate it. Then we bought what we could sell, and ate 
it. Is that seafood or crab over 
there? 
One yuan six, Seafood ah, one yuan six to two yuan, per pound. 
Ah. 
Damn, there is seafood there. 
Quite expensive. Right, there 
is, what do you mean there is n't, you can eat whatever you want. 
As long as you have money. 
Um. 
Really. 
We at that time, ate a few meals with them, and later we did n't eat anymore. 
I mainly am alone there they are too lazy to buy, %pw, there's also the host or 
something. 
Oh. Have to wait until six or seven o'clock in the morning and go in a line to buy. Oh. 
Then 
that is a Chinese store. 
Oh it's not a Chinese store, who knows what's going on. 
Fuck, the Americans have that, it's up at six or seven o'clock. 
They wo n't go, the Chinese go buy it, the American store sells it. 
Ah ah ah. Ah ah ah. 
They make money. Oh. 

Chinese stores also have them, but they are more expensive than this. 
Oh. 
Even smaller than that, or something. Oh. 

So just forget it. 
Damn this is good over there, how do you drive out, how long did you drive to the beach? One 
hour and ten minutes. 
Damn damn this is so comfortable. 
Moshi Gou Wai. 
You can go out and play when you have nothing to do. 
Ah. 
But that beach is not good, there's no beach. 
No beach? 
Ah. You can go fishing with them. That's what 
is that? 
You have to have a license for fishing right? 
No. Damn fishing requires 
a license. If it's necessary 
damn it fishing, fishing in the United States, hunting wild ducks and deer. Yeah. 

And also catching crabs and the like, all require license. 
Ah. 
What do you think? 
You're pretty awesome. Hey. 
I 
say there are also Chinese students who go fishing around here, I did not hear them say they are doing license. 
You see where they fished, they fished in secret who knows. 
Generally they all require license. 
Yeah. 
Like hunting and the like all require license. Is 
it that they even have to throw back the fish they fished for? Yeah 
of course. 
If you do n't fish big enough you have to throw it back. 
Yeah. 
Like you eat that crab, then if they do n't catch enough you have to put them back. 
Um. 
And then if you do n't put them back they will catch 
you. 
Oh. Then there's a good thing 
to look at. 
How civilized. Too damn civilized. 
Too damn civilized. 
Oh this. Oh 
gosh. 
Hey you thirty minutes you ca n't call home. 
You ca n't, the United States is a long time. 
Oh. 
Um. 
That's fine, how come I do n't have these thirty minutes, I'll call you for thirty minutes 
too. Right, that's fine, then when will I fill in that, I'll fill in an e-mail and send it over to you. 
OK. 
Um. 
Then I'll fill it in and send it over. 
Oh, right, you can also give it to your classmates. Oh 
I'll call again. 
OK. 
You can also make it official. 
Fuck damn it. 
How come you're so happy? Ah. OK, 
then you 
hurry and get it done for me. OK. It's just a 
bit of 
a shame that you ca n't make it to China. 
Oh, right, what a shame. Hey 
how is your wife now? 
Come over on tenth. Tenth. 
Uh huh. 
Got 
it? Got it. Direct 
Directly 
to your airport? 
Right. 
Transfer how many times? It's 
the same as I came here, one flight, Chicago. 
Oh. 
Atlanta. 
Hey then you you then how is your ticket so cheap, just seven 
hundred dollars? Not much seven hundred, six hundred and 
fifty. Still not much seven hundred. 
A whole six hundred and fifty I think. Now the season is good. 
Fuck. 
They also say that, 
The cheapest one is still five hundred dollars. 
I do n't even believe it. 
% uh Not like 
it. This was when May came? I heard 
about six hundred and fifty before. 
Oh when our classmate ordered at that time, 
At that time he 
He ordered for his wife, his wife was 
Came in August and September 
I 
think. Yeah. That person gave her an offer, at the beginning it 
was 
six hundred and seventy. Yeah. Also from Donghang. Later she quit, it seems she increased the price, it increased 
to over seven 
hundred. 
Yeah. It became your That one, About the same price as yours. 
Yeah. 
Too evil, you were at you were at the Chinese agent's place where did you order or 
where? The agent's place? There's 
one, just Chinese, I, anyway it's Chinese medicine, They're running a tourist agency. What's their name? What's their 
name for a tourist agency? I I 
I'll see. They're doing 
something called Suncoast. One called 
in Florida, Called. 
I do n't know. 
Do n't know? 
It's very cheap damn it. 
That I asked about that 
six-volume 
one. Yeah. Six-volume one it seems it's 
six hundred forty, six hundred forty five. That might be the 
current 
season damn it. Yeah. 
Seasonal. 
Yeah. Ugh damn it. 
Actually this place is six hundred and thirty. 
Oh. 
Added six dollars of that trip to the express transportation. 
And then added that east he said the east still needs six percent of it. Commission. 
What's 
it called? 
How would I know? 
I I do n't know, anyway he wants six percent of the money. 
uh-huh. A total 
of six hundred and fifty I think. 
It's OK. Pretty cheap, 
damn it, cheap. Yeah. Fuck, damn it, I 
spent 
nine hundred and nine hundred and fifty damn it when I came here. 
That 
Nine hundred and sixty. 
Who let you buy it in the United States damn it. 
I do n't know. 
Yeah, at that time it was also At 
that time I did n't know, there was no one here, someone helped out. Yeah. I wasted 

so much money, you say. 
Yeah. 
It's fine, anyway I came here. 
Yeah. 
As long as I can make a living here, three hundred yuan is still easy. 
What do you mean by three 
hundred yuan? I'm just saying. 
I I I 
If you can really stay here, you 
you It does n't matter what money, right? 
Just earn a little 
bit. I I'm worried, what will he do when he comes, at least he has to stay for more than a year, and he's free. 
Why? 
I ca n't study now. Have 
n't you taken the exam yet? 
Then I still have to apply. Then 
it's nothing, just work, stupid, damn it, you wo n't let her work and make money. 
Where will she go to work? 
Damn you. 
Do n't talk nonsense, do n't you have any Chinese restaurants or whatnot in 
your town? Damn Chinese restaurants, working, working is so tiring. Damn, 
however tired you are, you, the tuition fee, besides 
even if you do n't tuition fee, even if you, after she comes, in the future she will go, study, have, have scholarship, your money 
is always money. 
But people are idle, they are idle too, really, you, 
If you are bored of money, do n't make it 
for him. Right? 
Yeah. 
Make it 
too much. You you Work part time and you do n't do well when people are bored. Furthermore, Who is not 
comfortable making money, think about it, if 
you are now one month one thousand and two, he comes, 
I estimate that the expenses ca n't increase ca n't increase 
much. 
Yeah. Not much difference. 
At most you are Buy one more insurance. Yeah. 

In this case, 
Saving money is still that much, if he goes to work, he can make one thousand a month, you make ten thousand a year. 
That's also good. Here we 
are, If you do n't study first, you're all working. 
Then what do you do if you 
get caught? He catches him, he's a piece of shit, you you you you you your wife does n't have an identity. 
Right. 
No identity, so no need, ca n't catch him, he's F2, he's a piece of shit. Not 
like you, you're working for the school, 
what can he do after he's caught? Yeah. 
He does 
n't call the most. 
Yeah yeah. 
He ca n't fuck you back. Besides 
no one catches him, I do n't think anyone catches him, do you have a record there? 
No, I do n't know. That's it. 
Is there anyone of yours who works? 
Yes. 
It's not urgent. 
Yeah. Give 
us some money, young 
man. Yeah. 
Money is a good thing. 
We'll see. We'll see when he comes. 
Then he still has to study. 
You did n't 
You did n't talk to him about such tough things did you? 
No. 
Getting a visa is a bit of self preparation, the two of you go through it. 
Ugh for studies 
you just take it easy, one person can study first find a job, then another person works, then 
another person studies. Yeah. Or if 

you two study together, 
there's always a problem with the money and economy. 
Yeah. 
then how come your figure has become thick now 
I do n't know how it is it was probably cold just 
now matured probably 
discovered right 
um no wife to hold it 
hold 
it until it's 
matured um %null how 


big is your place after all you said that small tang small tang 
%null let's see if 
it can drive drive for twenty minutes 
and then go out it's too small 
right it's fine 
it's fine it 
does n't matter to 
you it's fine 
we here this 
way we here this way there's not even a single that 
kind of highway That's fine, if you look outside 
there's one. Is there anything particularly good to see outside? 
I heard that Florida's highway is particularly good. Really? There's 
definitely 
one, there won't be none. I think the ones in 
Toronto are OK. Like us 
here the highways are all broken. 
The roads are probably a little better. 
But, 
That is the surrounding area of the city, these 
Are all pretty broken. 
Oh. 
Many years already, Have no money to repair, that's right, it's 
not very rich. 
What what? 
Just us here in the state, we're not very rich. 
Is n't that your industrial area? 
% er 
I do n't know. 
It's not an industrial district. 
Not not. 
Not? Not 
very developed. 
We have a McGrady here. 
McGrady is here with us. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
And then that Bush is here with us. 
What does Bush do? 
You just watch that beer advertisement every day. 
Oh I know. 
Beers. I know. 
Bush's headquarter 
is here with us. 
Oh. 
These two big guys are probably relatively rich. 
The rest are just some small guys. 
Uh-huh. 
When are your exams? 
In about twenty days. 
In about twenty days? 
Around December tenth. 
After the exams are you going to come over? 
Right. 
What can you do 
then? Yea. 
I realize I'm really fucking 
confused now, fuck, I do n't know what to do. 
You're starting to get confused again 
right? I'm getting confused again. You're also really 
confused in China, 
I do n't know what to do. 
I'm not confused in China, I live a very fulfilling life everyday, fuck, I ride a few hours' trip everyday. 
You are fucking kidding me, you fucking play mahjong everyday. 
Do n't be like that, I only played for half a year, I played for half a year when I did n't have a job. 
Fuck, half a year is still not enough. Then 
you do n't play everyday. 
I did n't have a job at that time, I had exams. That Chen 
Tao's the head teacher I do n't forget. After 
I worked I did n't did n't go play anymore. 
Think about it I went to Tiananmen they worked there I was so far 
away. Oh. 
I was so tired of riding my bike I did n't have the energy to play mahjong at night. 
Hey Chen Tao always told you. 
Really? 
Said he had never lost to anyone else he lost 
to you. He told me then I came over, came came we were together again. He he seemed to 
have been in the army. 
Divided into that the army that what the army I think it 
was. It's sick, is he not coming out? 
How did he come out, you did n't apply for it. He fucking 
asked me to pay for a school application fee, it did n't work. Ah. 
Oh. 

Hang in there, damnit. It 
should be easy for him to get out 
of 
that college entrance exam. No. How come 
he 
ca n't get a score? Oh. He's doing that nuclear 
physics, there's fucking no key here. 
Right right right, there's very few people doing this here. Ugh, 
put some hard work into it, he's not a fucking stupid brain, think about it, he even got the postgraduate degree and went to Peking University, that's fucking awesome. Yeah right. I did n't even fucking 
get to 
take the exam for Peking University. 
Yea yea, people like him, I think it's 
not easy to get the 
exam from that kind of poor 
place. That's right, your Nubian 
is just English damnit. Ugh, I'm getting old, the kid is also so old. Really? 
Now 
you're thinking about it, oh 
he's back home right? No, just at 

that Peking, I think it's Changping. 
At Changping, divided into Changping. Yea. My wife picked him 
up. 
My wife wo n't come over, 
my wife is very active in doing business. Fuck. Ah what 
are 
you going to do with the treatment 
that's right I ca n't figure it 
out damn 
it this is too profound damn it 
ah 
I do n't know I do n't understand 
there are advantages and disadvantages of having a home 
damn 
it hide hide 
in the train 
the train is not there right 
so tortuous 
damn it oops oops oops 

how long have you been calling have you paid attention 
to the 
time 
um no he's 
stuck here with you Yea you 
when the time comes he will he will make a sound to speak. 
Oh. 
OK then just keep on chatting. 
Then keep on chatting. 
I think it wo n't be three hours, three hours is quite long. 
How long have 
we been 
chatting? Hiding. 
Hiding. You're 
quite interesting now 
ha. You're the one who's 
interesting. I remember you used to 
I remember you used to be really really 
dumb. 
Really? 
You ca n't say anything, no no way. 
You think so? 
I'm quite that kind of person. 
Yeah I feel a lot better now. Yeah 
OK it's fine as long as you feel good. That's not 
like the damn law at that time right? Ugh. Fuck 

how would I give you that impression. Hey 
hey what are you doing doing experiments now, hey I'm joking. 
No. Ah? Not 
doing it? 
No I do n't want to do it. 
What are you doing in China 
here? You that what what particle what crap. 
Guan. 
Particle 
wiring. Particle 
earplugs. Particle 
switch. Ah 
not doing that. Not doing 
it again? 
Just that, too lost. 
Ah you now you now what does the boss do for you now, damn 
I thought at that time, if you do it 
damn it. Oh my god. 
Damn it then, Nobel? 
You do n't want Nobel, you just 
Open a small company and at the beginning the stock price will rise up. 
That's 
right. It's going up so high 
for sure. Now doing that Ye Jing. Going 
to Ye Jing again? 
Ah Ye Jing is not bad. 
No no. 
What single image what mess ha. 
What single image. 
Ha forget it I'm terrible at this we do n't understand. This is 
do n't know do n't talk 
nonsense. Still working on that thing. 
Still working on. However 
just still using that method. 
Ah then go to other places. Yeah 
but use that high-end one to go up. 
Oh. Polymer. Yeah. 
Yeah. 

Not bad. 
Hey yesterday I called Zhang Xiaodong. Hey 
what is his phone number I do n't have his number now. 
Phone number wait a minute. 
That seven 
one 
three. 
Seven 
one 
three. 
nine eight eight Nine eight eight Nine one two five Nine one two five. Yeah. 
How is he now, is he quite good with his wife? 
That should n't be a problem 
right? I called first, first I went to pick up his wife. 
Oh. 
Then I said give me a missed to miss account. 
Oh. 
Then now, oh 
I heard he is Wang Shuang. 
Oh. 
I estimate they will only be doing it together. 
What do you mean to say, they will only 
be doing it 
together. Fuck. Fuck. Who else? 
That's it, no one else. 
Ah? 
There's no one else. Damn. 
Damn, don't 
scare me, I'm going to have a baby. Really. 
Oh 
gosh. 
Ah, then you. 
Hey, how are your dad and mom? 
My dad and mom are fine. 
I estimate they're doing pretty good, but they miss me so damn much, they're all probably thinking of that. Really? Then they 
have 
to go back next year. 
Let's see. 
Now they have this, they have this plan for 
the 
beginning of the year. Yeah. I heard eh I heard they say that it used to be booked for more than eight dollars as return tickets. 
There is. 
Right? 
Yeah just book the South Korea one. 
Right. 
However the South Korea one that one, The information is not very good. 
Oh. 
Just whether the information is good or not is fine, just go back and that's fine. No. Just 
the insurance system or whatever is n't very good. 
Oh oh. 
There is that kind of consideration. This week we, 
Xiaotian and I have a friend who's going back. That is just 
just that Lin Yu ah, she went back and booked the South Korea one. Yeah. She 

also came back without 
any worries. um there wo n't be too much too much trouble that 
is there must be a few a few hundred people there what's to be afraid 
of 
that is there are so many 
people 
there with you exactly ah Lin Yun she has already been back hello 
what did you talk to Zhang Yandong about what is he doing now 
he did n't did n't talk to him much 
he's about to graduate how 
come there's nothing to talk about calling a good good finally made a phone call hello I 
I I want to talk he he he does n't want to talk 
really that 
guy is quite interesting 
he's in Shenzhen um 
um 
I 
think later he will never call me again I I have 
a period I know his phone number. Yeah. 

If he does n't move I remember Zhang Zhang Zhang Yiming can work it out. Yeah. 

He said Zhang Yiming needs to contact me. 
Yeah. 
I fucking think, If 
I come we ca n't just, 
I did n't contact him, he did n't ask me. Yeah. 

He studies at U 
G. Still in Texas right? Right. U 
G 
is still a little out. U 
G but but now it wo n't work either. 
However, 
Right, it wo n't work now, it wo n't work now. That 
that that that you see Youji is fine, everyone thinks it's fine, I say, all all study Youji, as a result Too many Youji are not ok. 
Right. 
Too many Youji people now. 
Yeah. 
However, now it seems that the analysis is quite good. 
Right. 
The analysis is very good. 
Furthermore if you study a master, 
That's not bad. Yeah. 
There 
are also a lot of people who want a master now. 
Yeah. 
People with Ph D damn it they do n't dare to ask for it, once they ask for it they pay four or five thousand to get a job for them. 
Right, the talents 
of 
the 
leaders. Ah? The leaders. That is. 
Our classmates are now going out, ah no our classmates just here we have a few a few Ph D Ph D going out. 
Um. 
One one um one year salary is only three thousand. 
Ah ah ah. 
And then slowly turning towards the higher 
education. Damn it it's a temporary 
job. 
Um. Ah temporary. 
Right. 
That has green cards 
right? Right they have green cards. 
Right, no green cards damn it is more difficult. Damn it 
just like us. 
Um. 
Hurry up and find a damn pretty girl to get married. 
Find an old lady. 
Damn it dying fast ha? 
Um. 
Damn 
it damn it. 
Compared 
to one by one it's miserable. I'm going to kill him. You're not studying for high school right, eh high school damn it I do n't know where now. 
I do n't know, I will not have any information after I come here. 
How many years, I think it's already five years. There must 
be. 
Right. 
The main reason is that their connections are not close enough when they are in China damnit. Yeah. 
Hey 
this guy damnit 
Damn he did n't get a green card right? I 
think it's about the same. 
Right. Aye 
sixty has passed, eh about the same. That's it. 
About 
the same. Oh 
no no no no. 
He left in the summer of the second year right? 
Right. 
That was in April or something. This 
green card was given in ninety 
one right? It 
was in the 
year 
of ninety and it was before April. Ninety ninety 
and April, oh then there was n't any. Did n't catch up with that bunch? 
No, um he left in summer. 
Almost, yes. Yeah. He He 
left 
in summer, 
he left in winter, anyway Either he just caught up with him or he did n't 
catch up. I 
think so. But I remember he wrote us a letter then, he did n't say he took the green card 
either. 
He No, no. Right, then then 
then he did n't take it. 
Did n't take it. 
He was quite confused then, now he might be lost in thinking. 
Ugh. 
God did n't give us a way out fuck. 
Hey how is the temperature over 
there over there? Ah 
it's fine. Currently these two days it's 
a little warmer. 
Is there snowing? Oh it was a little snowy a while ago. 
Not too big. That day 
was pretty cold. 
Hey, hey how is your computer doing now? You try to tell me something like I P something digital something crap. 
Do you know? 
I do n't know much. Oh 
I guess you have learned that software, learned something language. Learned 
something internal structure. Then I just 
I I I am very smart. 
Yeah. 
Oh. Just 
knowing it blindly. Just knowing 
a little crap about it blindly. Oh 
guessing blindly. Oh. Damn. That the 
address 
of 
the I. 
P. is that one that has a what's it called? 
I know now, you do n't have to explain it to me now. 
Ah ah. 
I, we are all smart. 
One does n't know and two do n't know? Oh. That will 

you do a home page? Home page that that 
crap damn it just go in 
and find a code and learn. Right right 
right. 
I do n't know how to do it now. 
Of course I heard them say that, because 
they treated me a bit, 
I um um what's wrong. Um. 
We do n't play that thing about drawing pictures now. 
Really. 
Oh this is true. 
You can you can learn something that's true, first learn something that's 
true first. Um. 
That thing is it, you enter that that net script, 
you type that sauce, all 
the sauce codes come out. 
Um. 
So you follow that, then fucking write it 
down. Right right, there's a kind of language. 
It's said that it's easy to learn, if you have other CONCEPTS. With 
that. Um. Pretty, 
very simple, very simple. 
If there's none, right? Yeah. 
You're 
pretty 
smart and quite fluent now, but you No 
I I 
I I have n't done it myself, I have n't done it myself. Ah ah. 

But I know how to do it. 
Oh. 
Get one, get your big name in that network and then Yeah. 

Find a job or something, right? Aye? Such a 
smart 
person you say. 
Exactly. 
Post a post, 
let them see it. Right. Hey you 
you 
where do you post those articles in China? 
I have n't said it yet. Damn 
you said three days, sleeping and trying 
to lay eggs, it's 
not out yet. 
Oh no. 
No, one of them will be out soon, I estimate this month or next 
month it will be out. Will it be sent over to you after it's out right? 
It wo n't send it over to me, 
it went over to my boss. 
Damn, you let your boss send it, crap, that's your achievement. 
Little 
guy, sent it over, translated it into English. 
Aye. 
Then sent it. 
Why translate it into English, it was originally English. Damn, you think I 
wrote it in English, are you pretty awesome? That's 
right, damn, it was published in English magazine. Oh. Then can't you 
use 
Chinese to publish it? Fuck. Is it 
foreign 
to you now? 
Of course, fuck, didn't I say that people are 
fucking. That's just right, then it's just right to send it out, 
you can, In the future 
when writing that resume, Just tap it up. 
What do you mean write a resume in the future, I'm currently writing a resume. Fuck. 
Fuck. Already 
wrote it up. 
Fuck. 
What's the use of writing a resume now? 
That boss, he said he's going to apply for a scholarship with me. 
To Canada. If it 
works it's fucking beautiful. Then you eat now, 
eat eat eat how do you eat? You that have have have, you 
participate in that what. Do it yourself, do it yourself. 
No more? No more plan? No no, we 
we 
are at that. Just do it yourself. Our department 
is 
like 
this, our department damn it, there's a common room, that is inside a room there's a lot of 
laboratory 
rooms, there's a 
microwave oven 
inside. I do it myself. 
Hello. Hey, Yan Yifan. Hey, Xiaoming. Still sleeping? No, I did n't sleep well last night, I just had breakfast and said I would sleep for a while. 
You talked about this phone call yesterday, what happened, I still do n't understand. No, 
I, I have already, er, pressed that agree to record, because It 
only has one minute, just, er, to discuss with you whether it can record, I think I told you this evening, I think it does n't matter, just talk 
nonsense. It just said 
to do that language research for the the university of Pennsylvania. 
Oh. 
There are many languages, such as Chinese, Chinese, Chinese, Korean, Korean, Vietnamese, and so on. 
Japanese, Korean, French, and so on. 
Oh, oh, oh, oh. 
So many, then, anyway, just do n't talk about it if you do n't want to. Oh, oh, oh. That %pw, did Chen Zhengqin 
not ask you 
to do that? I think one minute is going to pass, so I'll just press it and let it go. 
Right. 
Oh, oh, oh, no, yesterday Xie Jianjian asked me what it was, I said I did n't understand what it was. Oh. 
That 
is. I did 
n't, did n't, did n't, did n't understand it, because yesterday Xie Jianjian was busy. There 
is a university, yes, it's Bingzhou University, not our university. 
Uh-huh. 
It wants to do that voice research, research and whatnot. 
Oh, oh, oh. 
And then it gives you thirty minutes free of charge to talk in mother language. 
Oh, oh. 
And then, uh, 
then I just, I think I just have to do it. 
Oh, oh, do you agree or not, I wonder if this agrees, I wonder what things are there, it does n't matter. 
Ah, it will listen, it will 
just listen to our recording, right? 
Right. 
Then do that language research, or something like that. 
Oh. 
Oh, oh. 
That, he will record it. 
Oh, really? 
Yes. 
Oh. 
How are you? I last time, % er, I found Yao Lixin's phone last night, she is also with you, right? 
Right, right, right. 
Last night, I 
saw her last week. 
Really? 
She, she, she seems to have 
given birth to a daughter. 
Really? 
It seems that she probably, 
How many months, two months, or three months, I do n't know. Right, 
the younger one, the younger one, you should say that the younger one is really fast, that is, he said he was in a hurry to find a boyfriend at that time, he even has a kid now. 
Right. 
Right, when he first came, he told me that he did n't have a wife, and then, 
Oh, you, you said that he just arrived in Florida? Right. 

Really? 
Ah, and he said that he saw 
his wife at a Chinese store a while ago. 
Oh. 
Because it does n't live in a place 
like 
ours. Uh-huh. Another beach. 
Oh. 
Because we do n't have one beach here, for example, it's a beach in Boston, or something, or a beach in Delaware, or 
something, it lives in another place. One beach is just one, uh, uh, 
that kind of, um, residential area 
or something. Right, no, because we do n't live along the coast. 
Uh-huh. 
It just follows the coast from north to south, it's like this, one beach, one beach, down to Miami. 
Oh. 
Then she was there talking, alas, and she told him that he, he has a wife, and said that on the night of the new year. I said that 
his wife came, and said that she was in the north, originally it seemed that she was in the school. 
Oh. 
Then, 
After a while, she said that his wife was pregnant. 
Then, after a while, she said that Xiaohua was born. I said that on the night of the 
new year, what was going on, I said, This is 
fast. Aye, that's 
right. Um, 
uh, how are you? 
It's fine, probably there's still one more, five weeks, probably. 
Really? 
Right, I am still tired, I feel so tired, it's so annoying. 
Also happy. Oh. Ugh. Ugh, 
going 
to 
work, it's so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, 
so, so, so, 
so, so, so, so, so, 
so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, 
so, so, so, so, so, 
so, 
so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, 
so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, 
so, 
so, so, so, so, so, so, 
so, so, so, so, so, so, 
so, so, 
so, so, so, so, so, 
so, 
so, 
so, so, so, so, so, so, 
so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, 
so, 
so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so, so Then you gave birth and left? Right, gave birth and left, some people left in January. Uh-huh. And then I told her, I said I was not ok, I said I was going to have a baby in this place, she said in February. 
Then, 
The latest batch was probably before March first, anyway, it was, Oh. 
It 
was moved all before February end in February. 
Oh, just the whole company was moved through like this? 
Right, it was moved through about 
eight hundred people. 
Why is that? Then why not build a branch company there? I think it is more waste of money to move 
like this. Uh-huh. 
He thinks it is saveable, because he, he thinks that after this size is closed, Uh-huh. 
He 
will, 
he will save some expenses every year, and he also has a lot of many, uh, empty houses in the Austin size over there. 
Oh. He just 
wants to fix 
it, 
because the I. B. M. used to be very big, now it seems 
to be, approximately, the spending is getting smaller and smaller. 
Oh. 
And then he just, Maybe 
save some over there. Right, 
he also saves some, he, anyway he calculated it, he said it could save a lot of money. 
Oh. 
It's three three, I do n't know how their those budget is so cool. 
Really? I think, I think that place is quite good. Oh, 
forget it, Austin. I, I have 

been there, oh, my cousin is there. 
Really? 
Oh. 
Oh. 
That, %pw, do you want to talk on the phone, if you have something to 
talk, %pw. Oh, 
OK. Oh, 
wait 
a minute. 
Where is he? 
He is at, it's called Rund Rock, he drives there. 
Oh, Rund Rock, OK. 
He bought a house there. He 
bought a house, he will drive for about fifteen to twenty minutes to go to work. Uh-huh. Uh-huh, 

I mean where is he working? 
Oh, 
he is in that, what is that university called? 
UT. 
Right, right, UT. 
OK. 
He works there. 
Oh. 
And then, %pw, %pw, he, his, %pw, the husband is, graduated, working in a health department in that government. 
Oh. 
So they are quite good, just like SETTLE, this kind of work does n't need to worry about getting fired or something. Is 
that so? 
Uh-huh. 
It's just that the income is not too high, but the treatment is also very good. 
Is 
that so? It's very stable. 
I know, John Rock, because we have been there, we went to the trip, I have n't been to Austin yet. 
Really? 
Right, he, the IBM anyway rented an airplane, no, he 
asked his family, anyway, each family went to have a look, whether they liked it or not, whether they were willing to go or not, and so on. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
We probably are, I was probably more than a month ago, almost 
two 
months. Um. 
Um. Went there for a while. 
Oh, do you think it's good there?% Er, 
it's OK. 
Really? I said that I had a good impression of that place, but I just thought that place was a little hot. 
Really? 
Oh, but this city,% 
er, anyway, anyway, I came from Houston, I think it's also a 
big and small city with Houston. 

Oh. 
Right. 
I think it seems that its size is a little smaller than Houston, it's still quite good. 
Right. 
It's much smaller. 
Oh. 
It is not very big, it is developing very fast now, because it, for example, three M, Um. There 
are 
also some, um, 
Like 
C C, like IBM, there are many big companies. Right. So 
it 
is developing. You have to, %pw, I will call 
you first. 
Ah. It is five one two. Uh-huh. Oh, right, 
five 
one two, 
two 
one eight. Uh-huh. Four 
seven 
two 
eight. 
Uh-huh. What is the name? 
Uh-huh. 
My cousin is called Lu Ying. 
What Lu? 
Lu, Lu is that, uh, turtle, Lu, the Lu with 
the surname Lu. 
Oh, the Chinese character seems to be a poem. It's just a poem of 
a tree and a horizontal body below it. Uh-huh, uh-huh. Poems are right, right, right. Oh. Yin is that the Yin of 
the tiger and the goat. Oh, oh, oh. 
One 
is the grass, the head, 
and the head 
of a rabbit, and the 
jade below it. Oh, the Yin of the 
tiger and the goat. Uh-huh. I 
think 
it's the Yin of the word tiger and the word the goat. 
Oh, no. Ha, ha, 
why did you talk about this name? Uh-huh. 
Yin. 

Uh-huh. 
I think that's the one of that fire and fire city. It's 
not like this already, there seems to be another 
one. There are two times fire on it, probably. 
Right. 
That, % er, finished, his husband's name is Zhang Yue. 
The engineer Zhang Yue is the one who made the appointment for the month of March three and May three, the month of March three. 
Ah, ah, ah. 
They have two sons. 
Really? 
Ah, they, 
The oldest is older than Yang Yang, I think he's two, two or three years old, the second is one year older than Yang Yang. 
Really? 
Yes. 
Oh. 
It's also divided, it's almost 
open to you, probably. Right, they 
seem, they seem, they, uh, have they been there for a long time? 
Right, well, Zhang Yue just went there, especially going to school, he had n't left there at all. 
Uh-huh. 
Then, uh, they just, 
The whole family was just there, they, and there were very few travelers, they just stayed there. 
Really? 
Oh. 
Oh. 
Right, they were there for really many years. 
Oh, I have n't heard you talk about this cousin of yours, she was in Mississippi at that time. 
Really? 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh, I did n't mention her 
much. Right, very, no, it's not very close either, is she your cousin or? She's 
my cousin. 
Oh, right. 
She's my biological cousin, and when we were young, we grew up together, in Beijing, I was born in Beijing. She's 
your mother's family? 
Right, my uncle's child. 
Oh, oh, oh. 
Uh-huh. 
Oh, last time I did n't hear you say anything, so are you guys doing well now? 
Oh, quite well. 
Quite well, is it cold over there? Right, 
well, it was snowing heavily before Thanksgiving. 
Really? 
It was one th of July, so thick, and 
then, it was very hot. I'm almost done with the drawing now. 
Last year, last year I heard that it was freezing over there. Oh. 

It seems that I'm used to it now, a little. It's 
going to snow, right? I felt 
so 
bad the other day, I felt like I ca n't stand it, 
so now it seems that I'm better. 
That 
one, uh, that one, uh, Zheng Hongming and the others came to our place. 
Really? 
Probably, uh, let me see, on November tenth, just that day, he, he 
originally, that was Friday, he originally said that he would come to our place to play on Saturday. 
Uh-huh. 
Later Di Xia said, you come on Friday, there will be a ballet, a ballet group from Central Ballet to perform at our place tonight. Uh-huh. Later 
they 
said, OK, then they rushed to come here after the night, after the night shift. Is that so? 

Oh, they, they, uh, Wu Xia's father is here. 
Right, Wu Xia's father has been here for a long time. 
Really? He just, he just because, uh, he's pregnant, uh, he has a big brother, right? 
Right. 
Uh-huh. 
He just let his father come, as a result his father has n't left, he's about to leave, and he has a second son, he said he would 
just, just let him stay for a while, and then, He helped her to take care of 
the second child, 
and then left. He and the two kids seemed 
to be very close. They 
have n't been born yet, they might be a little later than you. 
Right? 
Yes. 
He, he, his oldest son seems to be very close too, the oldest son and the second son, right? 
Right, his oldest son, uh, he said it was a birthday on the day of the halloween, 
he was just one year old. That is, he just said to keep him close, so he kept him close to raise his son. 
Right? His, his oldest son is, is, 
is a boy, I think. 
Right, they, he said there were two boys, there were two boys, two boys. 
Right? 
Uh-huh. 
Oh. 
The big one looks like a little Zheng Hongmin. 
Right? 
He looks exactly the same. 
Then, uh, when Wu Xia came to your place, it was already, it was already 
more than seven months ago, right? 
Right. 
Probably, I 
think he was probably one month late. 
Oh. 
One, two, February. Right? 
I 
ca n't tell. He, 
uh, he, uh, is Wu Xia still running that computer shop now? No, he, he, because, 
Because she 
did n't want to have these two kids first. And she said she went to a new place first, but she was not familiar with 
it. Oh. 
She, she, originally her father came to help her. To 
help her carry the kids, probably. 
Right, right, to help her carry the kids. At first the shop had it, later she probably, she at first just said, 
I do n't know, I did n't ask her much. It seems that she was carrying the kids in 
the back, and if she carried the kids again, she might have helped her dad or something. 
Right. 
Then she later found a partner. 
Uh-huh. 
Then that, that, 
that is the two of them did it together. 
Oh. 
And then she left, that that store was still in the part two when she 
left. Oh. 
Right? Yes. Oh. 
She, that 
Anyway, she said it was quite a pity, that she left like this, but 
Right, her store was open, it seemed, it seemed that she heard Wu Xia say that it seemed that 
it 
was um, Not 
bad. 
Right. Anyway, she came to our place to walk around for a while, 
took them around to that computer store. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
She said,% uh, some of those things are much more expensive than what I sold, she said. 
Right? 
Oh, she said, 
% er, things I sell, some of them are cheaper than Walmart, he said. 
But he, I do n't know how is the market of that city he's in now. 
But he, he knows that if he is in our city, the market is definitely good, because there is a university. 
Uh-huh. 
Ugh, who knows about them. 
Oh. 
He, anyway, he does n't think about it now, he will think about it after he has a baby first. 
Right, these two kids are just, they 
have to be dragged, I'm now, I'm so worried about the second one, I do n't know what to do. His mother will come on the sixteenth of next month. 
Oh, really? 
Right. 
She's happy that she has a grandson. Actually 
she had one last time, but she might feel different. She,% er, 
Not 
that Xiao-Qi's brother had a son, had a grandson last time, 
Right, she, because she has a, she has a, % er, % er, she has an old lady there. 
Right. 
She probably feels that she ca n't fit in. She actually, 
I do n't know her. 
Ah? 
I think she probably has a feeling that she ca n't fit in. 
Right, so she's now, This is 
very, very happy, I do n't know him, anyway, I have n't seen him yet. Ah. Ah, 

a little. 
Anyway, it's good that he came, you saw him last time, right? 
Oh, yes, I saw him. 
This is very urgent, I have nothing to do here. 
Ah. 
However, it's better to have something to do now. 

I think it will be better, in addition, if he retires, he will find peace if he retires for a long time. Really? You see, did n't he just retire at 
that time? 
Right, maybe. He just retired, right, and now he 
is I 
was worried that I 
would die. 
I did not know what to do. 
Uh-huh. 
Um, we, I went to that, uh, 
Austin last time, and then, uh, 
how come I ran for two days and bled a little. 
Really? 
Yes, and then I ran to the emergency room and stayed there. 
You were in, uh, Austin? 
Yes, and it was so scary. And then he said, 
Really? He 
said that my %pw, I mean, what is it called? %pw, 
uh-huh. 
No, it was called a fetal miscarriage. 
Oh. 
A little, I mean, it was too low, 
it was a little, um, called, um, the thing called the front disk. 
Oh, oh. 
So it caused a little, 
a little bleeding, um, bleeding or something like that. The doctor said that I had to live in the hospital. Um, 
um. 
I think that now, probably, 
I do n't know, the doctor said, Um. 

I have seen it, if you block it too much, probably this kid will be called as broken. Probably. 
Oh, really? 
Right. He told me, I asked him what reason caused it, and what. Um. 

He asked me about it, he said, you probably because there are too many abotian tests. 
Oh. 
Too many abotian tests, um, the 
fetus is in that, 
the position of the bed on the 
fetus is not too 
good. 
Um. This affects its growth and things like that. 
Oh. 
So, alas, I do n't know either, probably. 
Really? 
Right, probably if it wo n't work. There 
wo n't be any problem 
with the fetus. If it wo n't work, then 
this is probably then, Then, the fetal malformation is generally two weeks in 
advance. Right, he wants to see, he, I, probably, in two more weeks. 
I heard 
so. 
Um. He will go there again to do a full check, to see if the, um, the fetal position is blocked. 
Um. 
Is it good? If 
it's not good, then, it 
must be, um. Opened, 

if he is, just 
a little blocked, or if the position is okay, and he can still give birth 
to babies, he 

will say, Um. Let him give birth to babies himself. 
Oh, if it's not ok, then, um, um. Then, I 
will do a 
full check. Right, it wo n't work, then, 
uh-huh. 
Oh gosh, there are things like this, that are terrible. Who is 
that, uh, my, my cousin, Is in Canada, she 
gave birth to two two-part fetuses for the first fetus. 
Uh-huh. 
The second, the second time, uh, the second time she gave birth to the baby, it was about one year, no, the second time she gave birth to the baby, it was about one year and a little more, three or four months. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. 
The second time, 
she did n't, did n't have full moon, she suddenly bled and something like that, she 
was sent to hospital for a birth and birth. 
Right, she is also, I think she is also a pregnant woman. After that, 
she, after that, she 
was only, only four pounds left. Is that so? Moreover, the hospital 

did n't stay, there were no clients, so she went home. 
She said that now the third child is about the same age as the oldest, the oldest son and the second son. 
She said that because she was the oldest son and the second son, she did n't breast-feed herself, the third son 
breast-fed 
herself. Is that so? Right, she said. 
No, she has one double-pregnancy fetus and one single one, probably they are different. The double-pregnancy fetus, because, there are two kinds of nutrition. Right. Ah. Is that so? No idea why 
he is, 
um, 
killing 
his daughter alone. It's true, it's true, it's true. 
I heard you talked to him last time, he said he was pregnant again, I did n't know at 
that time. It's almost the same. Um, 
it seems that he has n't given birth or something. 
Oh, he is probably a little, too. They also talked about one, that is, if you, 
Too close to each other. Um. It 
will 
also lead to this preterm and post-partum, because you just, the uterus just, 
Oh. It 
has n't recovered much yet. 
It has n't recovered much yet, yes, they are, Right. 
Why 
do people say, after having a baby, it will take half a year, one year later to get pregnant, and then, after the job is finished, it will take one year and half a year? 
Uh-huh. That 
is exactly the reason. That is, I am afraid that he will, 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh, because the uterus has been injured. 
Uh-huh. 
Because when he is threatened, he, 
He has to find a 
place where he feels safe. Uh-huh. 

If he feels those places are not safe, he will find a place, find a 
Change of place, he will 
Right. 
He will be affected, or something like that. Uh-huh. 

The doctor told me, 
She even said the picture after I finished writing it. At first I did n't know what she was talking about. I only knew the individual. Like this kind of 
medical things, who knows? 
Oh. 
Later I realized, later she again 
Right. 
Came back here and called her brother, but her brother did n't learn this. Oh, too. 
Right, right. 
I completely understood what was happening. 
Oh. 
Is Chen Chen 
happy now? He is 
OK. At first he was n't very happy. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
I think there seems to be another one, he said that after a while it seems to be 
the same. 
The big umbrella that he wore just now 
called 
you? Right. You do n't look like him, I think. 
I told him, I said I 
was 
at. Uh huh. 
With that, With your dad at the garage. 
Uh 
huh. Then he was upstairs 
reading or doing 
something. 
Uh huh. He thought I was downstairs. 
Oh. 
He just called out with an old voice, actually I was just next to him. 
Oh. 
I am upstairs, our mom is upstairs, upstairs. I did not hear her, it was called dad or mom, I did not hear clearly. 
Oh. 
Uh-huh. 
She, she ran upstairs, I think it might be my phone. Ah. 
She, 
She 
seems to have glasses now, she still walks 
with the glasses towards the deep. 
Really? 
Yes, it was four hundred, now it is more than five hundred, almost six hundred. 
Oh. 
So, do you usually wear glasses 
all the time? Yes. 
Oh. 
I do n't know what happened to her, it's useless to worry. Is there any solution for 
the Chinese doctor? He saw that, he went 
to there, this 
summer he went back to get the acupuncture and the tumor. 
It does n't work either. 

It does n't work either, then the doctor suggested that, the eyes are related to the skin and stomach, they need to be treated. 
That's true, uh, yes, I think it must be related to the body. 
Right, we should also give her a tumor treatment, uh. In China it 
seems, I remember it seems that there was a thing that people ate, ate lamb liver or something. Right, 
eating lamb liver, carrots, and other things, 
he said,% uh, the 
doctor said, also suggested that he should n't get angry with him. 
I said, who would get angry with him? 
He should be happy, and other 
things. 
Uh huh. Oh, 
I said. Then he is, he still reads too much, reads too much. Right, 
I think he probably just, 
He plays the computer 
too much. Reading books and other 
things, causing that 
I do n't know, I will wait until she sees it, if the doctor does n't work, then it's just um, take 
a 
tactical tactics, or take an operation in the future, or something like that. 
Oh. Then 
Zhong Hongming also said, he said, 
he did n't even wear glasses when he went to school, he wore glasses after work. Zhong Hongming? 
That is, 
oh, he, he said that he used too many computers. Right, 
I also think it may be like this. 
Oh, about his glasses, I now, I mean, he does n't have anything else, he is quite good in all aspects. 
Um. 
He is anxious, he is now one meter and fifty. 
Is 
that 
so? Right. Then it might be a little higher than Ang Ang's, Ang Ang is now about one meter and forty, I think. 
Is that so? 
Then it was one meter and forty a few months ago, I guess it may be a little higher now, Ang Ang is not strong 
now. 
Is 
that 
so? Oh. Then eighty-nine pounds, right? That eighty-nine pounds seems to be a few weeks ago. Ah, haha, %pw, is that so? 
Uh-huh. That Chen 
Zhen 

is 
eighty-three pounds, eighty pounds, oh, Chen Zhen is now also 
Is 
that 
so? Uh-huh. It's also very strong, it seems that he is about to develop, or something like that. Is that so? 

Right, it seems 
that one. It may be 
almost the same. It is also quite edible, and that one. 
Oh. 
What is that called? 
Um. 
It 
seems that that ass is bulging. 
Ah. 
You always say that, 
hey, your daughter's ass is bulging, and there is still some problem, right? 
I say, what problem is there? 
She says, she says, is 
it that her ass is bulging, and she does n't want to bulge in the front? 
I say, I do n't know. There 
is a curve. Right, 
right. 
Her ass is bulging now, and 
Oh, that is probably about the same, in the United States the kids will probably be a bit earlier, then I think they will probably be faster. 
Right. 
Really? 
Yes. 
I do n't know either, I said I said I said, anyway now it seems to be quite, quite 
heavy, before I always thought he was thin and chubby. Yes. 
Now 
it seems to be a little heavier. 
Oh. 
Little 
Ming, Qiu Tianye is there. 
Oh. 
Qiu Tianye that Um. 
Is 
working downstairs. 
Is that so? 
Right, that 
we, are going to 
have a store. 
What? 
There was one, I said there was one shop, it closed two days ago. 
Um. 
Oh. 
After it closed, there was a bed for doing that Sample, 
a baby bed. 
Oh. 
At UnSale. Uh-huh uh-huh. 
UnSale, they 
bought it back in the time. Bought it back because it was doing that kind of Sample, it had a little space, the air in it was n't good. 
Oh. 
Oh. 
Then the time it was at a Grudge to do air-shares, I was just helping her there. 
Ah. 
Then helped her do it, later I said, oh, I said I would lie down for a while and then get sleepy. 
Uh-huh. 
Ah. 
I just ran up 
here. Ah. Now 
I am just buying these things, because I do n't do n't want to buy new ones, you know, because there is only one of 
these. Uh-huh. 
Oh. 
Right. 
I have to spend a lot of money to buy new ones. 
Right. 
I do n't know yet. And 
you still have to move house. 
Right, I want to. 
Some things, 
actually, you. 
But moving house is fine, moving house anyway he will move, he will pack. Oh, oh. They will pack them all, move them all, and after that, if you move them to 
somewhere else, 
they will move them to somewhere else, if you do n't want to move them, they will give you that 
Three month that storage free. 
Oh. No, I think things there are probably cheaper than Florida. 
Really? 
Oh, I have this feeling. 
The tax is high there. 
Really? Eight 
and a quarter. 
Really? I do n't know how much the tax is. 
The tax is eight point two five, many people buy them here. 
Really? 
Right, after buying them, they ask IBM to move them there. 
Oh, then it is possible, just because the tax is high, but I think the things were OK at that time, and it seems that the food was not. The food he 
ate was cheap. 
Right, it seems that the food was not, not. Not tax. The food was 
not tax. 

You are too noisy, go quickly. 
That, 
%pw, OK. Dixiao went to St. Louis last night. 
Really? 
Had a meeting. 
Oh. 
He came back in the evening. You 
are talking about the two of them, right? Right, 
they are both talking, I said you should go, they are talking here. 
That, your Yangyang is now in the last Uh-huh. 
Not yet, I did not send him there. 
OK. 
Um, because, um, at this time, I was really busy, um, I was afraid that he would get sick if I sent him to kindergarten. 
Uh-huh. 
If he gets sick, then, um, 
that old lady can still take him, she can take him till the end of this year, I think I will send him tomorrow in January. At that time, I was 
not very busy, he could get sick if he wanted to. Oh. Uh-huh. Now I do n't, do n't want him to be too, um, Is that so? Um, because if you send him to kindergarten, he will definitely get sick first. Right. 
Ah. 
Right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, 
right, 
right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, 
right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, 
right, right, 
right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, 
right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, 
right, 
right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, right, 
You know that photo, didn't she 
have one with Chen Zheng? Oh. With, it seemed that she was holding it this way, you know. Uh-huh, uh-huh. Originally she had been putting it in her photo album. Uh-huh. Later she put it in 
the back. Really? Because she, wasn't her kid, is 
she now old, and the kid came to 
see her. Right, he wants to come and play. Uh-huh. He 
saw her 
photo and asked, who is this, your boyfriend? She said, no, no, no, no, she is my friend, she asked twice, I suddenly found out once, uh, I said, Chen 
Zheng. Uh-huh. 
Why did you put this photo behind that one? It was not 
um, 
could n't you have put the photo in double? Uh-huh, uh-huh. 
Oh, he 
said, people always asked me, I said, people who asked said, it was not clear. Later, 
I said, 
I said, what are you afraid of? I said, are you still young? Uh-huh. 
He 
said, no, mommy, it does n't matter. He said, he said, it would be fine if I knew, he said, it would be so troublesome if people asked. He said, he still, still cares 
about it. 
Oh. Right, 
nowadays kids probably all ask about it, and they say, oh, what kind of person is this, what is he doing? Right. Then 
they 
will definitely ask. Right, 
that day, Wei, Wei had a son. 
Uh-huh. 
He also often came to play, they later went to New York. 
Oh. 
He even came. 
Oh. 
He went out to play, and people said, uh, Linda, 
who is this guy? He said, 
he said, he said it was his cousin. 
Oh, really? Right. 
He 
did n't say it. Then 
I said, why did you say that? 
They do n't talk this way, they talk nonsense. 
Then that, then that boy, that boy can also understand, that boy should laugh. Right, 
that boy knows, they also know. Is 
it right? 
Oh. 
They also know, they said, why do you talk like this, these two boys, these two boys do n't know why, they just agree to talk like this. 
How old is that boy? 
Two years older than him. 
Oh, that's n't very old. 
Right. 
Oh, he, % er, 
they are now in New Jersey. 
Right. 
That, tell them he is, 
% er, named Uh, that branch's Y is 
what's the name again? 
Y is 
for present. Uh, is n't 
it? Ah, 
it's a V. P. then it's not, they anyway, that kind of J. P. 
Morgan's that kind, this kind of company, its that kind. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. This, 
this kind of level. 
Uh-huh. 
Uh-huh. It's 
not very, that is, that Y, it has a lot of V. P. you know? 
That branch has a lot, that is, one branch. It's not 
a branch, it's just that its, its 
name is just called, for example, Uh-huh. 
Like 
we in China just call it, 
for example, 
it's called engineer, then senior engineer, just like this. 
Oh, that's just like that. 
It just says, 
it just jumps up, it's just that one. 
Oh. It's 
just, 
% er, just, just such a level, it's just very nice when it's turned up, it's just called, just, Oh. 


Right. 
It's called V. P. ah, something like that, something like V. P. but, Uh-huh. It's just, uh, uh, 

in this kind of company, we also used to have this, it, it's in its company, it's just, 
Uh-huh. 
In total, it's just 
The lowest floor, I do n't know what it's called, and then, the one below is called, and then the third, the third floor is called V. P. 
. Uh-huh. 
Oh. 
Then, they said that there were five out of ten in that V. P. probably. 
Oh. It 
is, it is that 
kind of, that is to say, 
Uh-huh. 
It's like a straight stick. 
Oh, oh. 
We also thought at first, oh, I said, it seemed, 
What kind of personality 
is that? Be a theater or something, he said it was n't, he said, Oh, 
oh. Uh-huh, 
uh-huh. He 
said that place has a lot of V. P. E. there, and he said, he 
said to me, that there was a lot of V. P. 
E. there. Uh, that, that, 
uh, that day, uh, Xiao Huang, that Xiao, uh, Song Hengchang's wife, you know, they were in Philadelphia. 
Right. 
Called us, and we said, 
Right. 
Uh-huh. 
There seem to be quite a lot of O. M. E. S. in our area. 
Right. 
That, uh, you know, uh, Meng Huan got married again. Right, 
Meng Huan found a, uh, a, uh, Shenzhen TV Station. 
Ah, no, no, Shenzhen, Hainan TV Station. 
Oh, Hainan TV Station, right, right, right. Right. 
Right. 


And then, um, 
and this person I know is Lin Tao's sister. 
Really? 
Lin Tao's sister seems to be the anchor of a TV station. 
Really? 
Right, and Lin Tao and Xiao Huang are quite close to 
each 
other. Right. After that, that, %pw, 
er, when Lin Tao's sister was just going to Lin Tao's place, 
Um. 
She said she had a friend who came to visit her, and the friend came to see her, and she said she knew him, and he even brought her paintings. % er, 
right? Very 
skinny, oh. 
Oh, really, the earth is also small. 
Oh. It 
takes a tot of time to together, I heard that Lao Bao talked that day. 
Oh. 
Lao Bao was talking 
about 
it. Um. He said Meng Huan is going to that, oh, I just said it wrong, it's Shenzhen's Hainan TV station, something 
like 
that. 
Um. Um. Then Lao Bao was talking about it, Mr. Meng is very capable, he said, alas. 
Right, no, his sister is from Shenzhen's TV station. 
Oh, her sister is, I mean, 
Meng Huan's sister. 
Right, I said, so, so, her 
sister probably helped him, helped him a lot, or something like that. 
Oh. 
But, but, she is, well, Zhao Zhong wanted to bring a group of people to visit the United 
States. 
Uh huh. Meng Huan's job is to receive and to guide people, or something like that. 
Right, it seems that Meng Huan has been doing this thing over there all the time. Right, it's similar to 
this kind of thing, she is now in China. 
Oh. 
She often comes back to China, and probably, uh-huh. 
He 
will come back in December, and we went there two times last year, 
we went there two times last fall, and we saw him in New 
York too, we were still the same 
person. Oh, it's quite fast. It's 
really fast. It 
seems Qian Yi has found a Taiwanese, it seems. 
Right. They 
got married and have kids, it seems. 
Really? 
I think she heard it from Lao Bao. 
I think Qian Yi will contact Lao Bao and them, I think. 
Right, he gave birth to a, 
Uh-huh. He 
gave birth to a kid, anyway he's grown, grown fat. Really? That kind of thing, 
right. 
He is probably in 
a good mood. Right. 
Then, 
My wife also said, 
She said, who is it? She 
said, 
Hu Dan seems to be a lonely person now. Oh, 
Hu Dan is really a fool. Right. Really. He has been 
doing 
this for so 
long, and he is still there, trying to fool her, trying to fool her. Really. 
He 
does n't know what kind of status he is in this society. 
Right, he, he seems to think he seems to be quite 
Because he is a Ph D, 
he thinks he is very 
He should 
I think it should be very good, 
like this. Then you, yes, then she is n't very good, then you ca n't always say, 
You should be nice to her when you meet someone, then if she is tempted, she will still think about you. 
Uh-huh. Right, she is also, also, also, also, also not clear about it. Anyway, this is her personal, personal life, 
life idea, anyway, she is going to toss it around. Uh-huh. 
She 
has to toss it around, toss it around, see how it will be after a while of toss. She ca 
n't figure it out 
anyway. 
That Uh, Wigen called a couple of days ago, he said he, Uh, 
sunscreen, he is going to 
DC, where is D, Dainton? Ah, 
right, right, I, I know where Dainton is. Right, 
they seem to have contact with Dainton. Very 
good. 
Right. 
He is going to Dainton, Wu Wenliang is also in New Jersey. 
Uh-huh. 
Right. 
Do you have contact? 
We have contact. 
Ah? 
Contact. Just that time, 
did n't Zheng Hongming, uh, say he would come to our place, he is uh-huh. wanted to 
bring 
Wu Wenliang together, Wu Wenliang stayed with them for about forty minutes to drive. 
Right. 
Then, but we said that there was a show, they came in advance, so Wu Wenliang and them did n't, he did n't bring him. 
Oh, you have Wu Wenliang's phone number, Wu Weigen asked me for Wu Wenliang's phone number, oh, I said, I said, 
Oh. 
I said, I, because they seem to be quite familiar, Wu Wenliang and Wu Weigen. 
Oh, really? Then I still do n't know what they said, I have, but I do n't know where Di Xiaofang is. 
Right. 
Oh. 
I'm sure to 
say that, let's talk about it later, 
otherwise, He, he will talk about it later, it does n't 
matter. 
Uh-huh. Oh, he told me that day, and I said, uh, he said, really, he said, he came here and said everything. I said, he said he wanted to talk to me on the phone, and I said I did n't, I said, 
Ah. 
Uh-huh. 
I said I would call next time, I said I would ask Xiaoming and ask him for the medicine, and then we'll 
see. He, uh, he definitely has this thing, I do n't know where he has it. 
Uh-huh. 
That, 
Uh-huh. 
Wen, Wen Liang and them are twenty minutes away from that, Philadelphia, in Chinatown. 
Is 
that so? Uh-huh, that is, although they are in New Jersey, they are, uh, uh, I am biased, 
Panther, Pennsylvania 
is pretty close. Pennsylvania is pretty close, it's not far away from your place, I think. 
It's about one hour away from our 
place. It's about two hours away. 
Oh. 
It's about two hours away, % er. Then, 
Zheng Hongming is pretty much in the middle of us. 
Oh. 
It's about when we say, when we go to Zheng Hongming's place to meet up. 
Which company is Zheng Hongming in? 
I do n't know his company name either, he seems to be doing something, % er, 
Dixiao told me about this Chinese, it seems to be Chang Gan Qi or something, this company. What do you mean by it's done and it's gone. He he he asked me to apply for one that He and that Sile company have some sort of bullshit characters. uh-huh 
A little friendship probably, a little academic academic relationship. 
uh-huh And then just er said to 
do some cooperation. Long-term Development Project. Zheng Hongming also 
moved from 
from California to here slowly slowly. Right. Just turned around like this. 
Uh-huh. Who is that? 
That 
